Laparoscopic staging of upper gastrointestinal malignancy.Laparoscopic staging (LS) of upper gastrointestinal malignancy has decreased the number of non-curative laparotomies. However, as radiological techniques have improved the value of this invasive staging technique has decreased, with some units either being more selective or abandoning it altogether for certain tumour types. The aim of the present study is to prospectively evaluate the additional utility of LS of upper gastrointestinal malignancy after radiological staging with modern techniques.One hundred and six consecutive patients assessed as having potentially curable upper gastrointestinal malignancy after radiological staging underwent LS between April 1999 and June 2001. Laparoscopic findings, outcome at laparotomy and complications were prospectively recorded.Laparoscopic staging detected incurable disease in 28 of the 106 patients (26%). The negative likelihood ratio was 0.36 (95% CI 0.24-0.53). Twenty-seven patients were considered incurable because of findings at laparoscopy and one on the findings of laparoscopic ultrasound. Ten patients underwent open palliative procedures and seven had non-therapeutic laparotomies giving a non-curative laparotomy rate of 16%. LS was most useful for primary liver and biliary tract tumours and was least useful for colorectal liver metastases. The most frequent findings denoting incurability were the presence of liver disease (12 cases) and peritoneal metastases (nine cases). Complications occurred in three patients with one death being attributable in part to the laparoscopy.Laparoscopy was useful in decreasing the number of non-therapeutic laparotomies, but laparoscopic ultrasound gave little additional benefit. The utility of LS was dependent on tumour type and in particular was of marginal benefit for colorectal liver metastases. LS remains a useful staging tool but should be applied selectively.Lesser sac endoscopy and laparoscopy in pancreatic carcinoma definitive diagnosis, staging and palliation.Laparoscopy with lesser sac endoscopy (LSE) were used in combination from 1987 to 1992 in 103 patients for differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and other peripancreatic pathology, staging, and palliation. LSE identified pancreatic carcinoma in 38 patients; pancreatic cystadenocarcinoma in 2 patients; pancreatic cystadenoma in 3 patients; pancreatic adenoma in 1 patient; pancreatic metastases from liver in 2 patients; and pancreatic cysts in 5 patients. False negative diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma occurred in two cases. Nontumor pancreatic pathology was revealed in 10 patients. Specifically, acute pancreatitis was found in four patients, and chronic pancreatitis was found in six patients. Extrapancreatic cancers were identified in 15 patients: retroperitoneal extraorgan tumors were found in 2 patients; extrahepatic biliary tract cancer in 6 patients; gallbladder cancer in 1 patient; liver cancer in 3 patients; and stomach cancer in 1 patient. In five cases no pathology was found. Overall correct definitive diagnosis was established in 101 patients. Sensitivity of laparoscopy with LSE for pancreatic carcinoma diagnosis proved to be 95 per cent (38 of 40 patients), for pancreatic tumors diagnosis 96.22 per cent (51 of 53 patients); specificity of the method 100 per cent; and accuracy of diagnosis 98 per cent (101 of 103 patients). Thus, the accuracy of the method was as high as the accuracy of combination of all known modalities. Criteria of unresectability were revealed with the combination of LSE and laparoscopy in 75 per cent (30 of 40 cases) of pancreatic carcinoma. Moreover, laparoscopy allowed palliation of pancreatic carcinoma. Laparoscopic cholecystostomy was performed in 10 patients, and laparoscopic cholecystojejunostomy with enteroenterostomy was performed in 6 patients.The use of diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic resection with curative intent is possible in a select minority of patients with carcinomas of the pancreatic head. Diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography combines the proven benefits of staging laparoscopy with high-resolution intraoperative ultrasound, thus allowing the surgeon to perform a detailed assessment of the pancreatic cancer.In a prospective study of 26 patients with obstructive jaundice from a carcinoma of the head of the pancreas, the curative resectability of tumors was assessed by ultrasound (26 cases), computerized tomography (26 cases), endoscopic ultrasound (16 cases), and a combination of diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (26 cases).The findings of ultrasound and computerized tomography were comparable: 50% of patients were excluded from curative resection. Endoscopic ultrasound provided precise information on the primary tumors. The accuracy of the combined diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound, when compared with ultrasound, computerized tomography, and endoscopic ultrasound, was better with respect to minute peritoneal or hepatic metastasis: 80.7% (or a further 30.7%) of patients did not qualify for curative resection.Diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography enables detection of previously unsuspected metastases; thus, needless laparotomy can be avoided. It should therefore be considered the first step in any potentially curative surgical procedure.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography in judging the resectability of pancreatic head cancer.To explore the clinical value of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) in judging the resectability of pancreatic head cancer.LUS was employed as a prospective diagnosis of tumor staging before exploratory laparotomy in 22 patients diagnosed with pancreatic head cancer to identify whether the liver and peritoneum had small metastases or local invasion to the portal vein, superior mesenteric vessel, aorta, inferior vena cava.In the 22 patients receiving laparoscopy and LUS, we found peritoneal or surface liver metastases (3 patients), hepatic parenchyma metastases (1), and pancreatitis proved by biopsy under ultrasound guidance (1). Laparotomy was avoided in these 5 patients. Of the remaining 17 patients, 8 patients, including 2 patients with portal vein emboli due to tumor metastases had hypertrophic lymph nodes or tumor invasion of local vessels in the peritoneal cavity, retroperitoneum, and omentum and the other 9 patients had resectable tumors shown by LUS. The 17 patients were subjected to exploratory laparotomy, and pancreaticoduodenectomy was successful in 8 patients.Laparoscopy and LUS can be used to precisely estimate the possibility of resection of pancreatic head cancer, and prevent unnecessary exploratory laparotomy and its complications. It can be used as a routine examination before exploratory laparotomy.Diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in staging of cancer of the pancreatic head region.CA 19-9 levels predict results of staging laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer.Laparoscopy has emerged as an important staging procedure for determining resectability of pancreatic cancer. However, a small fraction of patients with pancreatic cancer benefit from its use and therefore the routine application of laparoscopy remains controversial. We hypothesized that serum CA 19-9 levels may identify patients who will or will not benefit by laparoscopy. We retrospectively reviewed our database of 63 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma who underwent staging laparoscopy and correlated findings with CA 19-9 levels. Overall, laparoscopy identified metastatic disease in 12 patients (19%). None of those required any further operation. The resectability rate (patients who underwent resection after laparoscopy) was 73.5%. There was one false-negative laparoscopy (1.6%). Patients with higher CA 19-9 levels had significant higher odds of having metastasis identified by laparoscopy (odds ratio, 1.83; 95% confidence interval, 1.03-3.24; P = .04). There was no patient with CA 19-9 levels below 100 U/ml in whom metastatic disease was identified during laparoscopy: 18 patients (28.6%) with CA 19-9 levels below this cutoff point had negative laparoscopy and could have avoided the procedure had this cutoff been used for screening. This would have increased the laparoscopy yield to 26.7%. In patients with adenocarcinoma of the pancreas, low CA 19-9 levels predict low probability of metastatic disease; in those patients, laparoscopy can be spared. On the contrary, patients with elevated CA 19-9 have an increased probability of metastatic disease, and these patients may benefit from diagnostic laparoscopy.Laparoscopic staging and subsequent palliation in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma.To test the hypothesis that laparoscopic staging improves outcome in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma compared to standard radiology staging.Diagnostic laparoscopy of peripancreatic malignancies has been reported to improve assessment of tumor stage and to prevent unnecessary exploratory laparotomies in 10% to 76% of patients.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound were performed in 297 consecutive patients with peripancreatic carcinoma scheduled for surgery after radiologic staging. Patients with pathology-proven unresectable tumors were randomly allocated to either surgical or endoscopic palliation. All others underwent laparotomy.Laparoscopic staging detected biopsy-proven unresectable disease in 39 patients (13%). At laparotomy, unresectable disease was found in another 72 patients, leading to a detection rate for laparoscopic staging of 35%. In total, 145 of the 197 patients classified as having "possibly resectable" disease after laparoscopic staging underwent resection (74%). Average survival in the group of 14 patients with biopsy-proven unresectable tumors randomly allocated to endoscopic palliation was 116 days, with a mean hospital-free survival of 94 days. The corresponding figures were 192 days and 164 days in the 13 patients allocated to surgical palliation.Because of the limited detection rate for unresectable metastatic disease and the likely absence of a large gain after switching from surgical to endoscopic palliation, laparoscopic staging should not be performed routinely in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma.Diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in staging of cancer of the pancreatic head region.The aim of this study was to assess the additional role of diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of patients with pancreatic head malignancy. Between January 1993 and June 1994, 73 patients with stage I cancer of the pancreatic head determined by preoperative investigation (endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and Doppler ultrasonography) were eligible for laparoscopic ultrasonography. The peritoneal cavity was investigated for peritoneal deposits, intrahepatic metastases, malignant infiltration of the portal and superior mesenteric vessels, and N3 lymph node metastases. All patients without histologically proven metastases proceeded to laparotomy. Seventy patients were eligible for evaluation. Sixteen of the 21 patients with distant metastases were diagnosed by laparoscopy with ultrasonography. Forty-nine patients had surgical exploration and trial dissection to assess local resectability. Twenty-nine patients (41 per cent) had resectable pancreatic head tumours. The positive predictive value of local ingrowth as determined by laparoscopic sonography was 93 per cent. Laparotomy was avoided in 19 per cent of patients and the preoperative stage was changed in 41 per cent. Laparoscopy including ultrasonography was effective in staging pancreatic head malignancy.Computed tomography and laparoscopy in the assessment of the patient with pancreatic cancer.In most patients with pancreatic cancer, the tumor is unresectable. Nonoperative methods for palliation of jaundice, duodenal obstruction, and pain currently are being developed. Preoperative assessment of resectability of the tumor is becoming more and more important to avoid unnecessary operations. The aim of this study was to compare computed tomography (CT) and laparoscopy with special reference to the additive role of the latter technique in predicting unresectability of pancreatic cancers.Sixty patients with exocrine pancreatic cancer were assessed prospectively with both CT and laparoscopy. On the basis of metastatic spread or signs of vascular involvement, the radiologist and the laparoscopist independently reported the tumors as probably unresectable or resectable.The predictive value for unresectability was 100% for both CT and laparoscopy. Sensitivity in predicting unresectability was 69% for both techniques, and the corresponding figure for specificity was 100%. When CT and laparoscopy were evaluated together, an improvement in sensitivity to 87% was observed (p < 0.05). Separately, CT and laparoscopy correctly predicted resectability in only 30% and 38% of the patients, respectively. The presence of liver metastases was overlooked by CT in 13 of 32 patients (40%). Every fourth patient who was found to have unresectable tumor at CT was falsely classified as resectable by the laparoscopist, leading to unnecessary laparotomies. On the other hand, 9 of 24 patients (38%) with resectable disease at CT were deemed unresectable at the subsequent laparoscopy.Laparoscopy and CT independently and reliably predicted unresectability of pancreatic cancer, but the methods were inaccurate in forecasting resectability. The results suggest that CT examination should be done in patients who are candidates for attempted curative surgical procedures, whereas laparoscopy should be restricted to Those Judged resectable at CT.Evolving preoperative evaluation of patients with pancreatic cancer: does laparoscopy have a role in the current era?Recent years have brought important developments in preoperative imaging and use of laparoscopic staging of patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma (PAC). There are few data about the optimal combination of preoperative studies to accurately identify resectable patients.We conducted a statewide review of all patients with surgically managed PAC from 1996 to 2003 using data from the Oregon State Cancer Registry, augmented with clinical information from primary medical record review. We documented the use of all staging modalities, including CT, endoscopic ultrasonography, and laparoscopy. Primary outcomes included resection with curative intent. The association between staging modalities, clinical features, and resection was measured using a multivariate logistic regression model.There were 298 patients from 24 hospitals who met the eligibility criteria. Patients were staged using a combination of CT (98%), laparoscopy (29%), and endoscopic ultrasonography (32%). The overall proportion of patients who went to surgical exploration and were resected was 87%. Of patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy, metastatic disease that precluded resection was discovered in 24 (27.6%). For patients who underwent diagnostic laparoscopy and were not resected, vascular invasion was the most common determinant of unresectability (56.6%). In multivariate analysis, preoperative weight loss and surgeon decision to use laparoscopy predicted unresectability at laparotomy.This population-based study demonstrates that surgeons appear to use laparoscopy in a subset of patients at high risk for metastatic disease. The combination of current staging techniques is associated with a high proportion of resectability for patients taken to surgical exploration. With current imaging modalities, selective application of laparoscopy with a dual-phase CT scan as the cornerstone of staging is a sound clinical approach to evaluate pancreatic cancer patients for potential resectability.Staging with helical computed tomography and laparoscopy in pancreatic head cancer.Helical computed tomography provides valuable information about extent of pancreatic cancer. However, it remains difficult to detect small distant metastases. Laparoscopic examination is becoming standard for cancer staging.Between 1995 and 1999, 45 patients with radiologically resectable pancreatic head cancer were analyzed retrospectively to clarify the indications for and role of staging laparoscopy. Computed tomography was examined for tumor size and spread to portal or superior mesenteric veins (PV) and celiac or superior mesenteric arteries (A).There were 29 (64%) patients with resectable disease, 4 (9%) with localized unresectable, and 12 (27%) with metastatic (hepatic in 7 and peritoneal in 5). Patients with metastatic disease were more likely to present with abdominal pain, vomiting, and back pain than were patients with resectable disease (p < 0.05). The mean tumor size and involvement of PV or A were greater in metastatic patients than in resectable patients (p < 0.005 or p < 0.01). The survival rate for patients with metastatic disease was lower than that for patients with resectable disease (p < 0.0001).According to clinical features and computed tomography findings, laparoscopic exploration is recommended for cancer staging. Helical computed tomography and staging laparoscopy categorize patients into those with localized and those with metastatic disease which considerably correlated with survivals.The standard diagnostic work-up and surgical treatment of pancreatic head tumours.Role of laparoscopy in the staging of gastrointestinal cancer.Accurate staging plays a primary role in determining the appropriate treatment of gastrointestinal malignancies. Recently, laparoscopy has emerged as a staging modality that is more sensitive and specific in staging most gastrointestinal cancers than preoperative imaging modalities. The addition of laparoscopic ultrasonographic techniques has achieved even greater staging accuracy. Consequently, patients with disease that is amenable to resection are better identified, and others with locally advanced disease are spared unnecessary laparotomies. Since laparoscopic techniques may be associated with low morbidity and a rapid recovery, palliative procedures are being developed for patients with advanced gastrointestinal malignancies. This reviews summarizes the current status of laparoscopic staging of gastrointestinal malignancies and compares this technique to preoperative imaging modalities. Also discussed are promising staging technologies and therapeutic procedures that may soon play an important role in the management of gastrointestinal cancer patients.Pancreatic cancer. Laparoscopic staging and peritoneal cytology.Laparoscopy is an indispensable study if precise preoperative staging for pancreatic cancer is required. It will identify liver, peritoneal, or omental implants in 22% to 48% of patients who have no other evidence of disseminated disease by CT. Performing peritoneal washings at the time of laparoscopy will disclose an additional 8% of patients with micro metastases and who have an equally poor prognosis as those with visible metastases.The role of laparoscopy and ultrasonography in pancreatic head carcinoma.Cytology of peritoneal lavage performed during staging laparoscopy for gastrointestinal malignancies: is it useful?To evaluate the potential benefit of cytology of the peritoneal lavage obtained during diagnostic laparoscopy for staging gastrointestinal (GI) malignancies.Peritoneal lavage is a simple procedure that can be performed during laparotomy for GI tumors. Tumor cells in the lavage fluid are thought to indicate intraperitoneal tumor seeding and to have a negative effect on survival. For this reason, peritoneal lavage is frequently added to diagnostic laparoscopy for staging GI malignancies.Patients who underwent peritoneal lavage during laparoscopic staging for GI malignancies between June 1992 and September 1997 were included. Lavage fluids were stained using Giemsa and Papanicolaou methods. Cytology results were correlated with the presence of metastases and tumor ingrowth found during laparoscopy and with survival.Cytology of peritoneal lavage was performed in 449 patients. Tumor cells were found in 28 patients (6%): 8/87 with an esophageal tumor, 2/32 with liver metastases, 11/72 with a proximal bile duct tumor, 7/236 with a periampullary tumor, and none in 7 and 15 patients with a primary liver tumor or pancreatic body or tail tumor, respectively. In 19 of the 28 patients (68%) in whom tumor cells were found, metastatic disease was detected during laparoscopy, and 3 of the 28 patients had a false-positive (n = 1) or a misleading positive (n = 2) lavage result. Therefore, lavage was beneficial in only 6/449 patients (1.3%); in these patients, the lavage result changed the assessment of tumor stage and adequately predicted irresectable disease. Univariate analysis showed a significant survival difference between patients in whom lavage detected tumor cells and those in whom it did not, but multivariate analysis revealed that these survival differences were caused by metastatic or ingrowing disease.Cytology of peritoneal lavage with conventional staining should no longer be performed during laparoscopic staging of GI malignancies because it provides an additional benefit in only 1.3% of patients and has limited prognostic value for survival in this group of patients.Assessment of pancreatic malignancy with laparoscopy and intraoperative ultrasound.Staging laparoscopy for pancreatic malignancy is controversial. This study aimed to assess the efficacy of laparoscopy with intraoperative ultrasound in the management of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.The study involved patients undergoing laparoscopy and intraoperative ultrasound over a period of 42 months. The entry criteria specified radiologic (computed tomography) diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma and no evidence of metastases.The study enrolled 100 patients (52 men and 48 women) ages 21 to 83 years (mean, 63 years). On the basis of imaging, 75 patients had lesions judged to be operable, and 25 patients had a pancreatic head lesion larger than 4 cm radiologically, considered to be unresectable, but with no evidence of metastatic disease. At laparoscopy, three patients had a normal examination, with no evidence of a pancreatic mass, and an additional seven patients had other pathology including one lymphoma, one ampullary tumor, two cases of chronic pancreatitis, and three sarcomas. Of the patients with radiologically inoperable disease, 16% had previously undetected metastases, but 24% were judged to be suitable for curative resection. Half of these patients underwent successful resection. Of the patients with radiologically operable disease, undetected liver or peritoneal metastases were found in 20% of the body or tail lesions and in 26% of the pancreatic head lesions. Of the pancreatic head tumors, 12% were found to be larger than 4 cm and therefore unsuitable for curative resection. Consequently, only 53% were confirmed to be suitable for resection. Of the patients explored with a view to curative resection, 42% actually underwent resection, with clearance of resection margins achieved in 77.8%.Of the patients thought to have a resectable tumor on the basis of good quality preoperative imaging, 44% had their management approach altered after laparoscopy and avoided an open procedure. Laparoscopy should therefore be used in the preoperative staging of pancreatic tumors.Peritoneoscopy and pancreas biopsy in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases.Peritoneoscopy and pancreatic biopsy under direct vision were performed on 124 cases with a variety of pancreatic diseases by means of supragastric pancreoscopy and supragastric bursoscopy. Among 53 cases of pancreatitis, the pancreas was directly observed in 38 (72%). Among 71 cases of pancreatic carcinoma, observation of pancreas head carcinoma was accomplished in 32% and for pancreas body carcinoma, 85%. Peritoneoscopic biopsy of the pancreas had good diagnostic accuracy with negligible complications.Diagnostic-staging laparoscopy.Recently instead of the old fashioned, traditional explorative laparotomy the newer up-to-date procedure, the diagnostic-staging laparoscopy has been generally used in the everyday surgical practice of the Authors. Evaluating 32 diagnostic and staging laparoscopy Authors draw the attention to the importance of this procedure which has high diagnostic value, and reduces the complication rate. Biopsy, cytology, frozen section can be done. Authors carries out diagnostic and staging laparoscopy in cases of esophageal, liver, stomach and pancreas tumours just immediately before surgery.The efficacy of laparoscopic staging in patients with upper gastrointestinal tumors.The major advantage of diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with a gastrointestinal tumor is the prevention of unnecessary explorative laparotomies. However, it is doubtful whether this procedure also prevents late laparotomies that are necessary for palliative treatment during follow-up.From January 1992 to July 1995, 233 consecutive patients with gastrointestinal malignancies underwent laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography after routine diagnostic procedures had shown potential curative disease.After diagnostic laparoscopy, laparotomy was not performed in 21% of all patients (47 of 226) because of histologically proven, unresectable, mainly metastatic disease; 6% had esophageal tumors (4 of 64 patients), 43% had liver tumors (10 of 23), 43% had proximal bile duct tumors (9 of 21), 15% had periampullary tumors (17 of 111), and 43% had pancreatic body and tail tumors (3 of 7). Nonoperative palliation was successful in all patients. However, late laparotomies were necessary in 7 of these 47 patients (15%): 5 patients with periampullary tumors and 2 patients with proximal bile duct tumors. All 7 patients underwent a surgical bypass, most due to duodenal obstruction, 1 to 13 months after diagnostic laparoscopy.In this study, diagnostic laparoscopy may have prevented unnecessary laparotomies for exploration or palliation in 18% of all patients (40 of 226). The procedure is of doubtful benefit for patients with esophageal tumors because the current findings show that only 6% of explorative laparotomies could be prevented. In patients with periampullary tumors, the initial benefit was 15%, but the risk of a late laparotomy is relatively high (30%).Staging of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma with spiral CT and endoscopic ultrasonography: an indirect evaluation of the usefulness of laparoscopy.The interest of laparoscopy in the preoperative staging of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma before curative pancreaticoduodenectomy is a matter of controversy and depends on the accuracy of preoperative imaging techniques.To assess the potential value of laparoscopy when a standardised and optimal preoperative staging is performed, including spiral computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS).All consecutive patients operated on with a view to curative pancreaticoduodenectomy for pancreatic head or ampullary adenocarcinoma in our centre from January 1998 to August 2000 were retrospectively studied. All of them had preoperative spiral CT and EUS. Tumour resectability was considered as highly probable (HP) or uncertain (U) according to well-defined criteria. Operative records of patients were reviewed to indirectly assess the effective resectability rate and the criteria responsible for unresectability and which of them would have been identified by laparoscopy if initially performed.69 consecutive patients were studied. Resectability was HP (n = 56) or U (n = 13) after preoperative staging. Curative pancreatoduodenectomy was performed in 53 patients (77%) (48 HP, 5 U). Positive predictive value of preoperative imaging for highly probable resectability was 86% (48/56). Among the 16 unresectable tumours (8 HP, 8 U), the cause of non-resection would have been found at laparoscopy in 9 patients (56%) (6 HP, 3 U). Finally, if initially performed, laparoscopy would have avoided laparotomy in 9/69 patients (13%) (6/56 HP (11%); 3/13 U (23%)).With accurate preoperative staging using spiral CT and EUS, laparoscopy would detect tumours which were unresectable in 13% of patients with pancreatic head cancer. Laparoscopy remains useful in selected patients, such as those with preoperative uncertain resectability, in whom it can prevent unnecessary laparotomy in one fourth of patients.The effects of staging laparoscopy on trocar site and peritoneal recurrence of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy (SL) has been used to assess resectability of patients with pancreatic cancer. It has lead to increased resectability rates and decreased morbidity. However, experimental data suggests that laparoscopy and peritoneal insufflation can promote tumor growth and potential recurrence. Few clinical data exist to allow assessment of whether these theoretical concerns translate into clinical problems. The purpose of this study was to determine if SL increases the incidence of trocar-site and peritoneal recurrence of pancreatic cancer.A retrospective review of all patients evaluated for pancreatic cancer from 1996 to 2001, inclusive, was included in this study. Patients were divided into five groups: nonoperative management (NM), SL followed by resection (SL-R), SL without resection (SL-NR), exploratory laparotomy with resection (EL-R), and exploratory laparotomy without resection (EL-NR). Patient records were assessed for postoperative occurrence of carcinomatosis and/or malignant ascites, trocar- or incisional-site recurrence, use of postoperative chemotherapy or radiation therapy, and survival.A total of 235 patients were included. Peritoneal progression of disease: NM 15.9%, SL 24.2%, EL 31.6% ( p = 0.03). Trocar/incisional recurrence: SL 3.0%, EL 3.9% ( p = NS). Use of chemotherapy/radiotherapy: NM 29.4%, SL-R 76.5%, SL-NR 62.5%, EL-R 69.6%, EL-NR 41.5%. Median survival (months): NM 3; SL-R 15, EL-R 10 ( p = NS); SL-NR 6, EL-NR 5 ( p = NS).SL does not increase the occurrence of trocar-site disease or peritoneal disease progression of pancreatic cancer. Patients who are found not to be resectable by SL are more likely to receive postoperative treatment. However, this does not appear to affect survival greatly. Nevertheless, avoidance of nontherapeutic laparotomy is worthwhile in these patients.Value of laparoscopy in the diagnosis and management of pancreatic carcinoma.Our experience with laparoscopy in the diagnosis and staging of 23 cases of pancreatic cancer is reported. This endoscopic procedure has proved useful in the diagnosis of the disease, in the assessment of operability, and in the retrieval of material for histological and cytological confirmation of pancreatic cancer. An infra-gastric laparoscopic method for inspection of the body and tail of the pancreas is described and the technique may allow the earlier detection of neoplasms in this region.[Efficacy and economic aspects of preoperative diagnosis: laparoscopy is useful in only 13% of patients with pancreatic carcinoma].The value of diagnostic laparoscopy to improve tumor staging in patients with pancreatic and periampullary cancer is still a matter of controversial discussion, especially with regard to whether diagnostic laparoscopy can identify patients in whom a laparotomy can be avoided due to metastases. To answer this question, all patients who underwent operations for pancreatic cancer (n = 97) or periampullary cancer (n = 30) between 11/1993 and 12/1995 were evaluated. Only 10% of the patients with periampullary/pancreatic cancer and 13% with pancreatic cancer could avoid laparotomy through diagnostic laparoscopy. Due to these low numbers, a diagnostic laparotomy cannot be recommended in general in patients with pancreatic and/or periampullary cancer on economic grounds and because of the risk of trocar metastases.Multimodality staging optimizes resectability in patients with pancreatic and ampullary cancer.Few patients with pancreatic cancer have resectable disease at the time of diagnosis, and a variety of nonsurgical techniques are available to provide effective palliation of jaundice and pain. Accurate preoperative staging is essential to identify patients with unresectable disease, thereby minimizing unnecessary surgery. Currently used diagnostic tests include contrast-enhanced computerized tomography (CT), visceral angiography, endoscopic ultrasound, and laparoscopy, but their utility remains controversial. To evaluate the accuracy of these various diagnostic tests, 30 consecutive patients with histologically proven pancreatic or ampullary adenocarcinoma treated between 1992 and 1996 were evaluated. All 30 patients had contrast-enhanced CT and laparoscopy, 22 patients (73%) had visceral angiography, and 16 patients (53%) had endoscopic ultrasound. Individual and combined predictive values of resectability and unresectability as well as the sensitivities and specificities were determined for all diagnostic tests and compared with intraoperative findings. When CT, visceral angiography, and laparoscopy were combined, the predictive values of resectability and unresectability were 75 and 90 per cent, respectively, with a sensitivity of 75 per cent and a specificity of 90 per cent. Therefore, the combined use of selected diagnostic tests proved more effective than any single diagnostic test for accurately staging patients with pancreatic head and ampullary cancers and should be considered to minimize unnecessary surgery.[Diagnostic value of preoperative laparoscopy in detection of neoplastic changes].Diagnostic laparoscopy in staging pancreatic carcinoma: developments during the past decade.Laparoscopy for pancreatic cancer: does it benefit the patient?The findings in 73 patients undergoing laparoscopy for pancreatic cancer have been reviewed. The procedure was performed immediately prior to a proposed laparotomy which was undertaken in 51 patients. In this subgroup, 42 patients were correctly staged as having incurable/inoperable disease by laparoscopy but only four out of nine patients judged to be resectable were found to be operable at laparotomy. Laparoscopic target biopsy/fine needle cytology of the primary or its secondary deposits confirmed the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in 61 out of 65 patients (92%). Whereas the majority of hepatic deposits visualized by laparoscopy had been detected by the prelaparoscopic imaging tests, peritoneal and omental deposits were only identified by laparoscopy. Laparoscopy is a useful procedure in the staging of patients with pancreatic cancer and establishes the diagnosis of advanced disease thereby, obviating a laparotomy in all those patients in whom surgical palliation is not indicated. The procedure should be performed in those patients in whom a laparotomy is contemplated.[Diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography: value of staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic carcinoma].The dismal prognosis of pancreatic cancer and the development of new, minimally invasive bypass techniques require a differentiated indication for open pancreatic resection. Diagnostic modalities, which facilitate an accurate assessment of resectability, have to be found. Modern imaging and endoscopic techniques fullfill these requirements in only about 50% of cases. Diagnostic laparoscopy is the only method for visualization of peritoneal metastases. The use of diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic sonography raises the resectability rate to between 75% and 100%. 33% up to 67% of patients deemed resectable by preoperative imaging show signs of irresectable cancer at laparoscopy and can be spared a negative laparotomy. These patients can be treated by laparoscopic or endoscopic bypass techniques.Preoperative laparoscopic examination using surgical manipulation and ultrasonography for pancreatic lesions.Unnecessary laparotomies in patients with advanced pancreatic disease are unlikely to provide any benefits and may compromise both the quality and duration of survival. The purpose of this study was to determine the contribution of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound to the diagnosis or staging, or both, of pancreatic lesions.Fifty-two patients were diagnosed preoperatively with pancreatic cancer. The diagnoses made by laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) were compared with those made prior to the operation. Laparoscopic visualization of the body of the pancreas was obtained via an infragastric approach. For the laparoscopic examination of the head of the pancreas, a retroduodenal approach was used.In 52 patients with cancer of the pancreatic head and body, unresectable findings were observed in 13 patients. Portal vein displacement without other unresectable findings was evident in six patients using LUS, and was confirmed at exploratory laparotomy in five patients. The surgical approaches were changed, with seven patients undergoing an open exploration for biliary drainage and the other six patients receiving endoscopic endoprostheses. In six of the 52 patients, LUS-guided needle biopsies and frozen-section examinations detected chronic pancreatitis (n = 4), a malignant lymphoma (n = 1), and an abdominal tuberculosis (n = 1), which were diagnosed preoperatively as pancreatic cancers and cysts. Only one patient undergoing the laparoscopic procedure had acute pancreatitis; this patient was treated conservatively.LUS, when combined with laparoscopic manipulations, may overcome many of the limitations of laparoscopy alone in the investigation of pancreatic lesions by providing an accurate diagnosis and assessment of the size and extent of the local dissemination.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in staging of pancreatic cancers.Authors report elective diagnostic laparoscopy, and the role of this method in evaluating operability of pancreatic cancer. At their department 11 diagnostic laparoscopic procedures of pancreatic cancer were performed during the last 5 years. In 3 cases tumor proved to be resectable despite preoperative imaging results of unresectable condition. On the basis of international literature authors give brief summary of indications, cost and benefit of diagnostic laparoscopy, and its place in the diagnostic algorythm of pancreatic cancer.Subaquatic laparoscopy for staging of intraabdominal malignancy.Laparoscopic sonography of peripancreatic tumors: preliminary experience.This study was performed to evaluate the use of laparoscopic sonography in patients with suspected peripancreatic tumors and to assess the impact of laparoscopic sonography on patient management.In a prospective study, 24 patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy underwent CT, laparoscopy, and laparoscopic sonography. The pancreas, peripancreatic vasculature, liver, and porta hepatis were evaluated in each patient. Metastases (hepatic, peritoneal, or nodal), extrapancreatic extension of tumor, or vascular encasement was considered evidence of unresectable disease. Histopathology was the standard of reference; unresectable disease was confirmed by biopsy. At the completion of the laparoscopic sonography, each examination was scored according to impact analysis categories that had been prospectively established.Peripancreatic vasculature was adequately shown by laparoscopic sonography in 22 patients (92%), of whom 12 patients had histopathologic evidence of vascular encasement. All 12 cases of vascular encasement were revealed by laparoscopic sonography, and 10 of 12 cases of vascular encasement were revealed by CT. Liver lesions were seen in eight patients (33%). One hemangioma was shown solely by laparoscopic sonography; the other seven liver lesions were revealed by CT, laparoscopy, or both. In six patients (25%), laparoscopic sonography was used to guide biopsy of lesions that were not seen by laparoscopy. Impact analysis showed that laparoscopic sonography provided additional information in eight patients (33%) and altered management in four patients (17%). Of those patients for whom laparoscopic sonography altered management, three patients underwent successful resection after laparoscopic sonography two of these patients had suspected vascular encasement on CT but laparoscopic sonography revealed normal vessels, and the third patient had CT evidence of a liver lesion that was shown to be a cyst on laparoscopic sonography. A fourth patient was spared laparotomy when laparoscopic sonography revealed unsuspected vascular encasement.Preliminary experience suggests that laparoscopic sonography may aid diagnosis and alter management in patients with suspected pancreatic neoplasms.The role of laparoscopy in the management of suspected pancreatic and periampullary malignancies.Laparoscopic evaluation of patients with suspected periampullary malignancies has been utilized more frequently in recent years. Its exact role with regard to staging and surgical bypass for palliation have yet to be clearly defined. To better define the role of laparoscopy in the evaluation and palliation of periampullary malignancy, a retrospective review of the Duke experience was carried out. Fifty-three patients with suspected pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were referred for surgical evaluation at Duke University Medical Center between 1993 and 1995. All patients underwent CT scanning and lesions were classified as resectable or unresectable based on previously established criteria. Patients either underwent laparoscopic evaluation (n = 30; 11 with laparoscopic palliation) or proceeded directly to celiotomy (n = 23). Charts were reviewed for postoperative course including complications, length of stay, and hospital costs. Although laparoscopy had a sensitivity of 93.3% for metastatic disease, CT scans accurately staged 86.8% of patients missing only one patient with peritoneal/hepatic disease. Based on these results, laparoscopy may not be beneficial for every patient with a suspected pancreatic malignancy. Retrospectively an attempt was made to determine which patients benefited from laparoscopy and which patients are best served by proceeding directly to open exploration. From these data we devised an algorithm that outlines an efficient and cost-effective approach for this patient population.Laparoscopy and biopsy in the diagnosis of malignant intra-abdominal tumors.Laparoscopic evaluation was effected in 298 patients with intra-abdominal tumors. Among 186 cases of liver tumor, 172 cases (92.5%) were diagnosed as tumors laparoscopically and malignant tissue was obtained in 71 cases (78.0%) out of 91 cases of liver tumors biopsied under laparoscopic guidance. Among 79 cases of pancreas tumors, laparoscopy led to the correct diagnosis in 32% (38 cases) of carcinoma of the head of the pancreas and 88% (41 cases) of carcinoma of the body and tail of the pancreas. The positive rate of biopsy in cases of tumor of the head of the pancreas and of the body and tail of the organ was 74.1% (20 out of 27 cases) and 84.6% (33 out of 39 cases), respectively. Laparoscopy supplemented by biopsy was useful for the diagnosis of submucosal tumors of the digestive tract and disseminated peritoneal tumors.Refining the role of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in the staging of presumed pancreatic head and ampullary tumours.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound have been validated previously as staging tools for pancreatic cancer. The aim of this study was to identify if assessment of vascular involvement with abdominal computed tomography (CT) would allow refinement of the selection criteria for laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). The details of patients staged with LUS and abdominal CT were obtained from the unit's pancreatic cancer database. A CT grade (O, A-F) of vascular involvement was recorded by a single radiologist. Of 152 patients, who underwent a LUS, 56 (37%) had unresectable disease. Three of 26 (12%) patients with CT grade O, 27 of 88 (31%) patients with CT grade A to D, 17 of 29 (59%) patients with CT grade E and all nine patients with CT grade F were found to have unresectable disease. In all, 24% of patients with tumours <3 cm were found to have unresectable disease. In those patients with tumours considered unresectable, local vascular involvement was found in 56% of patients and vascular involvement with metastatic disease in 17%, while 20% of patients had liver metastases alone and 5% had isolated peritoneal metastases. The remaining patient was deemed unfit for resection. Selective use of laparoscopic ultrasound is indicated in the staging of periampullary tumours with CT grades A to D.[OUR EXPERIENCES WITH LAPAROSCOPIC EXPLORATION].[Value of laparoscopic staging and palliative treatment of peri-ampullary tumors; the Stentby Study].Current utility of staging laparoscopy for pancreatic and peripancreatic neoplasms.The routine use of staging laparoscopy in patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic and peripancreatic neoplasms remains controversial.We reviewed a prospective database that identified 1,045 patients who underwent staging laparoscopy for radiographically resectable pancreatic or peripancreatic tumors between 1995 and 2005. Radiographic resectability was determined by review of radiographic reports, surgeons' notes, and cross-sectional imaging studies. Factors were assessed for their association with the laparoscopic identification of radiographically occult unresectable disease. Recursive partitioning was used to build a decision tree, with laparoscopic identification of unresectable disease as the outcomes, including only patients since 1999 (modern imaging) and factors available preoperatively.Unresectable disease was identified laparoscopically in 145 of the 1,045 radiographically resectable patients (14%). Factors associated with radiographically occult unresectable disease included the time period of the study, whether imaging was performed at our institution (internal versus external imaging), primary site, histology, weight loss, and jaundice. Primary site (pancreatic versus nonpancreatic) was identified as the strongest predictor of yield. In patients with nonpancreatic tumors, the yield of laparoscopy was 4%. In patients with pancreatic tumors, the yield of laparoscopy was 14% overall, but was 8.4% in patients with internal imaging versus 17% in patients with external imaging (p < 0.01). This higher-risk subgroup was partitioned by the presence of weight loss, then by primary site within the pancreas.During the time period of this study, the yield of staging laparoscopy decreased and exceeded 10% only for patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. When high-quality cross-sectional imaging reveals no evidence of unresectable disease, routine staging laparoscopy may not be warranted for pancreatic or peripancreatic tumors other than presumed pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the TNM staging of pancreatic carcinoma.A prospective study was performed comparing laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography (LapUS), transabdominal ultrasonography (USS), computed tomography (CT), and selective visceral angiography with portal phase venography (SVA) for the assessment of resectability in 50 patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer. The results were stratified by TNM stages. Tumor unresectability was demonstrated in 36 patients (72%). The sensitivity of LapUS for demonstrating the index lesion was 96%. Laparoscopic ultrasonography failed to predict factors precluding resection by T stage in six patients, and there were no significant differences in the ability of any modality to predict local resectability (predictive value 58-73%). Laparoscopic ultrasonography did not overestimate T stage and was significantly more specific for assessing unresectability compared with USS (100% vs. 64%, p<0.05) and CT (100% vs. 47%, p<0.005). No imaging investigation was able to assess the N stage accurately. Metastases were confirmed in 16 patients (32%), with LapUS proving significantly more sensitive than USS (94% vs. 29%, p<0.001) and CT (94% vs. 33%, p<0.005). The addition of LapUS to the laparoscopic examination did not change the M stage in any patient, as all metastases were superficially located. Laparoscopy with LapUS was the most reliable method for assessing overall tumour resectability and was significantly more predictive than CT (97% vs. 79%, p<0.005). These results confirm that laparoscopy is indispensable for detecting occult intraabdominal metastases. LapUS reliably predicts tumor unresectability, offsetting the tendency of USS and CT to overestimate T stage. Methods of accurate N staging remain elusive, and the use of routine SVA is not justified.Laparoscopic ultrasonography for hepatobiliary and pancreatic malignancy.Despite the advances made since the introduction of ultrasonography, computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging, a wide discrepancy may occur between preoperative and peroperative staging of gastrointestinal malignancy with liver and peritoneal metastases. Diagnostic laparoscopy performed immediately before a planned laparotomy can provide valuable information for the accurate assessment and appropriate management of some forms of gastrointestinal malignancy, especially that of the liver and pancreas. For evaluation of small liver and retroperitoneal malignancies, intraoperative ultrasonography performed by laparotomy is of proven value. It is now technically possible to perform ultrasonography through a laparoscopic cannula using high-resolution ultrasonographic transducers. This combination of laparoscopy and ultrasonography was studied in 25 patients with established liver lesions, carcinoma of the gallbladder or pancreatic cancer. Additional information leading to a change in surgical approach was obtained in 20 patients. Laparoscopic ultrasonography, although still in a preliminary phase of development, is a simple and reliable technique that will contribute to more accurate staging of intra-abdominal malignancy.Problems in staging of pancreatic and hepatobiliary tumours.[Diagnostic-operative laparoscopy. Our experience].Diagnostic laparoscopy has been an integral part of our surgical practice for over 4 years. Between 1988-1992, 100 diagnostic laparoscopies have been performed in this institution without mortality. We have found the procedure to be particularly useful in the following situation: 1) Hepatobiliary disease where it is used in conjunction with targeted liver biopsy. 2) Acute emergency cases. These include the diagnosis of acute peritonitis, abdominal trauma and in patients with suspected mesenteric ischaemia. 3) In the staging of intra-abdominal malignancy especially gastric, oesophageal, colonic, peritoneal and pancreatic neoplasms.[Is laparoscopic evaluation of digestive cancers legitimate? A prospective study of 109 cases].This aims of this study is to evaluate after laparoscopic exploration or treatment in digestive cancers, the incidence of port site metastases and the incidence of unnecessary laparotomy in advanced disease.109 patients were included in this study: 91 had localized digestive cancers and 18 had disseminated disease with hepatic and/or peritoneal metastases.All the patients underwent a laparoscopy and a laparoscopic ultra-sonography under general anesthesia prior to a definitive decision on therapeutic management. Depending on the circumstances, histological or cytological biopsies were performed. The puncture sites of the trocar were examined clinically and, if required, by ultrasonography, monthly through out the course of the disease. Chemotherapy was instigated in 60.5 per cent of patients.35 patients (32.1 per cent) only had one laparoscopic examination with a mean survival of 4.8 months, 22.9 per cent of patients had laparoscopic treatment of their lesion and 44.9 per cent had conventional treatment. Laparoscopic exploration allowed the detection of 52 lesions that had not been identified by conventional imaging techniques and thereby avoided 35 laparotomies (32.1 per cent). Tumor invasion of the peritoneum was present in 46 per cent of cases, most notably in the cases of pancreatico-biliary cancers. The overall mean survival was 32.7 months while it was 9.8 months in cases of palliative treatment. In total, 436 trocars were used. There was one case (0.9 per cent of patient or 0.02 per cent of port) of a metastasis occurring at the site of the trocar following treatment by right-sided, laparoscopic colectomy in a patient with disseminated cancer. Two factors seem to be involved peritoneal spread of the tumor and manipulation of the tumor.Laparoscopic exploration for digestive cancers is a legitimate technique. It allows the detection of lesions that are not identified by conventional imaging techniques, permits a more accurate assessment of the resectability of a tumor and reduces the number of unnecessary laparotomies. The incidence of metastases at the site of the trocar is low and is closely linked to the presence of disseminated disease and manipulation of the tumor.[Evaluation of pancreatic cancer by combined laparoscopy and echolaparoscopy].This prospective study was undertaken to evaluate the efficiency of staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of tumoural extension and surgical resectability in patients with carcinoma of the pancreatic head.From June 1995 to March 1997, 26 consecutive patients (11 male and 15 female patients), with a mean age of 62.5 years, were included in this study. The lesion was located in the pancreatic head with jaundice. Four staging methods were used: percutaneous ultrasonography (n = 26) computed tomography (n = 26), endoscopic ultrasonography (n = 26). The assessment of resectability by each procedure was verified by surgical exploration and histologic examination.Results of percutaneous ultrasonography and computed tomography were similar, predicting unresectability in 50% of the patients. Endoscopic ultrasonography performed in the 16 patients without visible metastases according to the previous procedures predicted surgical resectability in seven patients only. With staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography, undiscovered metastases were found and unresectability was predicted in 21 patients out of 26; the sensitivity was 100% for liver metastases, peritoneal metastases and vascular involvement, 90% for lymph node involvement and 88% for diagnosis of the primitive lesion. A Whipple procedure was performed in five patients and a palliative bypass in all the other patients except one. An unnecessary laparotomy was avoided in 12 patients.Staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography is superior to all other staging methods. It should be the first step of a potentially curative surgical treatment (five cases only in this series) or of a palliative bypass. Laparotomy was avoided in 12 cases.Value of laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic cancer is a devastating disease that swiftly robs patients of both quality and quantity of life. It is the fourth leading cause of cancer death in the United States. In 2003, there were 31,860 reported new cases with 31,270 deaths occurring due to lack of effective therapy. Eighty percent of patients present with either advanced local or metastatic disease. Dynamic contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) has become the current staging test of choice. Laparoscopic staging of pancreatic tumors with the addition of ultrasound can reveal intraparenchymal hepatic metastases, small peritoneal metastases, and critical retroperitoneal tumor-vessel relationships approaching the accuracy of open exploration to determine resectability without significantly increasing morbidity or mortality. However, given the current accuracy of high-quality CT, the routine use of diagnostic laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer is not warranted. Diagnostic laparoscopy is recommended in select patients with primary tumors greater than 4 cm, tumors in the body or tail of the pancreas, patients with equivocal findings of metastasis on CT, ascites, or clinical or laboratory findings suggesting advanced disease such as marked weight loss, hypoalbuminemia, and elevated CA 19-9.The role of staging laparoscopy in hepatobiliary malignancy: prospective analysis of 401 cases.Patients with potentially resectable hepatobiliary malignancy are frequently found to have unresectable tumors at laparotomy. We prospectively evaluated staging laparoscopy in patients with resectable disease on preoperative imaging.Staging laparoscopy was performed on 410 patients with potentially resectable hepatobiliary malignancy. The preoperative likelihood of resectability was recorded. Data on preoperative imaging, operative findings, and hospital course were analyzed.Laparoscopic inspection was complete in 291 (73%) patients. In total, 153 patients (38%) had unresectable disease, 84 of whom were identified laparoscopically, increasing resectability from 62% to 78%. On multivariate analysis, a complete examination, preoperative likelihood of resection, and primary diagnosis were significant predictors of identifying unresectable disease at laparoscopy. The highest yield was for biliary cancers, and the lowest was for metastatic colorectal cancer. In patients with unresectable disease identified at laparoscopy, the mean hospital stay was 3 days, and postoperative morbidity was 9%, compared with 8 days and 27%, respectively, in patients found to have unresectable disease at laparotomy.Laparoscopy spared one in five patients a laparotomy while reducing hospital stay and morbidity. Targeting laparoscopy to patients at high risk for unresectable disease requires consideration of disease-specific factors; however, the surgeons' preoperative impression of resectability is also important.[Laparoscopic assessment of the operability of pancreatic cancer].Results are reported of laparoscopic examination of 78 patients with pancreatic cancer. The methods used were laparoscopic inspection and palpation of the pancreas, laparoscopic biopsy by mono- and bipuncture method, laparoscopic inspection and palpation of the organs of bursa omentalis. As a result of these investigations, dissemination outside the pancreas was established in 57 patients (73.1 per cent) in the outpatient services, before entering hospital. The other 21 patients (26.9 per cent) were subjected to radical or palliative surgical interventions. The importance of laparoscopy for evaluation of the operability and for selection of patients, entering surgical clinics, is emphasized.Combined endoscopic and laparoscopic ultrasound as preoperative assessment of patients with pancreatic cancer.An accurate pre-therapeutic assessment of the resectability in pancreatic cancer patients is essential to reduce the number of futile surgical explorations. The aim of this study was to assess the combination of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) regarding the detection of patients with non-resectable tumours.From 2002 to 2004, 179 consecutive patients with pancreatic cancer referred for surgical treatment were eligible. Thirty-one (17%) patients were excluded due to co-morbidity and poor performance status. Two patients (1%) were excluded due to metastasis seen on CT scans prior to referral. Thus, 146 patients entered the study. Patients were first examined with EUS followed by LUS, if EUS found no signs of non-resectability. Only patients with tumours found to be resectable or possibly resectable at EUS and LUS were offered surgical treatment. Resectability criteria were defined prior to the study.In all, 108 (74%) patients had non-resectable tumours by the pre-defined criteria. EUS identified 68 (63%) patients and LUS identified an additional 26 (24%) patients. Thus, a total of 94 (87%) patients were non-resectable at either EUS or LUS. Fifty-two (36%) patients underwent surgery. Six patients had surgical exploration and three patients had palliative surgery. Forty-three patients (29%) were resected with curative intention, of whom 38 (88%) had an R0 resection and 5 (12%) had a palliative resection.The combination of EUS and LUS is accurate in identifying the non-resectable patients and has a high predictive value for complete resection.[Is diagnostic laparoscopy a reliable addition to preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma?].Over the last decade several authors proposed adopting diagnostic laparoscopy as an early diagnostic routine method in the staging of pancreatic carcinoma to prevent exploratory laparotomy. In our hospital only 11.6% of all patients who underwent explorative laparotomy would have benefitted from diagnostic laparoscopy. Therefore, we do not recommend diagnostic laparoscopy as a routine method to assess resectability of pancreatic carcinoma?Diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with potentially resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma: is it cost-effective in the current era?For patients with potentially resectable pancreatic cancer, diagnostic laparoscopy may identify liver and peritoneal metastases that are difficult to detect with other staging modalities. The aim of this study was to utilize a population-based pancreatic cancer database to assess the cost effectiveness of preoperative laparoscopy.Data from a state cancer registry were linked with primary medical record data for years 1996-2003. De-identified patient records were reviewed to determine the role and findings of laparoscopic exploration. Average hospital and physician charges for laparotomy, biliary bypass, pancreaticoduodenectomy, and laparoscopy were determined by review of billing data from our institution and Medicare data for fiscal years 2005-2006. Cost-effectiveness was determined by comparing three methods of utilization of laparoscopy: (1) routine (all patients), (2) case-specific, and (3) no utilization.Of 298 potentially resectable patients, 86 underwent laparoscopy. The prevalence of unresectable disease was 14.1% diagnosed at either laparotomy or laparoscopy. The mean charge per patient for routine, case-specific, and no utilization of laparoscopy was $91,805, $90,888, and $93,134, respectively.Cost analysis indicates that the case-specific or routine use of laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer does not add significantly to the overall expense of treatment and supports the use of laparoscopy in patients with known or suspected pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The influence of positive peritoneal cytology on survival in patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The American Joint Committee on Cancer (AJCC) staging system for pancreatic adenocarcinoma classifies positive peritoneal cytology as stage IV disease. Data are limited with respect to the prevalence of positive peritoneal cytology and its influence on survival in patients with resectable, locally advanced, and metastatic disease. Four hundred sixty-two patients underwent staging laparoscopy for pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 1995 and December 2005. Kaplan-Meier survival comparisons were performed to evaluate the significance of positive peritoneal cytology on overall survival (OS) in resected patients and patients with locally advanced and metastatic disease. Of the 462 patients, 47% (217/462) underwent a pancreatic resection. The 21% (95/462) with locally advanced disease and 32% (150/462) with metastatic disease did not undergo resection. Peritoneal cytology was positive in 17% (77/462), and was associated with stage of disease (metastatic, 37%; locally advanced, 11%; resected, 5%; P=0.01). Positive cytology was not associated with OS in patients with metastatic disease or locally advanced disease, but was in resected patients (median, 16 months vs. 8 months; P<0.001). Node-positive disease was present in 8 of 10 patients resected with positive cytology (2 years OS, 12% positive cytology vs. 23% negative; P=0.006). In this study, patients who underwent resection in the presence of positive peritoneal cytology and absence of other identifiable metastatic disease had a similar survival as other patients with stage IV disease.[Laparoscopic staging of gastrointestinal tumors].Laparoscopic staging was carried out in 28 cases with carcinomas of the distal esophagus, cardia, stomach or pancreas. The intention was first to rule out peritoneal carcinomatosis and secondly to see, whether RO-resection would be possible, mainly for the reason of therapeutic splitting. The diagnostic accuracy can be raised to 95% using laparoscopic ultrasound, exploration of the lesser sac of the peritoneum and tissue sampling in combination with preoperative endoscopy and radiography. In 39.3% of the investigated patients the staging must be corrected after laparoscopic staging compared with the preoperative findings. 35.7% of the patients did not need explorative laparotomy.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer by endoscopy.[Prediction of resectability and of surgical risk in pancreatic carcinoma; conditioning factors of survival after resective intervention].Pancreatic cancer has been extensively researched in recent years, but overall survival after diagnosis is almost unchanged since the time of Whipple. In the meantime, we have tried to determine the factors influencing surgical risk, resectability and survival. Between 1968 and 1992, 516 patients with pancreatic cancer were monitored; 160 patients with cancer of the body-tail were excluded. Eighty-five of the remaining 356 patients with pancreatic head cancer were resected, while the remainder underwent only palliative procedures. Surgical outcome, in terms of operative mortality or complications, was correctly predicted preoperatively in > 80% of patients. The preoperative evaluation of the resectability of pancreatic cancer has been investigated with different, mainly invasive, procedures. CT scan, associated with angiography and laparoscopy is reported to give better results, with a resectability rate up to 78%. 67% of our patients who were diagnosed as resectable according to CT-scan features and serum CA 19-9 < 200 U/ml, were actually resected; furthermore 40% had a potentially curative resection. Most of our 'curative' resections (80%) were within this group of patients. Multivariate analysis showed only 4 factors influencing long-term survival: TNM stage, diabetes, age > 70 years, tumour grading.Combined endoscopic ultrasonography and laparoscopic ultrasonography in the pretherapeutic assessment of resectability in patients with upper gastrointestinal malignancies.Even though endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has improved the pretherapeutic staging and assessment of resectability in patients with upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract malignancies, a considerable number of patients still have to undergo unnecessary explorative laparotomy to obtain the final assessment of resectability. The aim of the present study was to evaluate laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) and the combination of EUS and LUS in the pretherapeutic study of these patients with special reference to resectability.Each of 44 patients with esophageal, gastric, or pancreatic cancer was assigned to a treatment-related resectability group based on five different imaging modalities: computer tomography (CT) + ultrasonography (US), EUS, laparoscopy, LUS, and EUS + LUS. The findings with these imaging modalities were compared with intraoperative findings.Overall group assignment accuracy showed significantly better results for EUS, LUS, and EUS + LUS than for CT + US and laparoscopy. EUS + LUS identified all non-resectable patients, whereas the sensitivity of CT + US, laparoscopy, and EUS were 14%, 36%, and 79%, respectively. Median time consumption for each EUS, laparoscopy, or LUS procedure was less than 25 min, and no complications were seen during or after the EUS, laparoscopy, or LUS procedures.Preliminary experience with the combination of EUS and LUS for pretherapeutic assessment of upper GI tract malignancies showed that this combination was superior to CT + US, laparoscopy, and EUS. EUS + LUS correctly identified all non-resectable patients, but two overstaged patients also indicated the need for larger prospective studies to identify the indications and the limitations of this new approach.[Preoperative laparoscopic evaluation of patients with upper gastrointestinal cancer].Nineteen consecutive patients with adenocarcinoma of the stomach or pancreas, in whom preoperative ultrasonography and computed tomography were unable to assess the possibility of surgical resection, had a diagnostic laparoscopy performed. In 16 cases the operability could be established from the findings at laparoscopy. All laparoscopies were carried out without major morbidity and with a short postoperative hospital stay. It is concluded that patients belonging to this category should have a diagnostic laparoscopy performed in order to avoid futile laparotomies, which in cases that are unsuitable for surgical treatment are associated with emotional stress, physical morbidity and a prolonged hospital stay.The prognostic effect of clinical staging in pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The importance of pancreatic cancer staging is uncertain. The aim of this report was to evaluate the accuracy of combined standard imaging techniques in predicting the pathologic stage and to evaluate the prognostic effect of clinical staging to identify patient groups in which laparoscopy and laparotomy could be beneficial.Fifty-four patients were included in this analysis. The techniques used for clinical staging were endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, abdominal computed tomographic scan, and ultrasonography. All patients underwent both clinical and surgical/pathologic staging. A comparison was performed between presurgical stage and surgical/pathologic stage. The prognostic effect of different factors on survival was evaluated with both univariate (log-rank) and multivariate (Cox) analysis.Sensitivity and specificity for vascular involvement were 73.9% and 96.3%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity for nodal involvement were 63.6% and 95.4%, respectively. A total of 33.3% of patients showed a higher than expected pathologic stage, and 3.7% showed a lower than expected pathologic stage, by comparing clinical and pathologic evaluation. A highly significant correlation was observed between clinical T stage (P = .0067) and tumor diameter (P = .0037) and patient survival. Maximal prognostic differentiation was observed by dividing patients into two groups based on imaging results: group A (favorable prognosis) and group B (unfavorable prognosis). The median survival was 25.1 and 8.0 months for group A and B, respectively. Five-year survival was 20.1% and 0%, respectively (multivariate analysis: P = .0007).Integrated standard imaging studies achieved reasonable diagnostic accuracy in our analysis. A single classification based on clinical stage and tumor diameter evaluated by imaging predicts prognosis in patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Preoperative CA 19-9 and the yield of staging laparoscopy in patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Staging laparoscopy for patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma has been reported to yield an 8-15% finding of unresectable disease. Factors associated with the likelihood of subradiographic unresectable disease have not been clearly defined.A prospectively maintained pancreatic database was reviewed and patients were identified who underwent staging laparoscopy for radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 2000 and December 2006. Preoperative carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA 19-9) values were assessed for their association with the presence of subradiographic unresectable disease.Four hundred ninety-one patients underwent staging laparoscopy. Resection was performed in 80% (n = 395). Of the 96 patients with unresectable disease, 75 (78%) had metastases either in the liver (n = 60) or peritoneum (n = 15). Preoperative CA 19-9 values were available for 262 of the 491 patients. Fifty-one of these patients had unresectable disease, of which 78% were due to distant disease. The median preoperative CA 19-9 value for patients who underwent resection was 131 U/ml versus 379 U/ml for those patients with unresectable disease (P = 0.003). A receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve was developed for preoperative CA 19-9 value and tumor resectability. The statistically optimal cutoff value was determined to be 130 U/ml. Unresectable disease was identified in 38 of the 144 patients (26.4%) with a preoperative CA 19-9 >or= 130 U/ml, and in 13 of the 118 patients (11%) with a CA 19-9 < 130 U/ml (P = 0.003). CA 19-9 values greater than 130 U/ml remained a predictor of tumor unresectability on multivariate regression analysis [hazard ratio (HR) 2.70, 95% confidence interval (CI) 1.34-5.44; P = 0.005].In this study, preoperative CA 19-9 values were strongly associated with the identification of subradiographic unresectable disease. Preoperative CA 19-9 values may allow surgeons to better select patients for staging laparoscopy.Limitation of diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with a periampullary carcinoma.Diagnostic laparoscopy has been generally accepted in staging of patients with a periampullary malignancy. In our institution diagnostic laparoscopy was routinely used since 1992. However, in 1998 it was eliminated from the protocol since in a prospective study a yield of only 13% was found with a histologically proven accuracy of 60% for distant metastases. The effect of implementation of the new protocol on the occurrence of unnecessary laparotomies and the outcome after bypass surgery was assessed.Between January 1999 and December 2001, 186 consecutive patients with a potentially resectable periampullary carcinoma after radiological staging without diagnostic laparoscopy underwent explorative laparotomy with the intention to perform a curative pancreatoduodenectomy. Incidence of unresectability and outcome of palliative surgery were assessed.Resection could not be performed in 65 patients who underwent laparotomy because of metastatic disease (29 patients) and loco-regional tumour ingrowth (34 patients). These patients underwent a bypass procedure with a median survival of 216 days.At laparotomy distant metastases were detected in 16% of the patients. Considering the fact that the detection rate of diagnostic laparoscopy is lower than 100%, the use of staging laparotomy is too limited to justify it as a routine procedure.Laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Over the past decade, laparoscopy has emerged as a popular method of detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease in patients presumed to have localized pancreatic cancer.The English language literature on laparoscopic staging of pancreatic cancer was reviewed. Interpretation of this literature on staging laparoscopy is difficult because (1) there has been inconsistent use of high-quality computed tomography (CT) in prospective studies, (2) many studies have included patients with locally advanced disease, and (3) the R0/R1/R2 resection rates among patients staged by laparoscopy have not been reported, making it impossible to correlate laparoscopic findings with the R0 resection rate. Laparoscopy may prevent unnecessary laparotomy in a proportion of CT-staged patients presumed to have resectable pancreatic cancer. However, routine laparoscopy is performed on patients judged to have resectable disease by high-quality CT, this fraction of patients is between 4 and 13 per cent.When state-of-the-art CT is available, the routine use of staging laparoscopy may not be easily justified from the data in the recent literature. Selective use of laparoscopy may be more appropriate and will probably be a more cost-effective staging approach. Criteria are presented for the selective use of laparoscopy in the staging of patients with localized pancreatic cancer.Routine diagnostic laparoscopy is unnecessary in staging tumors of the pancreatic head.This study examined the success of computed tomography (CT) and angiography in predicting resectability of tumors of the pancreatic head and retrospectively examined whether diagnostic laparoscopy would have contributed additional staging information.The records of 67 patients with tumors of the pancreatic head were reviewed. Thirty-four patients had unresectable tumors, and 33 had tumors that were considered operable according to CT and angiographic findings.Surgical resection was successful in 27 of 33 patients (82%). Surgical resection was abandoned in 6 cases due to inability to develop a plane behind the pancreatic head in 4 cases, peritoneal implants in 1 case, and an occult hepatic metastasis in 1 case. Diagnostic laparoscopy might have detected metastases in the latter two cases. Thus, in retrospect, diagnostic laparoscopy might have altered management in only 2 of 33 surgical cases (7%).The potentially limited usefulness of diagnostic laparoscopy in this series, in retrospect, raises the question of whether routinely using diagnostic laparoscopy in staging tumors of the pancreatic head is cost effective.[Contribution of laparoscopic echography in the staging of curative resection of cancer of the pancreatic head (26 cases)].In a prospective study, 26 patients with pancreatic and peri-ampullary cancer were evaluated with ultrasound (US), computerized tomography (CT Scan), endoscopic ultra sonography (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Sensitivity of US and CT scan were comparable, although CT scan seems better to evaluate the size of the tumor and for lymph node detection. 50 per cent of patients had a criterion for noncurative resection. EUS (16 cases) had the best sensitivity (100 per cent) for the staging of small tumors (less than 20 millimeters), detection of adjacent nodes and the relation between tumor and mesenteric and portal veins. EUS was not able to detect peritoneal and/or liver micro-metastases (44 per cent of them would be missed by this examination alone). The criterion for noncurative resection was 56.6 per cent. LUS exactly assessed all tumors larger than 3 centimeters (100 per cent). The accuracy compared with endoscopic ultra-sonography was not as good for small tumors and adjacent nodes, was equal for the venous relations with tumors, but better concerning micro-peritoneal or hepatic metastasis. The criterion for noncurative resection was 80 per cent. These results suggest to use of US and CT as first-line procedures in the pre-operative staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancers. When the patient does not appear to have disseminated lesions (50 per cent), endoscopic ultra-sonography gives a good estimation of the size of the tumor, node assessment and vascular relations. LES could be the first step for a curative surgical treatment LES revealed to discover 15 to 30 per cent of unknown micrometastases and avoided useless laparotomy in these patients.[The role of laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology in the preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma].The staging of pancreatic cancer still represents a challenge for surgeons involved in this field; radiological diagnostic methods used routinely (CT, NMR, angiography) may under-estimate this neoplasm; in fact, the presence of peritoneal or subglissonian hepatic micrometastasis (< 2 cm) is a frequent surprise at laparotomy and force the surgeon to undertake a palliative procedure. This policy need not be followed because it is possible to perform non-surgical palliation of jaundice or pain respectively by percutaneous radiological stent insertion and coeliac alcoholisation. Pre-operative staging thus acquires an important role in the correct treatment, surgical or medical. Laparoscopy allows us to overcome the understaging of the more common diagnostic methods and view directly the coelomatic space and the surface of the abdominal viscera; moreover during this procedure it is possible to perform a peritoneal wash to obtain other information on the cancer stage. We judged 56 patients by radiological diagnosis; 31 were excluded from surgery by laparoscopy; 10 of the other 25 cases were submitted to radical resection. The resectability operative rate was 40%, compared with 18% if we had submitted patients to surgery. Several patients underwent peritoneal wash, always with negative results; all were submitted to surgery and radically resected. In our opinion, laparoscopy and peritoneal wash represent useful tools in the staging of patients affected with pancreatic cancer.The role of laparoscopy in pancreatic surgery.Carcinoma of the pancreas is extremely common, with a five-year mortality rate of about 95-99%. Radical surgery requires good technical skill and can cause complications and operative mortality, but should be avoided in patients with extrapancreatic involvement. Advances in dynamic spiral CT-scan have decreased the number of unnecessary laparotomies. VLS is indicated in cases of pancreatic mass deemed resectable or "doubtful" by CT-scan. Direct laparoscopic visualization can be combined with intraoperative laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS), which has shown a positive predictive value of resectability of 91%. Laparoscopic pancreatoduodenectomy (LPD) shows a high rate of complications and should be performed by very well-trained surgeons. Laparoscopic distal pancreatectomy (LDP) with an "en bloc" splenectomy and spleen preservation should be performed.Preoperative assessment of pancreatic tumors using magnetic resonance imaging, endoscopic ultrasonography, positron emission tomography and laparoscopy.The appropriate preoperative evaluation of a pancreatic tumor remains a matter of debate.We retrospectively evaluated an institutional strategy including magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), positron emission tomography (PET) and laparoscopy (LAP) for detection and staging of pancreatic tumors suspected to be malignant.In a consecutive series of 59 patients screened by MRI, PET, EUS and LAP between July 1998 and November 2002, 48 patients were found to bear pancreatic adenocarcinoma and surgery was performed in 27 of them. For tumor detection, the sensitivity of EUS was superior to MRI and PET (98 vs. 87.5 and 87.5%, respectively, p = 0.13). MRI best assessed loco-regional staging, i.e. arterial involvement. For the detection of distant metastases, the sensitivity of all preoperative examinations taken separately was low. When laparotomy was performed with a curative intent according to all four examinations, occult metastasis or carcinomatosis was discovered in 7/27 patients and the overall predictive value of resectability was thus 74%. Five-year and median survival were significantly better in resected vs. non-resected patients (39% and 26 months vs. 0% and 8 months, p = 0.0006).MRI can be recommended has the first examination in patients bearing pancreatic tumors, complemented by EUS if the findings of MRI are non-conclusive. For detection of distant metastasis, only the combination of all preoperative examination was proved to be more accurate than a single technique.Laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer allows identification of metastatic disease which is beyond the resolution of computed tomography. Laparoscopic ultrasound, dissection, and/or peritoneal cytology may be used to enhance the sensitivity of the staging procedure. Our experience at Massachusetts General Hospital with staging laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology over the past 8 years (N = 239) reveals that approximately 30% of patients without metastases by computed tomography harbor occult metastatic disease at laparoscopy. Additionally, published series demonstrate accurate determination of resectability in greater than 75% of patients after staging laparoscopy. Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer allows optimization of resources and avoidance of unnecessary surgery.Staging of abdominal metastases in pancreatic carcinoma by diagnostic laparoscopy and magnetic resonance imaging.Different noninvasive and invasive techniques are available for the detection of abdominal metastases in pancreatic carcinoma. Since small hepatic or peritoneal metastases are a crucial problem which precludes resection, accurate detection is mandatory. We compared laparoscopic staging of abdominal metastases in adenocarcinoma of the pancreas with MRI.55 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma had been screened and 49 entered the retrospective study. All patients had undergone MRI of the upper abdomen with concomitant MR-cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and diagnostic laparoscopy under conscious sedation. Patients without histologic proof of abdominal metastases underwent laparotomy.In 6/10 patients, metastases were correctly detected by laparoscopy, yielding a sensitivity of 60% and a specificity of 92%.MRI predicted metastases in 6/10 patients with 60% sensitivity and 100% specificity. Laparoscopy showed metastases in 3 patients that were missed by MRI, but failed to identify metastases in 3 of 6 patients with metastases on MRI. Though only one patient showed previously undetected metastases during laparotomy, 3 patients with abdominal metastases underwent unnecessary laparotomy due to a lack of histologic proof of malignancy.Whereas diagnostic laparoscopy is sensitive for the detection of small metastases and offers histologic verification, intrahepatic alterations are not detectable by sole visual inspection.MRI may compensate for this deficiency, but histologic proof of malignancy may be problematic. To date, no definite decision in favor of one of the presented procedures for the staging of abdominal metastases can be given.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in pancreatic and periampullary malignancies.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy before laparotomy in patients with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies remains controversial. We analyzed the value of using diagnostic laparoscopy to avoid laparotomy in these patients.Between November 1993 and December 1996, 254 patients with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were treated. In 74 patients, multiple distant metastases precluded further surgical treatment. In all, 180 patients underwent laparotomy for pancreatic cancer (119 patients) or periampullary cancer (61 patients). Preoperatively, all patients underwent computed tomography for staging and to assess resectability of the tumor. Based on the results of the imaging procedure, the patients were scheduled for either tumor resection or a palliative operation.Twenty-one of 180 patients (12%) with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were scheduled preoperatively for nonresectional operations because of distant metastasis or retroperitoneal tumor infiltration. In none of these patients was the operative strategy changed. In 159 of 180 patients (88%), a pancreatic resection was planned preoperatively; 119 patients underwent pancreatic resection. In the remaining 40 patients preoperatively scheduled for tumor resection, removal of the tumor was not possible. In 24, this resulted from tumor infiltration into the retropancreatic vessels, and in 16 it resulted from liver or peritoneal metastasis detected for the first time intraoperatively. These 16 patients (10%) could have benefited from diagnostic laparoscopy. Similar results were found in the subgroup of 119 patients with pancreatic cancer, of whom 102 were planned for tumor resection and 17 for palliative operation. Of the 102 patients planned preoperatively for tumor resection, 71 patients (70%) underwent pancreatic resection. In the remaining 31 patients scheduled for tumor resection, removal of the tumor was not possible: in 17 because of tumor infiltration into the retropancreatic vessels and in 14 because of liver or peritoneal metastasis detected for the first time intraoperatively. These 14 patients (14%) also would have benefited from laparoscopy.Preoperative computed tomography is a reliable technique to detect tumor metastasis in patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer. Unlike other investigators, we found that only 10% of patients with periampullary or pancreatic cancer and 14% of patients with pancreatic cancer might profit from laparoscopy. Because of this low number, laparoscopy cannot generally be recommended for patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer before laparotomy.Laparoscopic staging should be used routinely for locally extensive cancer of the pancreatic head.Computed tomography, endoscopic, laparoscopic, and intra-operative sonography for assessing resectability of pancreatic cancer.Pancreas cancer is the fourth leading cancer killer in adults. Cure of pancreas cancer is dependent on the complete surgical removal of localized tumor. A complete surgical resection is dependent on accurate preoperative and intra-operative imaging of tumor and its relationship to vital structures. Imaging of pancreatic tumors preoperatively and intra-operatively is achieved by pancreatic protocol computed tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS), and intra-operative ultrasound (IOUS). Multi-detector CT with three-dimensional (3-D) reconstruction of images is the most useful preoperative modality to assess resectability. It has a sensitivity and specificity of 90 and 99%, respectively. It is not observer dependent. The images predict operative findings. EUS and LUS have sensitivities of 77 and 78%, respectively. They both have a very high specificity. Further, EUS has the ability to biopsy tumor and obtain a definitive tissue diagnosis. IOUS is a very sensitive (93%) method to assess tumor resectability during surgery. It adds little time and no morbidity to the operation. It greatly facilitates the intra-operative decision-making. In reality, each of these methods adds some information to help in determining the extent of tumor and the surgeon's ability to remove it. We rely on pancreatic protocol CT with 3-D reconstruction and either EUS or IOUS depending on the tumor location and operability of the tumor and patient. With these modern imaging modalities, it is now possible to avoid major operations that only determine an inoperable tumor. With proper preoperative selection, surgery is able to remove tumor in the majority of patients.[Value of laparoscopic ultrasound for staging of gastrointestinal tumors].The objective of this study was to evaluate the impact of laparoscopic ultrasound on the staging of gastrointestinal tumors prospectively.Between 1993 and 2000 staging laparoscopy was performed on 668 patients with various neoplasms. Laparoscopy provided adequate information regarding resectability in 366 patients. Laparoscopic ultrasonography was performed in 302 patients (45%) using an intraoperative ultrasound unit (B & K) and a semiflexible ultrasound probe (5-7.5 MHz). The results of staging laparoscopy were compared to the preoperative staging and histopathology.Compared to preoperative staging laparoscopic ultrasound provided additional information of therapeutic relevance in 46 of 302 cases (15%). In a group of 384 patients with tumors of the upper gastrointestinal tract, laparoscopic ultrasound was performed in 186 cases and showed occult liver metastases, M1-lymph nodes, or nonresectable disease in 26 patients. Overall, this technique improved the staging of esophageal, gastric and pancreatic cancer in 12%, 3%, and 12% of the patients, respectively. Laparoscopic ultrasound proved to be most useful in esophageal and pancreatic cancer with a rate of 52% and 20% information additional to laparoscopy. The relative contribution of laparoscopic ultrasound to the staging of gastric cancer was only 10%.Laparoscopic ultrasound improves the diagnostic accuracy of staging laparoscopy. However, routine use of this technique is only justified, if neoadjuvant therapy--particularly in controlled trials--is considered in patients with advanced gastrointestinal cancer.[Place of celioscopy in the diagnosis of invasiveness of digestive cancers].The adequate treatment of gastrointestinal tract carcinoma requires accurate preoperative staging. Laparoscopy has been advocated for this purpose. We reviewed the data of 12 patients and the literature to compare the results of laparoscopic staging to those of conventional imaging (ultrasonography-CT scan). Laparoscopy was more sensitive in the diagnosis of peritoneal and lives metastases. It was inadequate for the diagnosis of lymph node metastases. Laparoscopy was especially useful in patients with esophagus, stomach, pancreas and liver cancers. Laparoscopic ultrasonography improved the staging of pancreatic carcinoma and the diagnosis of liver metastases.Staging laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography in more than 400 patients with upper gastrointestinal carcinoma.Resection offers the only chance of cure to patients with esophageal, gastroesophageal junction, and hepatopancreatobiliary tumors. Staging is essential to select patients who will benefit from operation because palliation can also be performed nonoperatively. Several studies, including limited numbers of patients, have shown that laparoscopic staging prevents unnecessary laparotomies, but it is doubtful whether general application of this staging method can be advised. The aim of this study was to assess the benefit of diagnostic laparoscopy for staging patients with esophageal, gastroesophageal junction, and hepatopancreatobiliary tumors.Between June 1992 and December 1996, 420 patients with a resectable tumor after conventional staging underwent diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography. Histologic proof of metastases or ingrowth was used to cancel laparotomy.Laparoscopic staging avoided laparotomy in 20% of patients (sensitivity 0.70): 5% with an esophageal tumor, 20% with a gastroesophageal junction tumor, 15% with a periampullary tumor, 40% with a proximal bile duct tumor, 35% with a liver tumor, and 40% with a pancreatic body or tail tumor. Complications and port-site metastases were seen in 4% and 2% of patients, respectively.Laparoscopic staging is a safe procedure with low morbidity and without mortality in this series. It has shown no benefit in esophageal cancer, but seems beneficial for staging tumors located at the gastroesophageal junction, proximal bile duct tumors, liver tumors, and pancreatic body and tail tumors. The value of laparoscopic staging for patients with periampullary tumors is not as great as stated in previous studies and is still the subject of investigation.Diagnosing and staging of pancreatic carcinoma-what is necessary?The aim of the present prospective observational study was to diagnose and stage pancreatic carcinoma with a minimum of diagnostic procedures. Our experiences in 307 patients with a histologically confirmed pancreatic carcinoma show that for diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma sonography and computed tomography are sufficient in 95% of the cases. The combination of both has a sensitivity equal to that of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP; 96.8 vs. 98.7%; n.s., chi2 test). ERCP is only indicated in cases with negative sonography and computed tomography, and suspicion of pancreatic cancer. For tumor staging, the routine performance of angiography cannot be recommended in view of the fact that although it provides greater sensitivity for the evaluation of an infiltration of the portal vein (80% for angiography vs. 22% for sonography or computed tomography), it is associated with a lower positive predictive value (56.4 vs. 68 and 72%) which results in a lower accuracy. Despite recent advantages in diagnostic technology, less than 50% of unresectable tumors were identified preoperatively at a 10% false-positive rate. The major reason for unresectability is infiltration into the mesenteric axis, which cannot be identified laparoscopically. Laparoscopy or percutaneous biopsy is recommended only in the presence of a tumor with suspicion of distant metastasis detected by radiological imaging and requiring histological confirmation. In conclusion, sonography and computed tomography as the only diagnostic images are sufficient for diagnosing and staging of pancreatic carcinoma in more than 95% of the patients. Only a small number of patients needs further diagnostic procedures.TNM staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer by laparoscopic ultrasonography.Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is an imaging modality that combines laparoscopy and ultrasonography. The purpose of this prospective blinded study was to evaluate the TNM stage and assessment of resectability by LUS in patients with pancreatic cancer.Of the 71 consecutive patients admitted to our department, 36 were excluded from the study, mainly due to evident signs of metastatic disease or another condition that would preclude surgery. Thus, a total of 35 patients were enrolled in the study. All patients underwent abdominal CT scan, ultrasonography, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), diagnostic laparoscopy, and LUS. Histopathologic examination was considered to be the final evaluation for LUS in all but three patients, where EUS was used as the reference.The accuracy of LUS in T staging was 29/33 (80%); in N staging it was 22/34 (76%); in M staging, it was 23/34 (68%); and in overall TNM staging, it was 23/34 (68%). In assessment of nonresectability, distant metastases, and lymph node metastases, the sensitivity was 0.86, 0.43 and 0.67, respectively, for LUS alone. Combining the information gleaned from laparoscopy and LUS, the accuracy in finding nonresectable tumors was 89%.Diagnostic laparoscopy with LUS is highly accurate in TNM staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer and should be considered an important modality in the assessment algorithm.[Comparison of laparoscopic, surgical and histological findings in the diagnosis of malignant pancreatic tumors].Ultrasound-guided fine needle biopsy and laparoscopy in the study of pancreatic masses: report on 136 cases.The authors report their experience from 136 fine needle ultrasound (FN-US)-guided biopsies and laparoscopies. The pancreatic diseases considered by these methods were as follows: 9 cases of Pancreatitis, 11 cases of Pancreatic cysts, 5 cases of endocrine cancer, 109 cases of Exocrine cancer and 2 not conclusive cases. Diagnostic accuracy of FNB and laparoscopy was evaluated for each group and, in particular, for cancer patients. In the latter group, FNB helped to detect abdominal diffusion in 25 cases (33%) while laparoscopy, including laparoscopic washing, revealed a micro-diffusion in 31 cases (55%), the latter not shown previously by CT, RNM and US. The combination of these methods allows us to confirm the advanced stage of the majority of pancreatic cancers at onset. Furthermore, this seems to be a very reliable method to select resectable patients, thus avoiding useless, sometimes hazardous and expensive further investigation.Role of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in staging of pancreatic tumours.Radiological imaging alone is not reliable enough in staging of pancreatic cancer. Not only because of poor sensitivity but also because there is a tendency to overstage tumours. The aim of the study was to compare the efficiency of spiral computed tomography (CT), transabdominal ultrasound (US), laparoscopy (LAP) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) in staging of pancreatic tumours.In this prospective study 27 patients underwent pancreatic tumour staging with CT, US, LAP and LUS. The reference standard was operative evaluation or in case of disseminated disease laparoscopic assessment.Although LAP was hindered by adhesions in 11% of the patients the benefit of LAP staging was evident in detecting peritoneal carcinomatosis. The assessment of the local tumour expansion of a pancreatic carcinoma was difficult for all staging modalities. LUS did not change the decision whether to proceed with laparotomy once. In our experience routine use of laparoscopic staging does not benefit patients with pancreatic tumour but in selected cases it may prevent unnecessary laparotomy.Does multidetector-row CT eliminate the role of diagnostic laparoscopy in assessing the resectability of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma?We hypothesized that the high-quality images from multidetector-row computed tomography (MDCT) would lead to improved sensitivity and specificity for predicting resectable pancreatic head adenocarcinoma, thus diminishing the value of staging laparoscopy.Forty four consecutive patients underwent thin-section dual-phase MDCT to stage their tumor, followed by an attempted pancreaticoduodenectomy. Four radiologists who were blinded to the operative outcome reviewed the scans and graded the presence of distant and nodal metastases, as well as the degree of arterial and portal involvement. The radiologic criteria for resectability were no distant metastasis, a patent portal vein, and < 50% arterial involvement.The overall resectability for this cohort was 52% (23/44). The 21 unresectable cases, included five liver metastases, three peritoneal metastases, and 13 locally invasive tumors. The negative margin resection rate was 34% (15/44). There were no portal vein resections. The sensitivity and specificity of MDCT for predicting resectability were 96% (22/23) and 33% (7/21), respectively. In this cohort, the positive and negative predictive values were 61% (22/36) and 87.5% (7/8), respectively. As determined by univariate logistic regression, only the degree of arterial involvement was a significant predictor of resectability (p = 0.02). As determined by multivariate logistic regression using both arterial and portal involvement, arterial involvement was predictive (p = 0.03) but portal vein involvement was not (p = 0.45).Despite the improvements in image quality obtained with multidetector-row technology, CT imaging remains a relatively nonspecific test for predicting resectability in patients with adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas. Minimally invasive modalities with higher specificity, particularly laparoscopy, continue to have an important role in staging pancreatic head adenocarcinoma.Experience with laparoscopic ultrasonography for defining tumour resectability in carcinoma of the pancreatic head and periampullary region.Computed tomography (CT) is currently the most widely available staging investigation for pancreatic tumours. However, the accuracy of CT for determining tumour resectability is variable and can be poor. Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is potentially a more accurate method for disease staging. The authors' experience of LUS for staging carcinoma of the pancreatic head and periampullary region is described.Fifty-one patients with potentially resectable pancreatic tumours defined at CT underwent further investigation with LUS. Twenty-seven patients subsequently had an open laparotomy. The evaluations of tumour resectability at CT and LUS were compared with the operative findings.At LUS, 24 patients were considered to have resectable tumours, 21 non-resectable tumours and six patients were shown to have no pancreatic tumour mass. Twenty-two patients deemed to have a resectable tumour at LUS underwent surgery. Twenty patients were confirmed to have resectable disease and two patients had non-resectable disease. A further five patients underwent surgery. In all five the ultrasonographic diagnosis was confirmed at surgery (four patients with non-resectable disease and no pancreatic tumour in one patient). LUS prevented unnecessary extensive surgery in 53 per cent of patients. For the 22 patients who underwent surgery for potentially resectable disease, the positive predictive value of LUS for defining tumour resectability was 91 per cent.LUS is an accurate additional investigation for defining tumour resectability and directing management in patients with potentially resectable carcinoma of the pancreatic head or periampullary region.Impact of laparoscopic staging in the treatment of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer identifies unsuspected metastases, allows treatment selection, and helps predict survival.Inception cohort.Tertiary referral center.A total of 125 consecutive patients with radiographic stage II to III pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma who underwent staging laparoscopy with peritoneal cytologic examination between July 1994 and November 1998. Seventy-eight proximal tumors and 47 distal tumors were localized.Based on the findings of spiral computed tomography (CT) and laparoscopy, patients were stratified into 3 groups. Group 1 patients had unsuspected metastases found at laparoscopy and were palliatedwithout further operation. Group 2 patients had no demonstrable metastases, but CT indicated unresectability due to vessel invasion. This group underwent external beam radiation with fluorouracil chemotherapy followed in selected cases by intraoperative radiation. Patients in group 3 had no metastases or definitive vessel invasion and were resection candidates.Survival.Staging laparoscopy revealed unsuspected metastases in 39 patients (31.2%), with 9 having positive cytologic test results as the only evidence of metastatic disease (group 1). Fifty-five patients (44.0%) had localized but unresectable carcinoma (group 2), of whom 2 (3.6%) did not tolerate treatment, 20 (36.4%) developed metastatic disease during treatment, and 21 (38.2%) received intraoperative radiation. Of 31 patients with potentially resectable tumors (group 3), resection for cure was performed in 23 (resectability rate, 74.2%). Median survival was 7.5 months for patients with metastatic disease, 10.5 months for those receiving chemoradiation, and 14.5 months for those who underwent tumor resection (P = .01 for group 2 vs. group 1; P<.001 for group 3 vs group 1).Staging laparoscopy, combined with spiral CT, allowed stratification of patients into 3 treatment groups that correlated with treatment opportunity and subsequent survival. Among the 125 patients, laparoscopy obviated 39 unnecessary operations and irradiation in patients with metastatic disease not detectable by CT. Laparoscopic staging can help focus aggressive treatment on patients with pancreatic cancer who might benefit.Preoperative staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer.To study the accuracy of preoperative staging techniques for assessing resectability of pancreatic and ampullary adenocarcinoma, we entered 88 consecutive candidates into a prospective study of contrast-enhanced computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, angiography, and laparoscopy. Resectability was proved in 16 (29%) of 55 patients for the head of the pancreas, 1 (6%) of 17 for the body and tail of the pancreas, and 14 (88%) of 16 for the ampulla. The combined findings of computed tomography and angiography showed that more than 87% of pancreatic head tumors were unresectable because of vascular encasement, but neither modality sufficed alone. Small liver and peritoneal metastases were found in 15 (27%) of 55 cancers of the head of the pancreas, 11 (65%) of 17 cancers of the body and tail of the pancreas, and 1 (6%) of 16 cancers of the ampulla; computed tomography missed all but 2 of these instances of metastasis, but laparoscopy with biopsy identified 22 (96%) of 23 instances. Magnetic resonance imaging findings did not differ significantly from computed tomography and conferred no added benefit. Ninety percent of unresectable tumors were identified. Seventy-eight percent of pancreatic head cancers were resectable when all test results were negative vs 5% (2/37) when any test result was positive. This study demonstrates that accurate and efficient triage is possible for patients with cancer of the pancreas and ampulla.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in the evaluation of pancreatic and periampullary tumours.The pre-operative determination of resectability of pancreatic and peri-ampullary neoplasia assists the selection of patients for surgical or non-surgical treatment. This study investigated whether the addition of laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound to dual-phase helical CT could improve the accuracy of assessment of resectability.Prospective study of 305 patients referred to a single unit for consideration of pancreatic resection who underwent dual-phase helical CT scanning +/- laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound. Data were collected on patient demographics, CT findings, assessment of operability, laparoscopic assessment (LA), surgical procedures and histology.LA was undertaken in 239/305 patients, 190 of whom were considered CT resectable, and 49 CT unresectable. Of the 190 CT resectable patients, LA correctly identified unresectability in 28 (15%: metastases in 15; vascular encasement in 6; anaesthesia for laparoscopy found 7 unfit for major resection) and incorrectly in 2 (vascular encasement), but did not identify unresectability in 33; LA correctly confirmed resectability in the remainder (prediction improved, chi(2) = 9.73, p < 0.01). Of the 49 CT unresectable patients, LA correctly identified resectability in 4, and incorrectly in 12, and correctly identified unresectability in the remaining 33. Sixty-six of the 305 patients did not undergo LA, of whom 23 underwent resection.When added to dual-phase helical CT, laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound provides valuable information that significantly improves the selection of patients for surgical or non-surgical treatment.Laparoscopy is still necessary in the assessment of peri-ampullary neoplasia.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography for staging pancreatic cancer: critical appraisal.A pilot study was designed to elucidate the role of staging laparoscopy for determining resectability in patients with pancreatic cancer. The additional value of laparoscopic contact ultrasonography (LCU) was also evaluated with specific regard to its ability to detect hepatic metastases and assess vascular infiltration of the portomesenteric trunk. A consecutive sample of 50 patients referred for operation of a suspected pancreatic cancer were submitted to preoperative contrast-enhanced high-resolution computed tomography (CT) and staging laparoscopy combined with LCU at a university hospital. For those progressing to exploratory laparotomy, the intraoperative findings relating to tumor diffusion and vascular infiltration were compared to CT, laparoscopic, and LCU data. Analytical description of the laparoscopic findings is given. Row data of predicted versus observed vascular infiltration were tabulated for CT and LCU. The sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy of each diagnostic test were calculated for comparative analysis. Laparoscopy alone prevented unnecessary laparotomy in 20% of cases. A complete procedure could not be achieved in 28% of patients. Three false-negative staging results occurred. LCU identified small (benign) hepatic nodules not seen by CT in 8% of patients. Sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy for assessing vascular infiltration were 82%, 53%, and 69% for CT and 94%, 80%, and 87% for LCU. Laparoscopy was confirmed to be safe and effective for staging pancreatic cancer. Because of its unique capabilities to detect even small peritoneal tumor deposits a quick exploration immediately before laparotomy is advised in all patients. The additional benefit of a more extensive procedure is not supported by our results. Although LCU appears to define the vascular involvement more accurately than conventional CT, the limitation of getting clinically useful ultrasound data in all the patients suggests its adoption in only a selected population.Laparoscopic ultrasound enhances diagnostic laparoscopy in the staging of intra-abdominal neoplasms.Routine laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) for staging intra-abdominal malignancies remains controversial. Thus, we undertook a prospective study to assess the value of preoperative laparoscopy with LUS for patients with intra-abdominal tumors judged resectable by preoperative studies. Laparoscopy was successfully performed in 76 of 77 patients, and 60 underwent LUS. Of 33 patients with presumed pancreatic cancer, laparoscopic findings changed the operative management of 11 patients, and LUS altered the management of an additional 6 patients. Laparotomy was avoided in 9 patients (27%). Among 14 patients with hepatobiliary tumors, laparotomy was avoided in 9 patients in whom laparoscopy and/or LUS revealed either benign or advanced disease. Operative management was altered in 4 of 18 patients with gastric or esophageal cancer by laparoscopic findings. LUS did not add to the management of these patients. Of 12 patients with presumed intra-abdominal lymphoma, 9 were diagnosed with lymphoma and 3 with benign disease, without laparotomy in all but 1 case. Laparoscopy and LUS are valuable tools for evaluating the resectability of pancreatic and hepatobiliary tumors. Laparoscopy, and to a lesser degree LUS, greatly facilitates diagnosing patients with intra-abdominal lymphomas and spares an occasional patient with esophagogastric carcinoma from undergoing laparotomy.Utility of staging laparoscopy in subsets of peripancreatic and biliary malignancies.To determine the relative benefit of staging laparoscopy in peripancreatic and biliary malignancies.Staging laparoscopy has been used in a variety of peripancreatic and biliary malignancies. The utility of the technique in subsets of these types of cancer has not been systematically compared.One hundred fifty-seven patients underwent laparoscopy after conventional tumor staging; 89 were also staged with laparoscopic ultrasonography. Diagnostic categories were cancer of the pancreatic head and uncinate process, cancer of the body and tail of pancreas, cancer of the extrahepatic bile duct, cancer of the gallbladder, and cancer of the ampulla of Vater/duodenum.In patients with cancer of the head of the pancreas, metastatic disease or vascular invasion was discovered frequently by laparoscopy (31%), whereas in ampullary/duodenal cancer it was never found. The laparoscopic findings in cancer of the head of the pancreas had an important influence on treatment decisions, whereas in cancer of the ampulla/duodenum, laparoscopy had no effect on clinical decisions. Laparoscopy also substantially influenced the treatment of gallbladder cancer; in other tumor types, results were intermediate. Laparoscopic ultrasonography was valuable in cancer of the head of the pancreas.The utility of staging laparoscopy depends on diagnosis. It is recommended for continued use in pancreatic head and gallbladder cancers but not in ampullary malignancies.Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography: optimizing resectability in hepatobiliary and pancreatic malignancy.Open laparotomy has traditionally been required to stage hepatobiliary and pancreatic (HBP) cancers accurately. For unresectable patients, costs and morbidity have been high. Today, laparoscopy alone or combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is being examined for its value in defining the extent of malignancy.We have analyzed the effect of routine implementation of this new staging technique in our HBP center. Staging laparoscopy (SL) with LUS was performed in 50 consecutive patients with HBP malignancies. All patients were considered to have resectable tumors as determined by traditional preoperative staging modalities. Primary tumors were located in the liver (n = 7), biliary tract (n = 11), or pancreas (n = 32). An average of 2.7 preoperative studies per patient were performed prior to SL-LUS.Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography predicted resectable tumors in 28 patients (56%). At laparotomy, 26 of 28 were actually resectable: the false-negative rate was 4%. Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography indicated unresectability in 22 patients (44%). Staging laparoscopy alone demonstrated previously unrecognized occult metastases in 11 patients (22%). In 11 other patients (22%) in whom SL alone was negative, LUS established unresectability from vascular invasion (n = 5), lymph node metastases (n = 5), or intraparenchymal hepatic tumor (n = 1). All cases of unresectability due to vascular invasion were validated by laparotomy. Five of six lymph node or hepatic metastases were proved histologically by LUS-guided needle biopsy rather than laparotomy.Unnecessary laparotomy can be safely avoided by SL-LUS in many patients with HPB malignancies, reducing costs and morbidity.Evolving preoperative evaluation of patients with pancreatic cancer: does laparoscopy have a role in the current era?Recent years have brought important developments in preoperative imaging and use of laparoscopic staging of patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma (PAC). There are few data about the optimal combination of preoperative studies to accurately identify resectable patients.We conducted a statewide review of all patients with surgically managed PAC from 1996 to 2003 using data from the Oregon State Cancer Registry, augmented with clinical information from primary medical record review. We documented the use of all staging modalities, including CT, endoscopic ultrasonography, and laparoscopy. Primary outcomes included resection with curative intent. The association between staging modalities, clinical features, and resection was measured using a multivariate logistic regression model.There were 298 patients from 24 hospitals who met the eligibility criteria. Patients were staged using a combination of CT (98%), laparoscopy (29%), and endoscopic ultrasonography (32%). The overall proportion of patients who went to surgical exploration and were resected was 87%. Of patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy, metastatic disease that precluded resection was discovered in 24 (27.6%). For patients who underwent diagnostic laparoscopy and were not resected, vascular invasion was the most common determinant of unresectability (56.6%). In multivariate analysis, preoperative weight loss and surgeon decision to use laparoscopy predicted unresectability at laparotomy.This population-based study demonstrates that surgeons appear to use laparoscopy in a subset of patients at high risk for metastatic disease. The combination of current staging techniques is associated with a high proportion of resectability for patients taken to surgical exploration. With current imaging modalities, selective application of laparoscopy with a dual-phase CT scan as the cornerstone of staging is a sound clinical approach to evaluate pancreatic cancer patients for potential resectability.Preoperative CA 19-9 and the yield of staging laparoscopy in patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Staging laparoscopy for patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma has been reported to yield an 8-15% finding of unresectable disease. Factors associated with the likelihood of subradiographic unresectable disease have not been clearly defined.A prospectively maintained pancreatic database was reviewed and patients were identified who underwent staging laparoscopy for radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 2000 and December 2006. Preoperative carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA 19-9) values were assessed for their association with the presence of subradiographic unresectable disease.Four hundred ninety-one patients underwent staging laparoscopy. Resection was performed in 80% (n = 395). Of the 96 patients with unresectable disease, 75 (78%) had metastases either in the liver (n = 60) or peritoneum (n = 15). Preoperative CA 19-9 values were available for 262 of the 491 patients. Fifty-one of these patients had unresectable disease, of which 78% were due to distant disease. The median preoperative CA 19-9 value for patients who underwent resection was 131 U/ml versus 379 U/ml for those patients with unresectable disease (P = 0.003). A receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve was developed for preoperative CA 19-9 value and tumor resectability. The statistically optimal cutoff value was determined to be 130 U/ml. Unresectable disease was identified in 38 of the 144 patients (26.4%) with a preoperative CA 19-9 >or= 130 U/ml, and in 13 of the 118 patients (11%) with a CA 19-9 < 130 U/ml (P = 0.003). CA 19-9 values greater than 130 U/ml remained a predictor of tumor unresectability on multivariate regression analysis [hazard ratio (HR) 2.70, 95% confidence interval (CI) 1.34-5.44; P = 0.005].In this study, preoperative CA 19-9 values were strongly associated with the identification of subradiographic unresectable disease. Preoperative CA 19-9 values may allow surgeons to better select patients for staging laparoscopy.Preoperative prediction of complete resection in pancreatic cancer.Accurate preoperative staging is essential in pancreatic cancer to select the 15% of patients who can benefit from surgery and avoid surgery in the 85% with advanced disease. With improvements in computed tomography (CT) scanning, the value of routine laparoscopy for preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer has been questioned because it changes the preoperative plan in less than 20% of unselected cases.We retrospectively reviewed our experience with preoperative staging in 88 consecutive patients with pancreatic cancer. All patients had preoperative CT scans, and selective criteria were used to determine which patients would also undergo preoperative staging laparoscopy. Patients were categorized preoperatively as resectable or not resectable (locally advanced or metastatic). Medical records, operative, and pathology reports were reviewed to determine the accuracy of preoperative predictions.Thirty patients were deemed resectable based on CT alone and 27 (90%) were resected (25 R0, 2 R1). Two (7%) had metastatic disease discovered at laparotomy and one (3%) had a R2 resection. Only 19 patients (39%) of 49 patients deemed resectable by CT met our selective criteria for preoperative staging laparoscopy. Laparoscopy changed the treatment plan in 11 (58%) of these patients. Eight were still deemed resectable after staging laparoscopy and 7 (88%) were resected (6 R0, 1 R1). One patient (12%) had metastatic disease diagnosed at laparotomy. If selective staging laparoscopy were eliminated from our algorithm, 49 patients would have been deemed potentially resectable based on CT alone, 34 (69%) would have been found to be resectable at laparotomy (31 R0, 3 R1), and 15 (31%) would have been found to be unresectable at laparotomy (positive predictive value of 69%). The addition of selective staging laparoscopy avoided unnecessary laparotomy in 11 patients and increased the positive predictive value to (34/38) 89%.Selective use of laparoscopy increases the positive predictive value of preoperative staging in pancreatic cancer and avoids unnecessary laparoscopy in the majority of patients.Diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with potentially resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma: is it cost-effective in the current era?For patients with potentially resectable pancreatic cancer, diagnostic laparoscopy may identify liver and peritoneal metastases that are difficult to detect with other staging modalities. The aim of this study was to utilize a population-based pancreatic cancer database to assess the cost effectiveness of preoperative laparoscopy.Data from a state cancer registry were linked with primary medical record data for years 1996-2003. De-identified patient records were reviewed to determine the role and findings of laparoscopic exploration. Average hospital and physician charges for laparotomy, biliary bypass, pancreaticoduodenectomy, and laparoscopy were determined by review of billing data from our institution and Medicare data for fiscal years 2005-2006. Cost-effectiveness was determined by comparing three methods of utilization of laparoscopy: (1) routine (all patients), (2) case-specific, and (3) no utilization.Of 298 potentially resectable patients, 86 underwent laparoscopy. The prevalence of unresectable disease was 14.1% diagnosed at either laparotomy or laparoscopy. The mean charge per patient for routine, case-specific, and no utilization of laparoscopy was $91,805, $90,888, and $93,134, respectively.Cost analysis indicates that the case-specific or routine use of laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer does not add significantly to the overall expense of treatment and supports the use of laparoscopy in patients with known or suspected pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Combined endoscopic and laparoscopic ultrasound as preoperative assessment of patients with pancreatic cancer.An accurate pre-therapeutic assessment of the resectability in pancreatic cancer patients is essential to reduce the number of futile surgical explorations. The aim of this study was to assess the combination of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) regarding the detection of patients with non-resectable tumours.From 2002 to 2004, 179 consecutive patients with pancreatic cancer referred for surgical treatment were eligible. Thirty-one (17%) patients were excluded due to co-morbidity and poor performance status. Two patients (1%) were excluded due to metastasis seen on CT scans prior to referral. Thus, 146 patients entered the study. Patients were first examined with EUS followed by LUS, if EUS found no signs of non-resectability. Only patients with tumours found to be resectable or possibly resectable at EUS and LUS were offered surgical treatment. Resectability criteria were defined prior to the study.In all, 108 (74%) patients had non-resectable tumours by the pre-defined criteria. EUS identified 68 (63%) patients and LUS identified an additional 26 (24%) patients. Thus, a total of 94 (87%) patients were non-resectable at either EUS or LUS. Fifty-two (36%) patients underwent surgery. Six patients had surgical exploration and three patients had palliative surgery. Forty-three patients (29%) were resected with curative intention, of whom 38 (88%) had an R0 resection and 5 (12%) had a palliative resection.The combination of EUS and LUS is accurate in identifying the non-resectable patients and has a high predictive value for complete resection.Current utility of staging laparoscopy for pancreatic and peripancreatic neoplasms.The routine use of staging laparoscopy in patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic and peripancreatic neoplasms remains controversial.We reviewed a prospective database that identified 1,045 patients who underwent staging laparoscopy for radiographically resectable pancreatic or peripancreatic tumors between 1995 and 2005. Radiographic resectability was determined by review of radiographic reports, surgeons' notes, and cross-sectional imaging studies. Factors were assessed for their association with the laparoscopic identification of radiographically occult unresectable disease. Recursive partitioning was used to build a decision tree, with laparoscopic identification of unresectable disease as the outcomes, including only patients since 1999 (modern imaging) and factors available preoperatively.Unresectable disease was identified laparoscopically in 145 of the 1,045 radiographically resectable patients (14%). Factors associated with radiographically occult unresectable disease included the time period of the study, whether imaging was performed at our institution (internal versus external imaging), primary site, histology, weight loss, and jaundice. Primary site (pancreatic versus nonpancreatic) was identified as the strongest predictor of yield. In patients with nonpancreatic tumors, the yield of laparoscopy was 4%. In patients with pancreatic tumors, the yield of laparoscopy was 14% overall, but was 8.4% in patients with internal imaging versus 17% in patients with external imaging (p < 0.01). This higher-risk subgroup was partitioned by the presence of weight loss, then by primary site within the pancreas.During the time period of this study, the yield of staging laparoscopy decreased and exceeded 10% only for patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. When high-quality cross-sectional imaging reveals no evidence of unresectable disease, routine staging laparoscopy may not be warranted for pancreatic or peripancreatic tumors other than presumed pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Assessment of pancreatic malignancy with laparoscopy and intraoperative ultrasound.Staging laparoscopy for pancreatic malignancy is controversial. This study aimed to assess the efficacy of laparoscopy with intraoperative ultrasound in the management of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.The study involved patients undergoing laparoscopy and intraoperative ultrasound over a period of 42 months. The entry criteria specified radiologic (computed tomography) diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma and no evidence of metastases.The study enrolled 100 patients (52 men and 48 women) ages 21 to 83 years (mean, 63 years). On the basis of imaging, 75 patients had lesions judged to be operable, and 25 patients had a pancreatic head lesion larger than 4 cm radiologically, considered to be unresectable, but with no evidence of metastatic disease. At laparoscopy, three patients had a normal examination, with no evidence of a pancreatic mass, and an additional seven patients had other pathology including one lymphoma, one ampullary tumor, two cases of chronic pancreatitis, and three sarcomas. Of the patients with radiologically inoperable disease, 16% had previously undetected metastases, but 24% were judged to be suitable for curative resection. Half of these patients underwent successful resection. Of the patients with radiologically operable disease, undetected liver or peritoneal metastases were found in 20% of the body or tail lesions and in 26% of the pancreatic head lesions. Of the pancreatic head tumors, 12% were found to be larger than 4 cm and therefore unsuitable for curative resection. Consequently, only 53% were confirmed to be suitable for resection. Of the patients explored with a view to curative resection, 42% actually underwent resection, with clearance of resection margins achieved in 77.8%.Of the patients thought to have a resectable tumor on the basis of good quality preoperative imaging, 44% had their management approach altered after laparoscopy and avoided an open procedure. Laparoscopy should therefore be used in the preoperative staging of pancreatic tumors.The influence of positive peritoneal cytology on survival in patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The American Joint Committee on Cancer (AJCC) staging system for pancreatic adenocarcinoma classifies positive peritoneal cytology as stage IV disease. Data are limited with respect to the prevalence of positive peritoneal cytology and its influence on survival in patients with resectable, locally advanced, and metastatic disease. Four hundred sixty-two patients underwent staging laparoscopy for pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 1995 and December 2005. Kaplan-Meier survival comparisons were performed to evaluate the significance of positive peritoneal cytology on overall survival (OS) in resected patients and patients with locally advanced and metastatic disease. Of the 462 patients, 47% (217/462) underwent a pancreatic resection. The 21% (95/462) with locally advanced disease and 32% (150/462) with metastatic disease did not undergo resection. Peritoneal cytology was positive in 17% (77/462), and was associated with stage of disease (metastatic, 37%; locally advanced, 11%; resected, 5%; P=0.01). Positive cytology was not associated with OS in patients with metastatic disease or locally advanced disease, but was in resected patients (median, 16 months vs. 8 months; P<0.001). Node-positive disease was present in 8 of 10 patients resected with positive cytology (2 years OS, 12% positive cytology vs. 23% negative; P=0.006). In this study, patients who underwent resection in the presence of positive peritoneal cytology and absence of other identifiable metastatic disease had a similar survival as other patients with stage IV disease.Patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma benefit from staging laparoscopy.Unnecessary laparotomy in patients with advanced pancreatic cancer may both compromise the quality of life and delay the initiation of more appropriate therapy. Very often, peritoneal small liver metastases and true local status cannot be fully determined without surgery. Laparoscopy may spare laparotomy and decrease morbidity for patients with nonresectable advanced disease. The aim of this study was to determine the impact of laparoscopy in patients with potentially resectable adenocarcinoma of the pancreas.We reviewed the records of patients undergoing pancreatic surgery at the University of Nebraska Medical Center from October 2001 to April 2005. A total of 59 patients were included in the study. All patients were staged radiographically with a high resolution helical computed tomography scan and their tumors were considered resectable. Thirty-seven patients underwent staging laparoscopy while 22 proceeded directly to laparotomy.Of the 37 patients who underwent laparoscopic staging, 9 (24.3%) were detected to have metastatic disease or advanced tumor; the remaining 28 (75.7%) patients with negative laparoscopy proceeded to laparotomy. Of those, 24 patients (85.7%) underwent pancreatic resection with curative intent, while 4 patients had metastatic or locally advanced disease at subsequent laparotomy which was missed on staging laparoscopy (false negative rate of 14.3%). Of the 22 patients who proceeded directly to laparotomy, 16 (72.7%) received curative Whipple resection and 6 (27.3%) were found to have advanced disease and received bypass procedures or biopsy alone.These findings suggest that staging laparoscopy is beneficial in a significant proportion of patients deemed resectable by routine noninvasive preoperative studies. We plan to add intraoperative laparoscopic ultrasound to our staging protocol in order to decrease the false negative rate.The role of laparoscopy in pancreatic surgery.Carcinoma of the pancreas is extremely common, with a five-year mortality rate of about 95-99%. Radical surgery requires good technical skill and can cause complications and operative mortality, but should be avoided in patients with extrapancreatic involvement. Advances in dynamic spiral CT-scan have decreased the number of unnecessary laparotomies. VLS is indicated in cases of pancreatic mass deemed resectable or "doubtful" by CT-scan. Direct laparoscopic visualization can be combined with intraoperative laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS), which has shown a positive predictive value of resectability of 91%. Laparoscopic pancreatoduodenectomy (LPD) shows a high rate of complications and should be performed by very well-trained surgeons. Laparoscopic distal pancreatectomy (LDP) with an "en bloc" splenectomy and spleen preservation should be performed.Refining the role of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in the staging of presumed pancreatic head and ampullary tumours.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound have been validated previously as staging tools for pancreatic cancer. The aim of this study was to identify if assessment of vascular involvement with abdominal computed tomography (CT) would allow refinement of the selection criteria for laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). The details of patients staged with LUS and abdominal CT were obtained from the unit's pancreatic cancer database. A CT grade (O, A-F) of vascular involvement was recorded by a single radiologist. Of 152 patients, who underwent a LUS, 56 (37%) had unresectable disease. Three of 26 (12%) patients with CT grade O, 27 of 88 (31%) patients with CT grade A to D, 17 of 29 (59%) patients with CT grade E and all nine patients with CT grade F were found to have unresectable disease. In all, 24% of patients with tumours <3 cm were found to have unresectable disease. In those patients with tumours considered unresectable, local vascular involvement was found in 56% of patients and vascular involvement with metastatic disease in 17%, while 20% of patients had liver metastases alone and 5% had isolated peritoneal metastases. The remaining patient was deemed unfit for resection. Selective use of laparoscopic ultrasound is indicated in the staging of periampullary tumours with CT grades A to D.CA 19-9 levels predict results of staging laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer.Laparoscopy has emerged as an important staging procedure for determining resectability of pancreatic cancer. However, a small fraction of patients with pancreatic cancer benefit from its use and therefore the routine application of laparoscopy remains controversial. We hypothesized that serum CA 19-9 levels may identify patients who will or will not benefit by laparoscopy. We retrospectively reviewed our database of 63 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma who underwent staging laparoscopy and correlated findings with CA 19-9 levels. Overall, laparoscopy identified metastatic disease in 12 patients (19%). None of those required any further operation. The resectability rate (patients who underwent resection after laparoscopy) was 73.5%. There was one false-negative laparoscopy (1.6%). Patients with higher CA 19-9 levels had significant higher odds of having metastasis identified by laparoscopy (odds ratio, 1.83; 95% confidence interval, 1.03-3.24; P = .04). There was no patient with CA 19-9 levels below 100 U/ml in whom metastatic disease was identified during laparoscopy: 18 patients (28.6%) with CA 19-9 levels below this cutoff point had negative laparoscopy and could have avoided the procedure had this cutoff been used for screening. This would have increased the laparoscopy yield to 26.7%. In patients with adenocarcinoma of the pancreas, low CA 19-9 levels predict low probability of metastatic disease; in those patients, laparoscopy can be spared. On the contrary, patients with elevated CA 19-9 have an increased probability of metastatic disease, and these patients may benefit from diagnostic laparoscopy.Value of laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic cancer is a devastating disease that swiftly robs patients of both quality and quantity of life. It is the fourth leading cause of cancer death in the United States. In 2003, there were 31,860 reported new cases with 31,270 deaths occurring due to lack of effective therapy. Eighty percent of patients present with either advanced local or metastatic disease. Dynamic contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) has become the current staging test of choice. Laparoscopic staging of pancreatic tumors with the addition of ultrasound can reveal intraparenchymal hepatic metastases, small peritoneal metastases, and critical retroperitoneal tumor-vessel relationships approaching the accuracy of open exploration to determine resectability without significantly increasing morbidity or mortality. However, given the current accuracy of high-quality CT, the routine use of diagnostic laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer is not warranted. Diagnostic laparoscopy is recommended in select patients with primary tumors greater than 4 cm, tumors in the body or tail of the pancreas, patients with equivocal findings of metastasis on CT, ascites, or clinical or laboratory findings suggesting advanced disease such as marked weight loss, hypoalbuminemia, and elevated CA 19-9.Computed tomography, endoscopic, laparoscopic, and intra-operative sonography for assessing resectability of pancreatic cancer.Pancreas cancer is the fourth leading cancer killer in adults. Cure of pancreas cancer is dependent on the complete surgical removal of localized tumor. A complete surgical resection is dependent on accurate preoperative and intra-operative imaging of tumor and its relationship to vital structures. Imaging of pancreatic tumors preoperatively and intra-operatively is achieved by pancreatic protocol computed tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS), and intra-operative ultrasound (IOUS). Multi-detector CT with three-dimensional (3-D) reconstruction of images is the most useful preoperative modality to assess resectability. It has a sensitivity and specificity of 90 and 99%, respectively. It is not observer dependent. The images predict operative findings. EUS and LUS have sensitivities of 77 and 78%, respectively. They both have a very high specificity. Further, EUS has the ability to biopsy tumor and obtain a definitive tissue diagnosis. IOUS is a very sensitive (93%) method to assess tumor resectability during surgery. It adds little time and no morbidity to the operation. It greatly facilitates the intra-operative decision-making. In reality, each of these methods adds some information to help in determining the extent of tumor and the surgeon's ability to remove it. We rely on pancreatic protocol CT with 3-D reconstruction and either EUS or IOUS depending on the tumor location and operability of the tumor and patient. With these modern imaging modalities, it is now possible to avoid major operations that only determine an inoperable tumor. With proper preoperative selection, surgery is able to remove tumor in the majority of patients.Preoperative assessment of pancreatic tumors using magnetic resonance imaging, endoscopic ultrasonography, positron emission tomography and laparoscopy.The appropriate preoperative evaluation of a pancreatic tumor remains a matter of debate.We retrospectively evaluated an institutional strategy including magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), positron emission tomography (PET) and laparoscopy (LAP) for detection and staging of pancreatic tumors suspected to be malignant.In a consecutive series of 59 patients screened by MRI, PET, EUS and LAP between July 1998 and November 2002, 48 patients were found to bear pancreatic adenocarcinoma and surgery was performed in 27 of them. For tumor detection, the sensitivity of EUS was superior to MRI and PET (98 vs. 87.5 and 87.5%, respectively, p = 0.13). MRI best assessed loco-regional staging, i.e. arterial involvement. For the detection of distant metastases, the sensitivity of all preoperative examinations taken separately was low. When laparotomy was performed with a curative intent according to all four examinations, occult metastasis or carcinomatosis was discovered in 7/27 patients and the overall predictive value of resectability was thus 74%. Five-year and median survival were significantly better in resected vs. non-resected patients (39% and 26 months vs. 0% and 8 months, p = 0.0006).MRI can be recommended has the first examination in patients bearing pancreatic tumors, complemented by EUS if the findings of MRI are non-conclusive. For detection of distant metastasis, only the combination of all preoperative examination was proved to be more accurate than a single technique.The prognostic effect of clinical staging in pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The importance of pancreatic cancer staging is uncertain. The aim of this report was to evaluate the accuracy of combined standard imaging techniques in predicting the pathologic stage and to evaluate the prognostic effect of clinical staging to identify patient groups in which laparoscopy and laparotomy could be beneficial.Fifty-four patients were included in this analysis. The techniques used for clinical staging were endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, abdominal computed tomographic scan, and ultrasonography. All patients underwent both clinical and surgical/pathologic staging. A comparison was performed between presurgical stage and surgical/pathologic stage. The prognostic effect of different factors on survival was evaluated with both univariate (log-rank) and multivariate (Cox) analysis.Sensitivity and specificity for vascular involvement were 73.9% and 96.3%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity for nodal involvement were 63.6% and 95.4%, respectively. A total of 33.3% of patients showed a higher than expected pathologic stage, and 3.7% showed a lower than expected pathologic stage, by comparing clinical and pathologic evaluation. A highly significant correlation was observed between clinical T stage (P = .0067) and tumor diameter (P = .0037) and patient survival. Maximal prognostic differentiation was observed by dividing patients into two groups based on imaging results: group A (favorable prognosis) and group B (unfavorable prognosis). The median survival was 25.1 and 8.0 months for group A and B, respectively. Five-year survival was 20.1% and 0%, respectively (multivariate analysis: P = .0007).Integrated standard imaging studies achieved reasonable diagnostic accuracy in our analysis. A single classification based on clinical stage and tumor diameter evaluated by imaging predicts prognosis in patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Diagnostic laparoscopy in staging pancreatic carcinoma: developments during the past decade.Laparoscopic staging should be used routinely for locally extensive cancer of the pancreatic head.Does multidetector-row CT eliminate the role of diagnostic laparoscopy in assessing the resectability of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma?We hypothesized that the high-quality images from multidetector-row computed tomography (MDCT) would lead to improved sensitivity and specificity for predicting resectable pancreatic head adenocarcinoma, thus diminishing the value of staging laparoscopy.Forty four consecutive patients underwent thin-section dual-phase MDCT to stage their tumor, followed by an attempted pancreaticoduodenectomy. Four radiologists who were blinded to the operative outcome reviewed the scans and graded the presence of distant and nodal metastases, as well as the degree of arterial and portal involvement. The radiologic criteria for resectability were no distant metastasis, a patent portal vein, and < 50% arterial involvement.The overall resectability for this cohort was 52% (23/44). The 21 unresectable cases, included five liver metastases, three peritoneal metastases, and 13 locally invasive tumors. The negative margin resection rate was 34% (15/44). There were no portal vein resections. The sensitivity and specificity of MDCT for predicting resectability were 96% (22/23) and 33% (7/21), respectively. In this cohort, the positive and negative predictive values were 61% (22/36) and 87.5% (7/8), respectively. As determined by univariate logistic regression, only the degree of arterial involvement was a significant predictor of resectability (p = 0.02). As determined by multivariate logistic regression using both arterial and portal involvement, arterial involvement was predictive (p = 0.03) but portal vein involvement was not (p = 0.45).Despite the improvements in image quality obtained with multidetector-row technology, CT imaging remains a relatively nonspecific test for predicting resectability in patients with adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas. Minimally invasive modalities with higher specificity, particularly laparoscopy, continue to have an important role in staging pancreatic head adenocarcinoma.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in the evaluation of pancreatic and periampullary tumours.The pre-operative determination of resectability of pancreatic and peri-ampullary neoplasia assists the selection of patients for surgical or non-surgical treatment. This study investigated whether the addition of laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound to dual-phase helical CT could improve the accuracy of assessment of resectability.Prospective study of 305 patients referred to a single unit for consideration of pancreatic resection who underwent dual-phase helical CT scanning +/- laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound. Data were collected on patient demographics, CT findings, assessment of operability, laparoscopic assessment (LA), surgical procedures and histology.LA was undertaken in 239/305 patients, 190 of whom were considered CT resectable, and 49 CT unresectable. Of the 190 CT resectable patients, LA correctly identified unresectability in 28 (15%: metastases in 15; vascular encasement in 6; anaesthesia for laparoscopy found 7 unfit for major resection) and incorrectly in 2 (vascular encasement), but did not identify unresectability in 33; LA correctly confirmed resectability in the remainder (prediction improved, chi(2) = 9.73, p < 0.01). Of the 49 CT unresectable patients, LA correctly identified resectability in 4, and incorrectly in 12, and correctly identified unresectability in the remaining 33. Sixty-six of the 305 patients did not undergo LA, of whom 23 underwent resection.When added to dual-phase helical CT, laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound provides valuable information that significantly improves the selection of patients for surgical or non-surgical treatment.Laparoscopy is still necessary in the assessment of peri-ampullary neoplasia.Limitation of diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with a periampullary carcinoma.Diagnostic laparoscopy has been generally accepted in staging of patients with a periampullary malignancy. In our institution diagnostic laparoscopy was routinely used since 1992. However, in 1998 it was eliminated from the protocol since in a prospective study a yield of only 13% was found with a histologically proven accuracy of 60% for distant metastases. The effect of implementation of the new protocol on the occurrence of unnecessary laparotomies and the outcome after bypass surgery was assessed.Between January 1999 and December 2001, 186 consecutive patients with a potentially resectable periampullary carcinoma after radiological staging without diagnostic laparoscopy underwent explorative laparotomy with the intention to perform a curative pancreatoduodenectomy. Incidence of unresectability and outcome of palliative surgery were assessed.Resection could not be performed in 65 patients who underwent laparotomy because of metastatic disease (29 patients) and loco-regional tumour ingrowth (34 patients). These patients underwent a bypass procedure with a median survival of 216 days.At laparotomy distant metastases were detected in 16% of the patients. Considering the fact that the detection rate of diagnostic laparoscopy is lower than 100%, the use of staging laparotomy is too limited to justify it as a routine procedure.Staging of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma with spiral CT and endoscopic ultrasonography: an indirect evaluation of the usefulness of laparoscopy.The interest of laparoscopy in the preoperative staging of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma before curative pancreaticoduodenectomy is a matter of controversy and depends on the accuracy of preoperative imaging techniques.To assess the potential value of laparoscopy when a standardised and optimal preoperative staging is performed, including spiral computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS).All consecutive patients operated on with a view to curative pancreaticoduodenectomy for pancreatic head or ampullary adenocarcinoma in our centre from January 1998 to August 2000 were retrospectively studied. All of them had preoperative spiral CT and EUS. Tumour resectability was considered as highly probable (HP) or uncertain (U) according to well-defined criteria. Operative records of patients were reviewed to indirectly assess the effective resectability rate and the criteria responsible for unresectability and which of them would have been identified by laparoscopy if initially performed.69 consecutive patients were studied. Resectability was HP (n = 56) or U (n = 13) after preoperative staging. Curative pancreatoduodenectomy was performed in 53 patients (77%) (48 HP, 5 U). Positive predictive value of preoperative imaging for highly probable resectability was 86% (48/56). Among the 16 unresectable tumours (8 HP, 8 U), the cause of non-resection would have been found at laparoscopy in 9 patients (56%) (6 HP, 3 U). Finally, if initially performed, laparoscopy would have avoided laparotomy in 9/69 patients (13%) (6/56 HP (11%); 3/13 U (23%)).With accurate preoperative staging using spiral CT and EUS, laparoscopy would detect tumours which were unresectable in 13% of patients with pancreatic head cancer. Laparoscopy remains useful in selected patients, such as those with preoperative uncertain resectability, in whom it can prevent unnecessary laparotomy in one fourth of patients.The effects of staging laparoscopy on trocar site and peritoneal recurrence of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy (SL) has been used to assess resectability of patients with pancreatic cancer. It has lead to increased resectability rates and decreased morbidity. However, experimental data suggests that laparoscopy and peritoneal insufflation can promote tumor growth and potential recurrence. Few clinical data exist to allow assessment of whether these theoretical concerns translate into clinical problems. The purpose of this study was to determine if SL increases the incidence of trocar-site and peritoneal recurrence of pancreatic cancer.A retrospective review of all patients evaluated for pancreatic cancer from 1996 to 2001, inclusive, was included in this study. Patients were divided into five groups: nonoperative management (NM), SL followed by resection (SL-R), SL without resection (SL-NR), exploratory laparotomy with resection (EL-R), and exploratory laparotomy without resection (EL-NR). Patient records were assessed for postoperative occurrence of carcinomatosis and/or malignant ascites, trocar- or incisional-site recurrence, use of postoperative chemotherapy or radiation therapy, and survival.A total of 235 patients were included. Peritoneal progression of disease: NM 15.9%, SL 24.2%, EL 31.6% ( p = 0.03). Trocar/incisional recurrence: SL 3.0%, EL 3.9% ( p = NS). Use of chemotherapy/radiotherapy: NM 29.4%, SL-R 76.5%, SL-NR 62.5%, EL-R 69.6%, EL-NR 41.5%. Median survival (months): NM 3; SL-R 15, EL-R 10 ( p = NS); SL-NR 6, EL-NR 5 ( p = NS).SL does not increase the occurrence of trocar-site disease or peritoneal disease progression of pancreatic cancer. Patients who are found not to be resectable by SL are more likely to receive postoperative treatment. However, this does not appear to affect survival greatly. Nevertheless, avoidance of nontherapeutic laparotomy is worthwhile in these patients.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography in judging the resectability of pancreatic head cancer.To explore the clinical value of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) in judging the resectability of pancreatic head cancer.LUS was employed as a prospective diagnosis of tumor staging before exploratory laparotomy in 22 patients diagnosed with pancreatic head cancer to identify whether the liver and peritoneum had small metastases or local invasion to the portal vein, superior mesenteric vessel, aorta, inferior vena cava.In the 22 patients receiving laparoscopy and LUS, we found peritoneal or surface liver metastases (3 patients), hepatic parenchyma metastases (1), and pancreatitis proved by biopsy under ultrasound guidance (1). Laparotomy was avoided in these 5 patients. Of the remaining 17 patients, 8 patients, including 2 patients with portal vein emboli due to tumor metastases had hypertrophic lymph nodes or tumor invasion of local vessels in the peritoneal cavity, retroperitoneum, and omentum and the other 9 patients had resectable tumors shown by LUS. The 17 patients were subjected to exploratory laparotomy, and pancreaticoduodenectomy was successful in 8 patients.Laparoscopy and LUS can be used to precisely estimate the possibility of resection of pancreatic head cancer, and prevent unnecessary exploratory laparotomy and its complications. It can be used as a routine examination before exploratory laparotomy.Staging of abdominal metastases in pancreatic carcinoma by diagnostic laparoscopy and magnetic resonance imaging.Different noninvasive and invasive techniques are available for the detection of abdominal metastases in pancreatic carcinoma. Since small hepatic or peritoneal metastases are a crucial problem which precludes resection, accurate detection is mandatory. We compared laparoscopic staging of abdominal metastases in adenocarcinoma of the pancreas with MRI.55 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma had been screened and 49 entered the retrospective study. All patients had undergone MRI of the upper abdomen with concomitant MR-cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and diagnostic laparoscopy under conscious sedation. Patients without histologic proof of abdominal metastases underwent laparotomy.In 6/10 patients, metastases were correctly detected by laparoscopy, yielding a sensitivity of 60% and a specificity of 92%.MRI predicted metastases in 6/10 patients with 60% sensitivity and 100% specificity. Laparoscopy showed metastases in 3 patients that were missed by MRI, but failed to identify metastases in 3 of 6 patients with metastases on MRI. Though only one patient showed previously undetected metastases during laparotomy, 3 patients with abdominal metastases underwent unnecessary laparotomy due to a lack of histologic proof of malignancy.Whereas diagnostic laparoscopy is sensitive for the detection of small metastases and offers histologic verification, intrahepatic alterations are not detectable by sole visual inspection.MRI may compensate for this deficiency, but histologic proof of malignancy may be problematic. To date, no definite decision in favor of one of the presented procedures for the staging of abdominal metastases can be given.Laparoscopic staging of upper gastrointestinal malignancy.Laparoscopic staging (LS) of upper gastrointestinal malignancy has decreased the number of non-curative laparotomies. However, as radiological techniques have improved the value of this invasive staging technique has decreased, with some units either being more selective or abandoning it altogether for certain tumour types. The aim of the present study is to prospectively evaluate the additional utility of LS of upper gastrointestinal malignancy after radiological staging with modern techniques.One hundred and six consecutive patients assessed as having potentially curable upper gastrointestinal malignancy after radiological staging underwent LS between April 1999 and June 2001. Laparoscopic findings, outcome at laparotomy and complications were prospectively recorded.Laparoscopic staging detected incurable disease in 28 of the 106 patients (26%). The negative likelihood ratio was 0.36 (95% CI 0.24-0.53). Twenty-seven patients were considered incurable because of findings at laparoscopy and one on the findings of laparoscopic ultrasound. Ten patients underwent open palliative procedures and seven had non-therapeutic laparotomies giving a non-curative laparotomy rate of 16%. LS was most useful for primary liver and biliary tract tumours and was least useful for colorectal liver metastases. The most frequent findings denoting incurability were the presence of liver disease (12 cases) and peritoneal metastases (nine cases). Complications occurred in three patients with one death being attributable in part to the laparoscopy.Laparoscopy was useful in decreasing the number of non-therapeutic laparotomies, but laparoscopic ultrasound gave little additional benefit. The utility of LS was dependent on tumour type and in particular was of marginal benefit for colorectal liver metastases. LS remains a useful staging tool but should be applied selectively.The role of staging laparoscopy in hepatobiliary malignancy: prospective analysis of 401 cases.Patients with potentially resectable hepatobiliary malignancy are frequently found to have unresectable tumors at laparotomy. We prospectively evaluated staging laparoscopy in patients with resectable disease on preoperative imaging.Staging laparoscopy was performed on 410 patients with potentially resectable hepatobiliary malignancy. The preoperative likelihood of resectability was recorded. Data on preoperative imaging, operative findings, and hospital course were analyzed.Laparoscopic inspection was complete in 291 (73%) patients. In total, 153 patients (38%) had unresectable disease, 84 of whom were identified laparoscopically, increasing resectability from 62% to 78%. On multivariate analysis, a complete examination, preoperative likelihood of resection, and primary diagnosis were significant predictors of identifying unresectable disease at laparoscopy. The highest yield was for biliary cancers, and the lowest was for metastatic colorectal cancer. In patients with unresectable disease identified at laparoscopy, the mean hospital stay was 3 days, and postoperative morbidity was 9%, compared with 8 days and 27%, respectively, in patients found to have unresectable disease at laparotomy.Laparoscopy spared one in five patients a laparotomy while reducing hospital stay and morbidity. Targeting laparoscopy to patients at high risk for unresectable disease requires consideration of disease-specific factors; however, the surgeons' preoperative impression of resectability is also important.Subaquatic laparoscopy for staging of intraabdominal malignancy.Laparoscopic staging and subsequent palliation in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma.To test the hypothesis that laparoscopic staging improves outcome in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma compared to standard radiology staging.Diagnostic laparoscopy of peripancreatic malignancies has been reported to improve assessment of tumor stage and to prevent unnecessary exploratory laparotomies in 10% to 76% of patients.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound were performed in 297 consecutive patients with peripancreatic carcinoma scheduled for surgery after radiologic staging. Patients with pathology-proven unresectable tumors were randomly allocated to either surgical or endoscopic palliation. All others underwent laparotomy.Laparoscopic staging detected biopsy-proven unresectable disease in 39 patients (13%). At laparotomy, unresectable disease was found in another 72 patients, leading to a detection rate for laparoscopic staging of 35%. In total, 145 of the 197 patients classified as having "possibly resectable" disease after laparoscopic staging underwent resection (74%). Average survival in the group of 14 patients with biopsy-proven unresectable tumors randomly allocated to endoscopic palliation was 116 days, with a mean hospital-free survival of 94 days. The corresponding figures were 192 days and 164 days in the 13 patients allocated to surgical palliation.Because of the limited detection rate for unresectable metastatic disease and the likely absence of a large gain after switching from surgical to endoscopic palliation, laparoscopic staging should not be performed routinely in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma.Staging with helical computed tomography and laparoscopy in pancreatic head cancer.Helical computed tomography provides valuable information about extent of pancreatic cancer. However, it remains difficult to detect small distant metastases. Laparoscopic examination is becoming standard for cancer staging.Between 1995 and 1999, 45 patients with radiologically resectable pancreatic head cancer were analyzed retrospectively to clarify the indications for and role of staging laparoscopy. Computed tomography was examined for tumor size and spread to portal or superior mesenteric veins (PV) and celiac or superior mesenteric arteries (A).There were 29 (64%) patients with resectable disease, 4 (9%) with localized unresectable, and 12 (27%) with metastatic (hepatic in 7 and peritoneal in 5). Patients with metastatic disease were more likely to present with abdominal pain, vomiting, and back pain than were patients with resectable disease (p < 0.05). The mean tumor size and involvement of PV or A were greater in metastatic patients than in resectable patients (p < 0.005 or p < 0.01). The survival rate for patients with metastatic disease was lower than that for patients with resectable disease (p < 0.0001).According to clinical features and computed tomography findings, laparoscopic exploration is recommended for cancer staging. Helical computed tomography and staging laparoscopy categorize patients into those with localized and those with metastatic disease which considerably correlated with survivals.Preoperative laparoscopic examination using surgical manipulation and ultrasonography for pancreatic lesions.Unnecessary laparotomies in patients with advanced pancreatic disease are unlikely to provide any benefits and may compromise both the quality and duration of survival. The purpose of this study was to determine the contribution of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound to the diagnosis or staging, or both, of pancreatic lesions.Fifty-two patients were diagnosed preoperatively with pancreatic cancer. The diagnoses made by laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) were compared with those made prior to the operation. Laparoscopic visualization of the body of the pancreas was obtained via an infragastric approach. For the laparoscopic examination of the head of the pancreas, a retroduodenal approach was used.In 52 patients with cancer of the pancreatic head and body, unresectable findings were observed in 13 patients. Portal vein displacement without other unresectable findings was evident in six patients using LUS, and was confirmed at exploratory laparotomy in five patients. The surgical approaches were changed, with seven patients undergoing an open exploration for biliary drainage and the other six patients receiving endoscopic endoprostheses. In six of the 52 patients, LUS-guided needle biopsies and frozen-section examinations detected chronic pancreatitis (n = 4), a malignant lymphoma (n = 1), and an abdominal tuberculosis (n = 1), which were diagnosed preoperatively as pancreatic cancers and cysts. Only one patient undergoing the laparoscopic procedure had acute pancreatitis; this patient was treated conservatively.LUS, when combined with laparoscopic manipulations, may overcome many of the limitations of laparoscopy alone in the investigation of pancreatic lesions by providing an accurate diagnosis and assessment of the size and extent of the local dissemination.Role of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in staging of pancreatic tumours.Radiological imaging alone is not reliable enough in staging of pancreatic cancer. Not only because of poor sensitivity but also because there is a tendency to overstage tumours. The aim of the study was to compare the efficiency of spiral computed tomography (CT), transabdominal ultrasound (US), laparoscopy (LAP) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) in staging of pancreatic tumours.In this prospective study 27 patients underwent pancreatic tumour staging with CT, US, LAP and LUS. The reference standard was operative evaluation or in case of disseminated disease laparoscopic assessment.Although LAP was hindered by adhesions in 11% of the patients the benefit of LAP staging was evident in detecting peritoneal carcinomatosis. The assessment of the local tumour expansion of a pancreatic carcinoma was difficult for all staging modalities. LUS did not change the decision whether to proceed with laparotomy once. In our experience routine use of laparoscopic staging does not benefit patients with pancreatic tumour but in selected cases it may prevent unnecessary laparotomy.Utility of staging laparoscopy in subsets of peripancreatic and biliary malignancies.To determine the relative benefit of staging laparoscopy in peripancreatic and biliary malignancies.Staging laparoscopy has been used in a variety of peripancreatic and biliary malignancies. The utility of the technique in subsets of these types of cancer has not been systematically compared.One hundred fifty-seven patients underwent laparoscopy after conventional tumor staging; 89 were also staged with laparoscopic ultrasonography. Diagnostic categories were cancer of the pancreatic head and uncinate process, cancer of the body and tail of pancreas, cancer of the extrahepatic bile duct, cancer of the gallbladder, and cancer of the ampulla of Vater/duodenum.In patients with cancer of the head of the pancreas, metastatic disease or vascular invasion was discovered frequently by laparoscopy (31%), whereas in ampullary/duodenal cancer it was never found. The laparoscopic findings in cancer of the head of the pancreas had an important influence on treatment decisions, whereas in cancer of the ampulla/duodenum, laparoscopy had no effect on clinical decisions. Laparoscopy also substantially influenced the treatment of gallbladder cancer; in other tumor types, results were intermediate. Laparoscopic ultrasonography was valuable in cancer of the head of the pancreas.The utility of staging laparoscopy depends on diagnosis. It is recommended for continued use in pancreatic head and gallbladder cancers but not in ampullary malignancies.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancers for resectability using laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound.Cancers of the pancreas and periampullary region are rarely curable. We set out to determine the efficacy of laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound in the staging of pancreatic and ampullary malignancies for resectability.Between January 1994 and September 1999, we retrospectively reviewed the laparoscopic staging (LS) of tumors already deemed resectable by standard radiologic criteria in 27 patients using laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Patients found to be resectable by LS evaluation underwent laparotomy (LA). We then compared the results of the LS and LA findings.Of the 27 patients evaluated, 17 were men and 10 were women. Their mean age was 66 years. Preoperative computerized tomography (CT) scans were done in all 27 patients (100%), and transabdominal and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) was done in 21 (78%). By LS, seven patients (26%) were found to have unresectable disease. Two patients with mesenteric tumor infiltration (one with peritoneal implants, and one with a visible liver metastasis) were judged to be unresectable by laparoscopy alone. LUS revealed that one patient had portal vein (PV) occlusion and two had metastases to the lymph nodes or liver that were not revealed by preoperative studies or laparoscopy alone. Among 20 patients (74%) deemed resectable by LS, two (10%) were found to be unresectable at LA, one due to PV involvement and the other due to local tumor extension with superior mesenteric lymph node metastasis. Eighteen of those in whom resection was attempted (90%) were resectable, with no unexpected findings of distant lymph node or hepatic metastasis. Pathology examination showed that eight had regional metastases (44%). The sensitivity of LS in determining unresectability was 77% (seven true positives and two false negatives). The negative predictive value (reflecting resectability) was 90%. Laparoscopy alone had a sensitivity of 44%, with a negative predictive value of 78%. The sensitivity and positive predictive value of LS was 100%, reflecting no false positive examinations.LS can effectively stage most patients and reliably predict which of them will benefit from LA. Intervention for unresectable patients can then be limited to laparoscopic or endoscopic bypass. The main limitation is that LS may underestimate PV and regional lymph node involvement.[Value of laparoscopic ultrasound for staging of gastrointestinal tumors].The objective of this study was to evaluate the impact of laparoscopic ultrasound on the staging of gastrointestinal tumors prospectively.Between 1993 and 2000 staging laparoscopy was performed on 668 patients with various neoplasms. Laparoscopy provided adequate information regarding resectability in 366 patients. Laparoscopic ultrasonography was performed in 302 patients (45%) using an intraoperative ultrasound unit (B & K) and a semiflexible ultrasound probe (5-7.5 MHz). The results of staging laparoscopy were compared to the preoperative staging and histopathology.Compared to preoperative staging laparoscopic ultrasound provided additional information of therapeutic relevance in 46 of 302 cases (15%). In a group of 384 patients with tumors of the upper gastrointestinal tract, laparoscopic ultrasound was performed in 186 cases and showed occult liver metastases, M1-lymph nodes, or nonresectable disease in 26 patients. Overall, this technique improved the staging of esophageal, gastric and pancreatic cancer in 12%, 3%, and 12% of the patients, respectively. Laparoscopic ultrasound proved to be most useful in esophageal and pancreatic cancer with a rate of 52% and 20% information additional to laparoscopy. The relative contribution of laparoscopic ultrasound to the staging of gastric cancer was only 10%.Laparoscopic ultrasound improves the diagnostic accuracy of staging laparoscopy. However, routine use of this technique is only justified, if neoadjuvant therapy--particularly in controlled trials--is considered in patients with advanced gastrointestinal cancer.Experience with laparoscopic ultrasonography for defining tumour resectability in carcinoma of the pancreatic head and periampullary region.Computed tomography (CT) is currently the most widely available staging investigation for pancreatic tumours. However, the accuracy of CT for determining tumour resectability is variable and can be poor. Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is potentially a more accurate method for disease staging. The authors' experience of LUS for staging carcinoma of the pancreatic head and periampullary region is described.Fifty-one patients with potentially resectable pancreatic tumours defined at CT underwent further investigation with LUS. Twenty-seven patients subsequently had an open laparotomy. The evaluations of tumour resectability at CT and LUS were compared with the operative findings.At LUS, 24 patients were considered to have resectable tumours, 21 non-resectable tumours and six patients were shown to have no pancreatic tumour mass. Twenty-two patients deemed to have a resectable tumour at LUS underwent surgery. Twenty patients were confirmed to have resectable disease and two patients had non-resectable disease. A further five patients underwent surgery. In all five the ultrasonographic diagnosis was confirmed at surgery (four patients with non-resectable disease and no pancreatic tumour in one patient). LUS prevented unnecessary extensive surgery in 53 per cent of patients. For the 22 patients who underwent surgery for potentially resectable disease, the positive predictive value of LUS for defining tumour resectability was 91 per cent.LUS is an accurate additional investigation for defining tumour resectability and directing management in patients with potentially resectable carcinoma of the pancreatic head or periampullary region.Laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Over the past decade, laparoscopy has emerged as a popular method of detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease in patients presumed to have localized pancreatic cancer.The English language literature on laparoscopic staging of pancreatic cancer was reviewed. Interpretation of this literature on staging laparoscopy is difficult because (1) there has been inconsistent use of high-quality computed tomography (CT) in prospective studies, (2) many studies have included patients with locally advanced disease, and (3) the R0/R1/R2 resection rates among patients staged by laparoscopy have not been reported, making it impossible to correlate laparoscopic findings with the R0 resection rate. Laparoscopy may prevent unnecessary laparotomy in a proportion of CT-staged patients presumed to have resectable pancreatic cancer. However, routine laparoscopy is performed on patients judged to have resectable disease by high-quality CT, this fraction of patients is between 4 and 13 per cent.When state-of-the-art CT is available, the routine use of staging laparoscopy may not be easily justified from the data in the recent literature. Selective use of laparoscopy may be more appropriate and will probably be a more cost-effective staging approach. Criteria are presented for the selective use of laparoscopy in the staging of patients with localized pancreatic cancer.Problems in staging of pancreatic and hepatobiliary tumours.Laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer allows identification of metastatic disease which is beyond the resolution of computed tomography. Laparoscopic ultrasound, dissection, and/or peritoneal cytology may be used to enhance the sensitivity of the staging procedure. Our experience at Massachusetts General Hospital with staging laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology over the past 8 years (N = 239) reveals that approximately 30% of patients without metastases by computed tomography harbor occult metastatic disease at laparoscopy. Additionally, published series demonstrate accurate determination of resectability in greater than 75% of patients after staging laparoscopy. Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer allows optimization of resources and avoidance of unnecessary surgery.Laparoscopic ultrasound enhances diagnostic laparoscopy in the staging of intra-abdominal neoplasms.Routine laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) for staging intra-abdominal malignancies remains controversial. Thus, we undertook a prospective study to assess the value of preoperative laparoscopy with LUS for patients with intra-abdominal tumors judged resectable by preoperative studies. Laparoscopy was successfully performed in 76 of 77 patients, and 60 underwent LUS. Of 33 patients with presumed pancreatic cancer, laparoscopic findings changed the operative management of 11 patients, and LUS altered the management of an additional 6 patients. Laparotomy was avoided in 9 patients (27%). Among 14 patients with hepatobiliary tumors, laparotomy was avoided in 9 patients in whom laparoscopy and/or LUS revealed either benign or advanced disease. Operative management was altered in 4 of 18 patients with gastric or esophageal cancer by laparoscopic findings. LUS did not add to the management of these patients. Of 12 patients with presumed intra-abdominal lymphoma, 9 were diagnosed with lymphoma and 3 with benign disease, without laparotomy in all but 1 case. Laparoscopy and LUS are valuable tools for evaluating the resectability of pancreatic and hepatobiliary tumors. Laparoscopy, and to a lesser degree LUS, greatly facilitates diagnosing patients with intra-abdominal lymphomas and spares an occasional patient with esophagogastric carcinoma from undergoing laparotomy.Impact of laparoscopic staging in the treatment of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer identifies unsuspected metastases, allows treatment selection, and helps predict survival.Inception cohort.Tertiary referral center.A total of 125 consecutive patients with radiographic stage II to III pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma who underwent staging laparoscopy with peritoneal cytologic examination between July 1994 and November 1998. Seventy-eight proximal tumors and 47 distal tumors were localized.Based on the findings of spiral computed tomography (CT) and laparoscopy, patients were stratified into 3 groups. Group 1 patients had unsuspected metastases found at laparoscopy and were palliatedwithout further operation. Group 2 patients had no demonstrable metastases, but CT indicated unresectability due to vessel invasion. This group underwent external beam radiation with fluorouracil chemotherapy followed in selected cases by intraoperative radiation. Patients in group 3 had no metastases or definitive vessel invasion and were resection candidates.Survival.Staging laparoscopy revealed unsuspected metastases in 39 patients (31.2%), with 9 having positive cytologic test results as the only evidence of metastatic disease (group 1). Fifty-five patients (44.0%) had localized but unresectable carcinoma (group 2), of whom 2 (3.6%) did not tolerate treatment, 20 (36.4%) developed metastatic disease during treatment, and 21 (38.2%) received intraoperative radiation. Of 31 patients with potentially resectable tumors (group 3), resection for cure was performed in 23 (resectability rate, 74.2%). Median survival was 7.5 months for patients with metastatic disease, 10.5 months for those receiving chemoradiation, and 14.5 months for those who underwent tumor resection (P = .01 for group 2 vs. group 1; P<.001 for group 3 vs group 1).Staging laparoscopy, combined with spiral CT, allowed stratification of patients into 3 treatment groups that correlated with treatment opportunity and subsequent survival. Among the 125 patients, laparoscopy obviated 39 unnecessary operations and irradiation in patients with metastatic disease not detectable by CT. Laparoscopic staging can help focus aggressive treatment on patients with pancreatic cancer who might benefit.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in staging of pancreatic cancers.Authors report elective diagnostic laparoscopy, and the role of this method in evaluating operability of pancreatic cancer. At their department 11 diagnostic laparoscopic procedures of pancreatic cancer were performed during the last 5 years. In 3 cases tumor proved to be resectable despite preoperative imaging results of unresectable condition. On the basis of international literature authors give brief summary of indications, cost and benefit of diagnostic laparoscopy, and its place in the diagnostic algorythm of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography in more than 400 patients with upper gastrointestinal carcinoma.Resection offers the only chance of cure to patients with esophageal, gastroesophageal junction, and hepatopancreatobiliary tumors. Staging is essential to select patients who will benefit from operation because palliation can also be performed nonoperatively. Several studies, including limited numbers of patients, have shown that laparoscopic staging prevents unnecessary laparotomies, but it is doubtful whether general application of this staging method can be advised. The aim of this study was to assess the benefit of diagnostic laparoscopy for staging patients with esophageal, gastroesophageal junction, and hepatopancreatobiliary tumors.Between June 1992 and December 1996, 420 patients with a resectable tumor after conventional staging underwent diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography. Histologic proof of metastases or ingrowth was used to cancel laparotomy.Laparoscopic staging avoided laparotomy in 20% of patients (sensitivity 0.70): 5% with an esophageal tumor, 20% with a gastroesophageal junction tumor, 15% with a periampullary tumor, 40% with a proximal bile duct tumor, 35% with a liver tumor, and 40% with a pancreatic body or tail tumor. Complications and port-site metastases were seen in 4% and 2% of patients, respectively.Laparoscopic staging is a safe procedure with low morbidity and without mortality in this series. It has shown no benefit in esophageal cancer, but seems beneficial for staging tumors located at the gastroesophageal junction, proximal bile duct tumors, liver tumors, and pancreatic body and tail tumors. The value of laparoscopic staging for patients with periampullary tumors is not as great as stated in previous studies and is still the subject of investigation.TNM staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer by laparoscopic ultrasonography.Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is an imaging modality that combines laparoscopy and ultrasonography. The purpose of this prospective blinded study was to evaluate the TNM stage and assessment of resectability by LUS in patients with pancreatic cancer.Of the 71 consecutive patients admitted to our department, 36 were excluded from the study, mainly due to evident signs of metastatic disease or another condition that would preclude surgery. Thus, a total of 35 patients were enrolled in the study. All patients underwent abdominal CT scan, ultrasonography, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), diagnostic laparoscopy, and LUS. Histopathologic examination was considered to be the final evaluation for LUS in all but three patients, where EUS was used as the reference.The accuracy of LUS in T staging was 29/33 (80%); in N staging it was 22/34 (76%); in M staging, it was 23/34 (68%); and in overall TNM staging, it was 23/34 (68%). In assessment of nonresectability, distant metastases, and lymph node metastases, the sensitivity was 0.86, 0.43 and 0.67, respectively, for LUS alone. Combining the information gleaned from laparoscopy and LUS, the accuracy in finding nonresectable tumors was 89%.Diagnostic laparoscopy with LUS is highly accurate in TNM staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer and should be considered an important modality in the assessment algorithm.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography for staging pancreatic cancer: critical appraisal.A pilot study was designed to elucidate the role of staging laparoscopy for determining resectability in patients with pancreatic cancer. The additional value of laparoscopic contact ultrasonography (LCU) was also evaluated with specific regard to its ability to detect hepatic metastases and assess vascular infiltration of the portomesenteric trunk. A consecutive sample of 50 patients referred for operation of a suspected pancreatic cancer were submitted to preoperative contrast-enhanced high-resolution computed tomography (CT) and staging laparoscopy combined with LCU at a university hospital. For those progressing to exploratory laparotomy, the intraoperative findings relating to tumor diffusion and vascular infiltration were compared to CT, laparoscopic, and LCU data. Analytical description of the laparoscopic findings is given. Row data of predicted versus observed vascular infiltration were tabulated for CT and LCU. The sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy of each diagnostic test were calculated for comparative analysis. Laparoscopy alone prevented unnecessary laparotomy in 20% of cases. A complete procedure could not be achieved in 28% of patients. Three false-negative staging results occurred. LCU identified small (benign) hepatic nodules not seen by CT in 8% of patients. Sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy for assessing vascular infiltration were 82%, 53%, and 69% for CT and 94%, 80%, and 87% for LCU. Laparoscopy was confirmed to be safe and effective for staging pancreatic cancer. Because of its unique capabilities to detect even small peritoneal tumor deposits a quick exploration immediately before laparotomy is advised in all patients. The additional benefit of a more extensive procedure is not supported by our results. Although LCU appears to define the vascular involvement more accurately than conventional CT, the limitation of getting clinically useful ultrasound data in all the patients suggests its adoption in only a selected population.Laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the TNM staging of pancreatic carcinoma.A prospective study was performed comparing laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography (LapUS), transabdominal ultrasonography (USS), computed tomography (CT), and selective visceral angiography with portal phase venography (SVA) for the assessment of resectability in 50 patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer. The results were stratified by TNM stages. Tumor unresectability was demonstrated in 36 patients (72%). The sensitivity of LapUS for demonstrating the index lesion was 96%. Laparoscopic ultrasonography failed to predict factors precluding resection by T stage in six patients, and there were no significant differences in the ability of any modality to predict local resectability (predictive value 58-73%). Laparoscopic ultrasonography did not overestimate T stage and was significantly more specific for assessing unresectability compared with USS (100% vs. 64%, p<0.05) and CT (100% vs. 47%, p<0.005). No imaging investigation was able to assess the N stage accurately. Metastases were confirmed in 16 patients (32%), with LapUS proving significantly more sensitive than USS (94% vs. 29%, p<0.001) and CT (94% vs. 33%, p<0.005). The addition of LapUS to the laparoscopic examination did not change the M stage in any patient, as all metastases were superficially located. Laparoscopy with LapUS was the most reliable method for assessing overall tumour resectability and was significantly more predictive than CT (97% vs. 79%, p<0.005). These results confirm that laparoscopy is indispensable for detecting occult intraabdominal metastases. LapUS reliably predicts tumor unresectability, offsetting the tendency of USS and CT to overestimate T stage. Methods of accurate N staging remain elusive, and the use of routine SVA is not justified.Improved tumor staging by diagnostic laparoscopy.This study was performed to assess the role of additional diagnostic laparoscopy in the preoperative staging of patients with adenocarcinoma of the esophagus, gastric cancer and pancreatic cancer prior to intended curative surgery. 89 patients with primary solid abdominal tumors were eligible for evaluation; of those 49 patients had a gastric cancer, 33 a pancreatic cancer and seven an adenocarcinoma of the esophagus. Patients without histologically proven metastases proceeded to laparotomy. Metastases were detectable laparoscopically in nine of 49 patients (18.4%) with gastric cancer (peritoneum n = 5, omentum n = 2, liver n = 2). Intraoperatively metastases were evident in further five cases (liver n = 3, peritoneum n = 2). In eleven of 33 patients (33%) with pancreatic cancer metastases were detected by laparoscopy (liver n = 6, peritoneum n = 2, liver and peritoneum n = 3) and in further four patients intraoperatively (liver n = 2, peritoneum n = 2). One of seven patients with an adenocarcinoma of the esophagus had liver metastases detected by laparoscopy. Intraoperatively no metastases were evident in those patients. Laparotomies were avoidable in 21 of the 89 patients (23.6%) who had a diagnostic laparoscopy prior to intended curative resection. Preoperative staging by additional diagnostic laparoscopy proved effective in patients with gastric and pancreatic cancer.The standard diagnostic work-up and surgical treatment of pancreatic head tumours.Experience with staging laparoscopy in pancreatic malignancy.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in the staging of abdominal malignancies is not well defined.We retrospectively reviewed the usefulness of diagnostic laparoscopy as a staging procedure in pancreatic malignancy. This experience between February 1988 and May 1997 involves 109 cases of suspected or proven pancreatic malignancy. All laparoscopies were performed with the patient under conscious sedation and local anesthesia in an endoscopy suite.Of the 109 patients with pancreatic cancer, 45 (42%) had metastatic disease. The use of computed tomography (CT) alone revealed the existence of liver metastases in 10 of 109 (9%) patients, which were confirmed laparoscopically. The further use of laparoscopy identified metastases in 29 more cases: hepatic, 23; hepatic and peritoneal, 3; peritoneal and mesenteric, 1; and mesenteric, 2. CT in conjunction with laparoscopy therefore revealed metastatic liver, peritoneal, or mesenteric lesions in 39 of 109 (36%) patients with pancreatic cancer. After staging laparoscopy, 67 of 69 patients underwent laparotomy. Metastatic disease was identified at laparotomy in 6 more patients; however, only 4 of these patients had metastases to the liver whereas 2 had metastases to the peripancreatic lymph nodes. Therefore, in patients with pancreatic malignancy, the negative predictive value for the diagnosis of metastases to the liver, peritoneum or mesentery was 94% (61 of 65 patients). The positive predictive value of laparoscopy alone for the detection of metastatic disease to the liver, peritoneum, or mesentery was 88% (29 of 33 patients). Laparoscopy was successfully performed without complications in all patients with pancreatic cancer; however, one had a technically unsatisfactory examination. The overall rate of resectability after staging by imaging studies and laparoscopy was 57% (35 of 61 patients).In patients with a negative CT for metastases, laparoscopic identification of metastases avoided unnecessary laparotomy in 29 of 99 (29%) patients with pancreatic cancer. Staging laparoscopy is indicated in all cases of pancreatic malignancy before an attempt at a surgical cure.The use of diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic resection with curative intent is possible in a select minority of patients with carcinomas of the pancreatic head. Diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography combines the proven benefits of staging laparoscopy with high-resolution intraoperative ultrasound, thus allowing the surgeon to perform a detailed assessment of the pancreatic cancer.In a prospective study of 26 patients with obstructive jaundice from a carcinoma of the head of the pancreas, the curative resectability of tumors was assessed by ultrasound (26 cases), computerized tomography (26 cases), endoscopic ultrasound (16 cases), and a combination of diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (26 cases).The findings of ultrasound and computerized tomography were comparable: 50% of patients were excluded from curative resection. Endoscopic ultrasound provided precise information on the primary tumors. The accuracy of the combined diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound, when compared with ultrasound, computerized tomography, and endoscopic ultrasound, was better with respect to minute peritoneal or hepatic metastasis: 80.7% (or a further 30.7%) of patients did not qualify for curative resection.Diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography enables detection of previously unsuspected metastases; thus, needless laparotomy can be avoided. It should therefore be considered the first step in any potentially curative surgical procedure.Cytology of peritoneal lavage performed during staging laparoscopy for gastrointestinal malignancies: is it useful?To evaluate the potential benefit of cytology of the peritoneal lavage obtained during diagnostic laparoscopy for staging gastrointestinal (GI) malignancies.Peritoneal lavage is a simple procedure that can be performed during laparotomy for GI tumors. Tumor cells in the lavage fluid are thought to indicate intraperitoneal tumor seeding and to have a negative effect on survival. For this reason, peritoneal lavage is frequently added to diagnostic laparoscopy for staging GI malignancies.Patients who underwent peritoneal lavage during laparoscopic staging for GI malignancies between June 1992 and September 1997 were included. Lavage fluids were stained using Giemsa and Papanicolaou methods. Cytology results were correlated with the presence of metastases and tumor ingrowth found during laparoscopy and with survival.Cytology of peritoneal lavage was performed in 449 patients. Tumor cells were found in 28 patients (6%): 8/87 with an esophageal tumor, 2/32 with liver metastases, 11/72 with a proximal bile duct tumor, 7/236 with a periampullary tumor, and none in 7 and 15 patients with a primary liver tumor or pancreatic body or tail tumor, respectively. In 19 of the 28 patients (68%) in whom tumor cells were found, metastatic disease was detected during laparoscopy, and 3 of the 28 patients had a false-positive (n = 1) or a misleading positive (n = 2) lavage result. Therefore, lavage was beneficial in only 6/449 patients (1.3%); in these patients, the lavage result changed the assessment of tumor stage and adequately predicted irresectable disease. Univariate analysis showed a significant survival difference between patients in whom lavage detected tumor cells and those in whom it did not, but multivariate analysis revealed that these survival differences were caused by metastatic or ingrowing disease.Cytology of peritoneal lavage with conventional staining should no longer be performed during laparoscopic staging of GI malignancies because it provides an additional benefit in only 1.3% of patients and has limited prognostic value for survival in this group of patients.[Is laparoscopic evaluation of digestive cancers legitimate? A prospective study of 109 cases].This aims of this study is to evaluate after laparoscopic exploration or treatment in digestive cancers, the incidence of port site metastases and the incidence of unnecessary laparotomy in advanced disease.109 patients were included in this study: 91 had localized digestive cancers and 18 had disseminated disease with hepatic and/or peritoneal metastases.All the patients underwent a laparoscopy and a laparoscopic ultra-sonography under general anesthesia prior to a definitive decision on therapeutic management. Depending on the circumstances, histological or cytological biopsies were performed. The puncture sites of the trocar were examined clinically and, if required, by ultrasonography, monthly through out the course of the disease. Chemotherapy was instigated in 60.5 per cent of patients.35 patients (32.1 per cent) only had one laparoscopic examination with a mean survival of 4.8 months, 22.9 per cent of patients had laparoscopic treatment of their lesion and 44.9 per cent had conventional treatment. Laparoscopic exploration allowed the detection of 52 lesions that had not been identified by conventional imaging techniques and thereby avoided 35 laparotomies (32.1 per cent). Tumor invasion of the peritoneum was present in 46 per cent of cases, most notably in the cases of pancreatico-biliary cancers. The overall mean survival was 32.7 months while it was 9.8 months in cases of palliative treatment. In total, 436 trocars were used. There was one case (0.9 per cent of patient or 0.02 per cent of port) of a metastasis occurring at the site of the trocar following treatment by right-sided, laparoscopic colectomy in a patient with disseminated cancer. Two factors seem to be involved peritoneal spread of the tumor and manipulation of the tumor.Laparoscopic exploration for digestive cancers is a legitimate technique. It allows the detection of lesions that are not identified by conventional imaging techniques, permits a more accurate assessment of the resectability of a tumor and reduces the number of unnecessary laparotomies. The incidence of metastases at the site of the trocar is low and is closely linked to the presence of disseminated disease and manipulation of the tumor.Role of laparoscopy in the staging of gastrointestinal cancer.Accurate staging plays a primary role in determining the appropriate treatment of gastrointestinal malignancies. Recently, laparoscopy has emerged as a staging modality that is more sensitive and specific in staging most gastrointestinal cancers than preoperative imaging modalities. The addition of laparoscopic ultrasonographic techniques has achieved even greater staging accuracy. Consequently, patients with disease that is amenable to resection are better identified, and others with locally advanced disease are spared unnecessary laparotomies. Since laparoscopic techniques may be associated with low morbidity and a rapid recovery, palliative procedures are being developed for patients with advanced gastrointestinal malignancies. This reviews summarizes the current status of laparoscopic staging of gastrointestinal malignancies and compares this technique to preoperative imaging modalities. Also discussed are promising staging technologies and therapeutic procedures that may soon play an important role in the management of gastrointestinal cancer patients.[Evaluation of pancreatic cancer by combined laparoscopy and echolaparoscopy].This prospective study was undertaken to evaluate the efficiency of staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of tumoural extension and surgical resectability in patients with carcinoma of the pancreatic head.From June 1995 to March 1997, 26 consecutive patients (11 male and 15 female patients), with a mean age of 62.5 years, were included in this study. The lesion was located in the pancreatic head with jaundice. Four staging methods were used: percutaneous ultrasonography (n = 26) computed tomography (n = 26), endoscopic ultrasonography (n = 26). The assessment of resectability by each procedure was verified by surgical exploration and histologic examination.Results of percutaneous ultrasonography and computed tomography were similar, predicting unresectability in 50% of the patients. Endoscopic ultrasonography performed in the 16 patients without visible metastases according to the previous procedures predicted surgical resectability in seven patients only. With staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography, undiscovered metastases were found and unresectability was predicted in 21 patients out of 26; the sensitivity was 100% for liver metastases, peritoneal metastases and vascular involvement, 90% for lymph node involvement and 88% for diagnosis of the primitive lesion. A Whipple procedure was performed in five patients and a palliative bypass in all the other patients except one. An unnecessary laparotomy was avoided in 12 patients.Staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography is superior to all other staging methods. It should be the first step of a potentially curative surgical treatment (five cases only in this series) or of a palliative bypass. Laparotomy was avoided in 12 cases.Lesser sac endoscopy and laparoscopy in pancreatic carcinoma definitive diagnosis, staging and palliation.Laparoscopy with lesser sac endoscopy (LSE) were used in combination from 1987 to 1992 in 103 patients for differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and other peripancreatic pathology, staging, and palliation. LSE identified pancreatic carcinoma in 38 patients; pancreatic cystadenocarcinoma in 2 patients; pancreatic cystadenoma in 3 patients; pancreatic adenoma in 1 patient; pancreatic metastases from liver in 2 patients; and pancreatic cysts in 5 patients. False negative diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma occurred in two cases. Nontumor pancreatic pathology was revealed in 10 patients. Specifically, acute pancreatitis was found in four patients, and chronic pancreatitis was found in six patients. Extrapancreatic cancers were identified in 15 patients: retroperitoneal extraorgan tumors were found in 2 patients; extrahepatic biliary tract cancer in 6 patients; gallbladder cancer in 1 patient; liver cancer in 3 patients; and stomach cancer in 1 patient. In five cases no pathology was found. Overall correct definitive diagnosis was established in 101 patients. Sensitivity of laparoscopy with LSE for pancreatic carcinoma diagnosis proved to be 95 per cent (38 of 40 patients), for pancreatic tumors diagnosis 96.22 per cent (51 of 53 patients); specificity of the method 100 per cent; and accuracy of diagnosis 98 per cent (101 of 103 patients). Thus, the accuracy of the method was as high as the accuracy of combination of all known modalities. Criteria of unresectability were revealed with the combination of LSE and laparoscopy in 75 per cent (30 of 40 cases) of pancreatic carcinoma. Moreover, laparoscopy allowed palliation of pancreatic carcinoma. Laparoscopic cholecystostomy was performed in 10 patients, and laparoscopic cholecystojejunostomy with enteroenterostomy was performed in 6 patients.Laparoscopic ultrasound enhances standard laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.To define the role of laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) in the staging of pancreatic tumors.Laparoscopy has recently been established as a valuable tool in the staging of pancreatic cancer. It has been suggested that the addition of LUS to standard laparoscopy could improve the accuracy of this procedure.A prospective evaluation of 90 patients with pancreatic tumors undergoing laparoscopy and LUS was performed over a 27-month period. LUS equipped with an articulated curved and linear array transducer (6 to 10 MHz) was used. All patients underwent rigorous laparoscopic examination. Clinical, surgical, and pathologic data were collected.The median age was 65 years (range 43 to 85 years). Sixty-four patients had tumors in the head, 19 in the body, and 3 in the tail of the pancreas. Four patients had ampullary tumors. LUS was able to image the primary tumor (98%), portal vein (97%), superior mesenteric vein (94%), hepatic artery (93%), and superior mesenteric artery (93%) in these patients. LUS was particularly helpful in determining venous involvement (42%) and arterial involvement (38%) by the tumor. This resulted in a change in surgical treatment for 13 (14%) of the 90 patients in whom standard laparoscopic examination was equivocal.LUS is useful in evaluating the primary tumor and peripancreatic vascular anatomy. When standard laparoscopic findings are equivocal, LUS allowed accurate determination of resectability. Supplementing laparoscopy with LUS offers improved assessment and preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in pancreatic and periampullary malignancies.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy before laparotomy in patients with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies remains controversial. We analyzed the value of using diagnostic laparoscopy to avoid laparotomy in these patients.Between November 1993 and December 1996, 254 patients with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were treated. In 74 patients, multiple distant metastases precluded further surgical treatment. In all, 180 patients underwent laparotomy for pancreatic cancer (119 patients) or periampullary cancer (61 patients). Preoperatively, all patients underwent computed tomography for staging and to assess resectability of the tumor. Based on the results of the imaging procedure, the patients were scheduled for either tumor resection or a palliative operation.Twenty-one of 180 patients (12%) with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were scheduled preoperatively for nonresectional operations because of distant metastasis or retroperitoneal tumor infiltration. In none of these patients was the operative strategy changed. In 159 of 180 patients (88%), a pancreatic resection was planned preoperatively; 119 patients underwent pancreatic resection. In the remaining 40 patients preoperatively scheduled for tumor resection, removal of the tumor was not possible. In 24, this resulted from tumor infiltration into the retropancreatic vessels, and in 16 it resulted from liver or peritoneal metastasis detected for the first time intraoperatively. These 16 patients (10%) could have benefited from diagnostic laparoscopy. Similar results were found in the subgroup of 119 patients with pancreatic cancer, of whom 102 were planned for tumor resection and 17 for palliative operation. Of the 102 patients planned preoperatively for tumor resection, 71 patients (70%) underwent pancreatic resection. In the remaining 31 patients scheduled for tumor resection, removal of the tumor was not possible: in 17 because of tumor infiltration into the retropancreatic vessels and in 14 because of liver or peritoneal metastasis detected for the first time intraoperatively. These 14 patients (14%) also would have benefited from laparoscopy.Preoperative computed tomography is a reliable technique to detect tumor metastasis in patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer. Unlike other investigators, we found that only 10% of patients with periampullary or pancreatic cancer and 14% of patients with pancreatic cancer might profit from laparoscopy. Because of this low number, laparoscopy cannot generally be recommended for patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer before laparotomy.Diagnosing and staging of pancreatic carcinoma-what is necessary?The aim of the present prospective observational study was to diagnose and stage pancreatic carcinoma with a minimum of diagnostic procedures. Our experiences in 307 patients with a histologically confirmed pancreatic carcinoma show that for diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma sonography and computed tomography are sufficient in 95% of the cases. The combination of both has a sensitivity equal to that of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP; 96.8 vs. 98.7%; n.s., chi2 test). ERCP is only indicated in cases with negative sonography and computed tomography, and suspicion of pancreatic cancer. For tumor staging, the routine performance of angiography cannot be recommended in view of the fact that although it provides greater sensitivity for the evaluation of an infiltration of the portal vein (80% for angiography vs. 22% for sonography or computed tomography), it is associated with a lower positive predictive value (56.4 vs. 68 and 72%) which results in a lower accuracy. Despite recent advantages in diagnostic technology, less than 50% of unresectable tumors were identified preoperatively at a 10% false-positive rate. The major reason for unresectability is infiltration into the mesenteric axis, which cannot be identified laparoscopically. Laparoscopy or percutaneous biopsy is recommended only in the presence of a tumor with suspicion of distant metastasis detected by radiological imaging and requiring histological confirmation. In conclusion, sonography and computed tomography as the only diagnostic images are sufficient for diagnosing and staging of pancreatic carcinoma in more than 95% of the patients. Only a small number of patients needs further diagnostic procedures.Routine diagnostic laparoscopy is unnecessary in staging tumors of the pancreatic head.This study examined the success of computed tomography (CT) and angiography in predicting resectability of tumors of the pancreatic head and retrospectively examined whether diagnostic laparoscopy would have contributed additional staging information.The records of 67 patients with tumors of the pancreatic head were reviewed. Thirty-four patients had unresectable tumors, and 33 had tumors that were considered operable according to CT and angiographic findings.Surgical resection was successful in 27 of 33 patients (82%). Surgical resection was abandoned in 6 cases due to inability to develop a plane behind the pancreatic head in 4 cases, peritoneal implants in 1 case, and an occult hepatic metastasis in 1 case. Diagnostic laparoscopy might have detected metastases in the latter two cases. Thus, in retrospect, diagnostic laparoscopy might have altered management in only 2 of 33 surgical cases (7%).The potentially limited usefulness of diagnostic laparoscopy in this series, in retrospect, raises the question of whether routinely using diagnostic laparoscopy in staging tumors of the pancreatic head is cost effective.Pancreatic cancer. Laparoscopic staging and peritoneal cytology.Laparoscopy is an indispensable study if precise preoperative staging for pancreatic cancer is required. It will identify liver, peritoneal, or omental implants in 22% to 48% of patients who have no other evidence of disseminated disease by CT. Performing peritoneal washings at the time of laparoscopy will disclose an additional 8% of patients with micro metastases and who have an equally poor prognosis as those with visible metastases.Computed tomography and laparoscopy in the assessment of the patient with pancreatic cancer.In most patients with pancreatic cancer, the tumor is unresectable. Nonoperative methods for palliation of jaundice, duodenal obstruction, and pain currently are being developed. Preoperative assessment of resectability of the tumor is becoming more and more important to avoid unnecessary operations. The aim of this study was to compare computed tomography (CT) and laparoscopy with special reference to the additive role of the latter technique in predicting unresectability of pancreatic cancers.Sixty patients with exocrine pancreatic cancer were assessed prospectively with both CT and laparoscopy. On the basis of metastatic spread or signs of vascular involvement, the radiologist and the laparoscopist independently reported the tumors as probably unresectable or resectable.The predictive value for unresectability was 100% for both CT and laparoscopy. Sensitivity in predicting unresectability was 69% for both techniques, and the corresponding figure for specificity was 100%. When CT and laparoscopy were evaluated together, an improvement in sensitivity to 87% was observed (p < 0.05). Separately, CT and laparoscopy correctly predicted resectability in only 30% and 38% of the patients, respectively. The presence of liver metastases was overlooked by CT in 13 of 32 patients (40%). Every fourth patient who was found to have unresectable tumor at CT was falsely classified as resectable by the laparoscopist, leading to unnecessary laparotomies. On the other hand, 9 of 24 patients (38%) with resectable disease at CT were deemed unresectable at the subsequent laparoscopy.Laparoscopy and CT independently and reliably predicted unresectability of pancreatic cancer, but the methods were inaccurate in forecasting resectability. The results suggest that CT examination should be done in patients who are candidates for attempted curative surgical procedures, whereas laparoscopy should be restricted to Those Judged resectable at CT.Laparoscopic sonography of peripancreatic tumors: preliminary experience.This study was performed to evaluate the use of laparoscopic sonography in patients with suspected peripancreatic tumors and to assess the impact of laparoscopic sonography on patient management.In a prospective study, 24 patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy underwent CT, laparoscopy, and laparoscopic sonography. The pancreas, peripancreatic vasculature, liver, and porta hepatis were evaluated in each patient. Metastases (hepatic, peritoneal, or nodal), extrapancreatic extension of tumor, or vascular encasement was considered evidence of unresectable disease. Histopathology was the standard of reference; unresectable disease was confirmed by biopsy. At the completion of the laparoscopic sonography, each examination was scored according to impact analysis categories that had been prospectively established.Peripancreatic vasculature was adequately shown by laparoscopic sonography in 22 patients (92%), of whom 12 patients had histopathologic evidence of vascular encasement. All 12 cases of vascular encasement were revealed by laparoscopic sonography, and 10 of 12 cases of vascular encasement were revealed by CT. Liver lesions were seen in eight patients (33%). One hemangioma was shown solely by laparoscopic sonography; the other seven liver lesions were revealed by CT, laparoscopy, or both. In six patients (25%), laparoscopic sonography was used to guide biopsy of lesions that were not seen by laparoscopy. Impact analysis showed that laparoscopic sonography provided additional information in eight patients (33%) and altered management in four patients (17%). Of those patients for whom laparoscopic sonography altered management, three patients underwent successful resection after laparoscopic sonography two of these patients had suspected vascular encasement on CT but laparoscopic sonography revealed normal vessels, and the third patient had CT evidence of a liver lesion that was shown to be a cyst on laparoscopic sonography. A fourth patient was spared laparotomy when laparoscopic sonography revealed unsuspected vascular encasement.Preliminary experience suggests that laparoscopic sonography may aid diagnosis and alter management in patients with suspected pancreatic neoplasms.Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography: optimizing resectability in hepatobiliary and pancreatic malignancy.Open laparotomy has traditionally been required to stage hepatobiliary and pancreatic (HBP) cancers accurately. For unresectable patients, costs and morbidity have been high. Today, laparoscopy alone or combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is being examined for its value in defining the extent of malignancy.We have analyzed the effect of routine implementation of this new staging technique in our HBP center. Staging laparoscopy (SL) with LUS was performed in 50 consecutive patients with HBP malignancies. All patients were considered to have resectable tumors as determined by traditional preoperative staging modalities. Primary tumors were located in the liver (n = 7), biliary tract (n = 11), or pancreas (n = 32). An average of 2.7 preoperative studies per patient were performed prior to SL-LUS.Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography predicted resectable tumors in 28 patients (56%). At laparotomy, 26 of 28 were actually resectable: the false-negative rate was 4%. Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography indicated unresectability in 22 patients (44%). Staging laparoscopy alone demonstrated previously unrecognized occult metastases in 11 patients (22%). In 11 other patients (22%) in whom SL alone was negative, LUS established unresectability from vascular invasion (n = 5), lymph node metastases (n = 5), or intraparenchymal hepatic tumor (n = 1). All cases of unresectability due to vascular invasion were validated by laparotomy. Five of six lymph node or hepatic metastases were proved histologically by LUS-guided needle biopsy rather than laparotomy.Unnecessary laparotomy can be safely avoided by SL-LUS in many patients with HPB malignancies, reducing costs and morbidity.Multimodality staging optimizes resectability in patients with pancreatic and ampullary cancer.Few patients with pancreatic cancer have resectable disease at the time of diagnosis, and a variety of nonsurgical techniques are available to provide effective palliation of jaundice and pain. Accurate preoperative staging is essential to identify patients with unresectable disease, thereby minimizing unnecessary surgery. Currently used diagnostic tests include contrast-enhanced computerized tomography (CT), visceral angiography, endoscopic ultrasound, and laparoscopy, but their utility remains controversial. To evaluate the accuracy of these various diagnostic tests, 30 consecutive patients with histologically proven pancreatic or ampullary adenocarcinoma treated between 1992 and 1996 were evaluated. All 30 patients had contrast-enhanced CT and laparoscopy, 22 patients (73%) had visceral angiography, and 16 patients (53%) had endoscopic ultrasound. Individual and combined predictive values of resectability and unresectability as well as the sensitivities and specificities were determined for all diagnostic tests and compared with intraoperative findings. When CT, visceral angiography, and laparoscopy were combined, the predictive values of resectability and unresectability were 75 and 90 per cent, respectively, with a sensitivity of 75 per cent and a specificity of 90 per cent. Therefore, the combined use of selected diagnostic tests proved more effective than any single diagnostic test for accurately staging patients with pancreatic head and ampullary cancers and should be considered to minimize unnecessary surgery.The role of laparoscopy in the management of suspected pancreatic and periampullary malignancies.Laparoscopic evaluation of patients with suspected periampullary malignancies has been utilized more frequently in recent years. Its exact role with regard to staging and surgical bypass for palliation have yet to be clearly defined. To better define the role of laparoscopy in the evaluation and palliation of periampullary malignancy, a retrospective review of the Duke experience was carried out. Fifty-three patients with suspected pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were referred for surgical evaluation at Duke University Medical Center between 1993 and 1995. All patients underwent CT scanning and lesions were classified as resectable or unresectable based on previously established criteria. Patients either underwent laparoscopic evaluation (n = 30; 11 with laparoscopic palliation) or proceeded directly to celiotomy (n = 23). Charts were reviewed for postoperative course including complications, length of stay, and hospital costs. Although laparoscopy had a sensitivity of 93.3% for metastatic disease, CT scans accurately staged 86.8% of patients missing only one patient with peritoneal/hepatic disease. Based on these results, laparoscopy may not be beneficial for every patient with a suspected pancreatic malignancy. Retrospectively an attempt was made to determine which patients benefited from laparoscopy and which patients are best served by proceeding directly to open exploration. From these data we devised an algorithm that outlines an efficient and cost-effective approach for this patient population.The efficacy of laparoscopic staging in patients with upper gastrointestinal tumors.The major advantage of diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with a gastrointestinal tumor is the prevention of unnecessary explorative laparotomies. However, it is doubtful whether this procedure also prevents late laparotomies that are necessary for palliative treatment during follow-up.From January 1992 to July 1995, 233 consecutive patients with gastrointestinal malignancies underwent laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography after routine diagnostic procedures had shown potential curative disease.After diagnostic laparoscopy, laparotomy was not performed in 21% of all patients (47 of 226) because of histologically proven, unresectable, mainly metastatic disease; 6% had esophageal tumors (4 of 64 patients), 43% had liver tumors (10 of 23), 43% had proximal bile duct tumors (9 of 21), 15% had periampullary tumors (17 of 111), and 43% had pancreatic body and tail tumors (3 of 7). Nonoperative palliation was successful in all patients. However, late laparotomies were necessary in 7 of these 47 patients (15%): 5 patients with periampullary tumors and 2 patients with proximal bile duct tumors. All 7 patients underwent a surgical bypass, most due to duodenal obstruction, 1 to 13 months after diagnostic laparoscopy.In this study, diagnostic laparoscopy may have prevented unnecessary laparotomies for exploration or palliation in 18% of all patients (40 of 226). The procedure is of doubtful benefit for patients with esophageal tumors because the current findings show that only 6% of explorative laparotomies could be prevented. In patients with periampullary tumors, the initial benefit was 15%, but the risk of a late laparotomy is relatively high (30%).[Efficacy and economic aspects of preoperative diagnosis: laparoscopy is useful in only 13% of patients with pancreatic carcinoma].The value of diagnostic laparoscopy to improve tumor staging in patients with pancreatic and periampullary cancer is still a matter of controversial discussion, especially with regard to whether diagnostic laparoscopy can identify patients in whom a laparotomy can be avoided due to metastases. To answer this question, all patients who underwent operations for pancreatic cancer (n = 97) or periampullary cancer (n = 30) between 11/1993 and 12/1995 were evaluated. Only 10% of the patients with periampullary/pancreatic cancer and 13% with pancreatic cancer could avoid laparotomy through diagnostic laparoscopy. Due to these low numbers, a diagnostic laparotomy cannot be recommended in general in patients with pancreatic and/or periampullary cancer on economic grounds and because of the risk of trocar metastases.Diagnostic-staging laparoscopy.Recently instead of the old fashioned, traditional explorative laparotomy the newer up-to-date procedure, the diagnostic-staging laparoscopy has been generally used in the everyday surgical practice of the Authors. Evaluating 32 diagnostic and staging laparoscopy Authors draw the attention to the importance of this procedure which has high diagnostic value, and reduces the complication rate. Biopsy, cytology, frozen section can be done. Authors carries out diagnostic and staging laparoscopy in cases of esophageal, liver, stomach and pancreas tumours just immediately before surgery.The role of laparoscopy and ultrasonography in pancreatic head carcinoma.Laparoscopic screening of surgical candidates with pancreatic cancer or liver tumors.Patients with colorectal or pancreatic cancers may have peritoneal implants which are too small to be detected by current radiologic imaging techniques. Since such implants often preclude surgical removal of the primary tumor or isolated metastasis, their detection prior to open abdominal exploration may spare patients the morbidity of a large abdominal incision when there is no benefit to resection and lifespan is limited.In the past 30 months, patients with pancreatic cancer, hepatoma, or isolated colorectal cancer metastases, who were candidates for surgical resection on the basis of standard radiologic scans, were examined with the laparoscope through a 10-mm periumbilical incision prior to undertaking open abdominal exploration. If unexpected implants were noted, biopsy was obtained through a 5-mm port placed through a convenient site.Since January 1993, 11 patients with pancreatic carcinoma, three patients with primary hepatic malignancies, and 12 patients with isolated metastases from colorectal cancers have undergone laparoscopic examination prior to celiotomy. Eight of these patients had unexpected peritoneal or liver involvement which precluded resection. Laparoscopy was successful in detecting disease in six such patients (75%).Although adding 20-30 min to the operative time when unrevealing, laparoscopy provided an effective way to avoid celiotomy in patients with carcinomatosis.[Value of laparoscopic staging and palliative treatment of peri-ampullary tumors; the Stentby Study].Combined endoscopic ultrasonography and laparoscopic ultrasonography in the pretherapeutic assessment of resectability in patients with upper gastrointestinal malignancies.Even though endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has improved the pretherapeutic staging and assessment of resectability in patients with upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract malignancies, a considerable number of patients still have to undergo unnecessary explorative laparotomy to obtain the final assessment of resectability. The aim of the present study was to evaluate laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) and the combination of EUS and LUS in the pretherapeutic study of these patients with special reference to resectability.Each of 44 patients with esophageal, gastric, or pancreatic cancer was assigned to a treatment-related resectability group based on five different imaging modalities: computer tomography (CT) + ultrasonography (US), EUS, laparoscopy, LUS, and EUS + LUS. The findings with these imaging modalities were compared with intraoperative findings.Overall group assignment accuracy showed significantly better results for EUS, LUS, and EUS + LUS than for CT + US and laparoscopy. EUS + LUS identified all non-resectable patients, whereas the sensitivity of CT + US, laparoscopy, and EUS were 14%, 36%, and 79%, respectively. Median time consumption for each EUS, laparoscopy, or LUS procedure was less than 25 min, and no complications were seen during or after the EUS, laparoscopy, or LUS procedures.Preliminary experience with the combination of EUS and LUS for pretherapeutic assessment of upper GI tract malignancies showed that this combination was superior to CT + US, laparoscopy, and EUS. EUS + LUS correctly identified all non-resectable patients, but two overstaged patients also indicated the need for larger prospective studies to identify the indications and the limitations of this new approach.Ultrasound-guided fine needle biopsy and laparoscopy in the study of pancreatic masses: report on 136 cases.The authors report their experience from 136 fine needle ultrasound (FN-US)-guided biopsies and laparoscopies. The pancreatic diseases considered by these methods were as follows: 9 cases of Pancreatitis, 11 cases of Pancreatic cysts, 5 cases of endocrine cancer, 109 cases of Exocrine cancer and 2 not conclusive cases. Diagnostic accuracy of FNB and laparoscopy was evaluated for each group and, in particular, for cancer patients. In the latter group, FNB helped to detect abdominal diffusion in 25 cases (33%) while laparoscopy, including laparoscopic washing, revealed a micro-diffusion in 31 cases (55%), the latter not shown previously by CT, RNM and US. The combination of these methods allows us to confirm the advanced stage of the majority of pancreatic cancers at onset. Furthermore, this seems to be a very reliable method to select resectable patients, thus avoiding useless, sometimes hazardous and expensive further investigation.The value of minimal access surgery in the staging of patients with potentially resectable peripancreatic malignancy.The purpose of this study was to determine if an endosurgical approach that mimics open exploration would improve the accuracy of simple diagnostic laparoscopy. SUMMARY BACKGROUND DATA; Most patients with peripancreatic malignancy are found at exploration to be unable to undergo resection. Laparoscopy has been suggested as a sensitive method for detecting metastatic disease in this group of patients. However, the ability to assess resectability with simple diagnostic laparoscopy remains relatively low (<40%).Between December 1992 and August 1994, 115 patients with radiologically resectable peripancreatic tumors underwent extended laparoscopy before undergoing a planned curative resection. This technique required assessment of the peritoneal cavity, liver, lesser sac, porta hepatis, duodenum, transverse mesocolon, and celiac and portal vessels.Sixty male and 55 female patients were included in the current study. The pancreatic head was involved in 74 patients (64%), followed by the body in 21 (18%), tail in 8 (7%), ampulla in 8 (7%), duodenum in 3 (3%), and distal bile duct in 1 (1%). An abdominal computed tomography (CT) scan was performed for all patients before laparoscopy, ultrasonography for 74 patients (64%), endoscopic retrograde choleangiopancreatography for 59 patients (51%), and mesenteric angiography for 9 patients (8%). Pneumoperitoneum was established successfully in all but 2 cases (98%). A complete examination of 108 patients was performed. Sixty-seven patients were considered to have resectable disease, and 61 resections were performed. Laparoscopy failed to identify hepatic metastases in 5 patients and portal venous encasement in 1 patient. Unresectable disease was identified in 41 patients. Hepatic metastases were observed in 20 patients, mesenteric vascular encasement in 14, extrapancreatic/peritoneal involvement in 16, and celiac or portal lymphatic metastases in 8. There were no intraoperative or postoperative complications related to the laparoscopic procedure. The positive predictive index, negative predictive index, and accuracy of laparoscopy were 100%, 91%, and 94%, respectively.This study demonstrates that extended laparoscopy is accurate and safe and makes exploration unnecessary in many patients with potentially resectable peripancreatic malignancy. In this series, 76% of patients explored were resected, compared with the authors' experience between 1983 and 1993 of 35%. The authors believe that laparoscopy is an important component in the staging of this group of patients and should be performed before exploration.[Contribution of laparoscopic echography in the staging of curative resection of cancer of the pancreatic head (26 cases)].In a prospective study, 26 patients with pancreatic and peri-ampullary cancer were evaluated with ultrasound (US), computerized tomography (CT Scan), endoscopic ultra sonography (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Sensitivity of US and CT scan were comparable, although CT scan seems better to evaluate the size of the tumor and for lymph node detection. 50 per cent of patients had a criterion for noncurative resection. EUS (16 cases) had the best sensitivity (100 per cent) for the staging of small tumors (less than 20 millimeters), detection of adjacent nodes and the relation between tumor and mesenteric and portal veins. EUS was not able to detect peritoneal and/or liver micro-metastases (44 per cent of them would be missed by this examination alone). The criterion for noncurative resection was 56.6 per cent. LUS exactly assessed all tumors larger than 3 centimeters (100 per cent). The accuracy compared with endoscopic ultra-sonography was not as good for small tumors and adjacent nodes, was equal for the venous relations with tumors, but better concerning micro-peritoneal or hepatic metastasis. The criterion for noncurative resection was 80 per cent. These results suggest to use of US and CT as first-line procedures in the pre-operative staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancers. When the patient does not appear to have disseminated lesions (50 per cent), endoscopic ultra-sonography gives a good estimation of the size of the tumor, node assessment and vascular relations. LES could be the first step for a curative surgical treatment LES revealed to discover 15 to 30 per cent of unknown micrometastases and avoided useless laparotomy in these patients.[Is diagnostic laparoscopy a reliable addition to preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma?].Over the last decade several authors proposed adopting diagnostic laparoscopy as an early diagnostic routine method in the staging of pancreatic carcinoma to prevent exploratory laparotomy. In our hospital only 11.6% of all patients who underwent explorative laparotomy would have benefitted from diagnostic laparoscopy. Therefore, we do not recommend diagnostic laparoscopy as a routine method to assess resectability of pancreatic carcinoma?[Diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography: value of staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic carcinoma].The dismal prognosis of pancreatic cancer and the development of new, minimally invasive bypass techniques require a differentiated indication for open pancreatic resection. Diagnostic modalities, which facilitate an accurate assessment of resectability, have to be found. Modern imaging and endoscopic techniques fullfill these requirements in only about 50% of cases. Diagnostic laparoscopy is the only method for visualization of peritoneal metastases. The use of diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic sonography raises the resectability rate to between 75% and 100%. 33% up to 67% of patients deemed resectable by preoperative imaging show signs of irresectable cancer at laparoscopy and can be spared a negative laparotomy. These patients can be treated by laparoscopic or endoscopic bypass techniques.Diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in staging of cancer of the pancreatic head region.Diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in staging of cancer of the pancreatic head region.The aim of this study was to assess the additional role of diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of patients with pancreatic head malignancy. Between January 1993 and June 1994, 73 patients with stage I cancer of the pancreatic head determined by preoperative investigation (endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and Doppler ultrasonography) were eligible for laparoscopic ultrasonography. The peritoneal cavity was investigated for peritoneal deposits, intrahepatic metastases, malignant infiltration of the portal and superior mesenteric vessels, and N3 lymph node metastases. All patients without histologically proven metastases proceeded to laparotomy. Seventy patients were eligible for evaluation. Sixteen of the 21 patients with distant metastases were diagnosed by laparoscopy with ultrasonography. Forty-nine patients had surgical exploration and trial dissection to assess local resectability. Twenty-nine patients (41 per cent) had resectable pancreatic head tumours. The positive predictive value of local ingrowth as determined by laparoscopic sonography was 93 per cent. Laparotomy was avoided in 19 per cent of patients and the preoperative stage was changed in 41 per cent. Laparoscopy including ultrasonography was effective in staging pancreatic head malignancy.[Place of celioscopy in the diagnosis of invasiveness of digestive cancers].The adequate treatment of gastrointestinal tract carcinoma requires accurate preoperative staging. Laparoscopy has been advocated for this purpose. We reviewed the data of 12 patients and the literature to compare the results of laparoscopic staging to those of conventional imaging (ultrasonography-CT scan). Laparoscopy was more sensitive in the diagnosis of peritoneal and lives metastases. It was inadequate for the diagnosis of lymph node metastases. Laparoscopy was especially useful in patients with esophagus, stomach, pancreas and liver cancers. Laparoscopic ultrasonography improved the staging of pancreatic carcinoma and the diagnosis of liver metastases.[Laparoscopic staging of gastrointestinal tumors].Laparoscopic staging was carried out in 28 cases with carcinomas of the distal esophagus, cardia, stomach or pancreas. The intention was first to rule out peritoneal carcinomatosis and secondly to see, whether RO-resection would be possible, mainly for the reason of therapeutic splitting. The diagnostic accuracy can be raised to 95% using laparoscopic ultrasound, exploration of the lesser sac of the peritoneum and tissue sampling in combination with preoperative endoscopy and radiography. In 39.3% of the investigated patients the staging must be corrected after laparoscopic staging compared with the preoperative findings. 35.7% of the patients did not need explorative laparotomy.[Preoperative laparoscopic evaluation of patients with upper gastrointestinal cancer].Nineteen consecutive patients with adenocarcinoma of the stomach or pancreas, in whom preoperative ultrasonography and computed tomography were unable to assess the possibility of surgical resection, had a diagnostic laparoscopy performed. In 16 cases the operability could be established from the findings at laparoscopy. All laparoscopies were carried out without major morbidity and with a short postoperative hospital stay. It is concluded that patients belonging to this category should have a diagnostic laparoscopy performed in order to avoid futile laparotomies, which in cases that are unsuitable for surgical treatment are associated with emotional stress, physical morbidity and a prolonged hospital stay.[Diagnostic-operative laparoscopy. Our experience].Diagnostic laparoscopy has been an integral part of our surgical practice for over 4 years. Between 1988-1992, 100 diagnostic laparoscopies have been performed in this institution without mortality. We have found the procedure to be particularly useful in the following situation: 1) Hepatobiliary disease where it is used in conjunction with targeted liver biopsy. 2) Acute emergency cases. These include the diagnosis of acute peritonitis, abdominal trauma and in patients with suspected mesenteric ischaemia. 3) In the staging of intra-abdominal malignancy especially gastric, oesophageal, colonic, peritoneal and pancreatic neoplasms.[Prediction of resectability and of surgical risk in pancreatic carcinoma; conditioning factors of survival after resective intervention].Pancreatic cancer has been extensively researched in recent years, but overall survival after diagnosis is almost unchanged since the time of Whipple. In the meantime, we have tried to determine the factors influencing surgical risk, resectability and survival. Between 1968 and 1992, 516 patients with pancreatic cancer were monitored; 160 patients with cancer of the body-tail were excluded. Eighty-five of the remaining 356 patients with pancreatic head cancer were resected, while the remainder underwent only palliative procedures. Surgical outcome, in terms of operative mortality or complications, was correctly predicted preoperatively in > 80% of patients. The preoperative evaluation of the resectability of pancreatic cancer has been investigated with different, mainly invasive, procedures. CT scan, associated with angiography and laparoscopy is reported to give better results, with a resectability rate up to 78%. 67% of our patients who were diagnosed as resectable according to CT-scan features and serum CA 19-9 < 200 U/ml, were actually resected; furthermore 40% had a potentially curative resection. Most of our 'curative' resections (80%) were within this group of patients. Multivariate analysis showed only 4 factors influencing long-term survival: TNM stage, diabetes, age > 70 years, tumour grading.[The role of laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology in the preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma].The staging of pancreatic cancer still represents a challenge for surgeons involved in this field; radiological diagnostic methods used routinely (CT, NMR, angiography) may under-estimate this neoplasm; in fact, the presence of peritoneal or subglissonian hepatic micrometastasis (< 2 cm) is a frequent surprise at laparotomy and force the surgeon to undertake a palliative procedure. This policy need not be followed because it is possible to perform non-surgical palliation of jaundice or pain respectively by percutaneous radiological stent insertion and coeliac alcoholisation. Pre-operative staging thus acquires an important role in the correct treatment, surgical or medical. Laparoscopy allows us to overcome the understaging of the more common diagnostic methods and view directly the coelomatic space and the surface of the abdominal viscera; moreover during this procedure it is possible to perform a peritoneal wash to obtain other information on the cancer stage. We judged 56 patients by radiological diagnosis; 31 were excluded from surgery by laparoscopy; 10 of the other 25 cases were submitted to radical resection. The resectability operative rate was 40%, compared with 18% if we had submitted patients to surgery. Several patients underwent peritoneal wash, always with negative results; all were submitted to surgery and radically resected. In our opinion, laparoscopy and peritoneal wash represent useful tools in the staging of patients affected with pancreatic cancer.Laparoscopic ultrasonography for hepatobiliary and pancreatic malignancy.Despite the advances made since the introduction of ultrasonography, computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging, a wide discrepancy may occur between preoperative and peroperative staging of gastrointestinal malignancy with liver and peritoneal metastases. Diagnostic laparoscopy performed immediately before a planned laparotomy can provide valuable information for the accurate assessment and appropriate management of some forms of gastrointestinal malignancy, especially that of the liver and pancreas. For evaluation of small liver and retroperitoneal malignancies, intraoperative ultrasonography performed by laparotomy is of proven value. It is now technically possible to perform ultrasonography through a laparoscopic cannula using high-resolution ultrasonographic transducers. This combination of laparoscopy and ultrasonography was studied in 25 patients with established liver lesions, carcinoma of the gallbladder or pancreatic cancer. Additional information leading to a change in surgical approach was obtained in 20 patients. Laparoscopic ultrasonography, although still in a preliminary phase of development, is a simple and reliable technique that will contribute to more accurate staging of intra-abdominal malignancy.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer by endoscopy.Preoperative staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer.To study the accuracy of preoperative staging techniques for assessing resectability of pancreatic and ampullary adenocarcinoma, we entered 88 consecutive candidates into a prospective study of contrast-enhanced computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, angiography, and laparoscopy. Resectability was proved in 16 (29%) of 55 patients for the head of the pancreas, 1 (6%) of 17 for the body and tail of the pancreas, and 14 (88%) of 16 for the ampulla. The combined findings of computed tomography and angiography showed that more than 87% of pancreatic head tumors were unresectable because of vascular encasement, but neither modality sufficed alone. Small liver and peritoneal metastases were found in 15 (27%) of 55 cancers of the head of the pancreas, 11 (65%) of 17 cancers of the body and tail of the pancreas, and 1 (6%) of 16 cancers of the ampulla; computed tomography missed all but 2 of these instances of metastasis, but laparoscopy with biopsy identified 22 (96%) of 23 instances. Magnetic resonance imaging findings did not differ significantly from computed tomography and conferred no added benefit. Ninety percent of unresectable tumors were identified. Seventy-eight percent of pancreatic head cancers were resectable when all test results were negative vs 5% (2/37) when any test result was positive. This study demonstrates that accurate and efficient triage is possible for patients with cancer of the pancreas and ampulla.[Laparoscopic assessment of the operability of pancreatic cancer].Results are reported of laparoscopic examination of 78 patients with pancreatic cancer. The methods used were laparoscopic inspection and palpation of the pancreas, laparoscopic biopsy by mono- and bipuncture method, laparoscopic inspection and palpation of the organs of bursa omentalis. As a result of these investigations, dissemination outside the pancreas was established in 57 patients (73.1 per cent) in the outpatient services, before entering hospital. The other 21 patients (26.9 per cent) were subjected to radical or palliative surgical interventions. The importance of laparoscopy for evaluation of the operability and for selection of patients, entering surgical clinics, is emphasized.Laparoscopy for pancreatic cancer: does it benefit the patient?The findings in 73 patients undergoing laparoscopy for pancreatic cancer have been reviewed. The procedure was performed immediately prior to a proposed laparotomy which was undertaken in 51 patients. In this subgroup, 42 patients were correctly staged as having incurable/inoperable disease by laparoscopy but only four out of nine patients judged to be resectable were found to be operable at laparotomy. Laparoscopic target biopsy/fine needle cytology of the primary or its secondary deposits confirmed the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in 61 out of 65 patients (92%). Whereas the majority of hepatic deposits visualized by laparoscopy had been detected by the prelaparoscopic imaging tests, peritoneal and omental deposits were only identified by laparoscopy. Laparoscopy is a useful procedure in the staging of patients with pancreatic cancer and establishes the diagnosis of advanced disease thereby, obviating a laparotomy in all those patients in whom surgical palliation is not indicated. The procedure should be performed in those patients in whom a laparotomy is contemplated.Laparoscopy in the staging and planning of therapy for pancreatic cancer.Although staging of pancreatic cancer is critical to the planning of therapy, many patients come to laparotomy with liver or peritoneal metastases not suspected or detected during conventional preoperative testing. We performed laparoscopic examinations as part of the staging evaluation of 40 patients with proved pancreatic cancer who were candidates for curative resection or intraoperative radiotherapy. In each patient, laparoscopy was the last test before laparotomy and was carried out only if all other test results were negative for metastases. In 14 of 40 patients, single, small (1 to 2 mm) metastatic nodules were detected and verified by biopsy in the liver (6 patients), on the parietal peritoneum (7 patients), and in the omentum (1 patient). It is likely that several of these lesions would have been overlooked at routine exploration. Because of the positive findings, therapy was altered in all 14 patients. None received intraoperative radiotherapy, nine who did not have jaundice were discharged without operation, three had biliary or gastric bypass only, and two were treated by percutaneous biliary stenting. Of the 26 patients who had negative findings on laparoscopic examination, the absence of gross metastasis was confirmed at laparotomy in 23. Three false-negative findings were caused by incomplete examination of the liver in two patients and a central liver lesion in one patient. Therefore, 43 percent of all patients (17 of 40) had demonstrable but unsuspected nonlocal metastases, and laparoscopic examination detected 82 percent (14 of 17) of these. The overall accuracy of laparoscopy was 93 percent and that of examination with negative findings, 88 percent. In eliminating useless laparotomy and redirecting treatment plans, laparoscopy contributes significantly both to the proper management of patients with pancreatic cancer and to increased efficiency of resource utilization.Laparoscopy and biopsy in the diagnosis of malignant intra-abdominal tumors.Laparoscopic evaluation was effected in 298 patients with intra-abdominal tumors. Among 186 cases of liver tumor, 172 cases (92.5%) were diagnosed as tumors laparoscopically and malignant tissue was obtained in 71 cases (78.0%) out of 91 cases of liver tumors biopsied under laparoscopic guidance. Among 79 cases of pancreas tumors, laparoscopy led to the correct diagnosis in 32% (38 cases) of carcinoma of the head of the pancreas and 88% (41 cases) of carcinoma of the body and tail of the pancreas. The positive rate of biopsy in cases of tumor of the head of the pancreas and of the body and tail of the organ was 74.1% (20 out of 27 cases) and 84.6% (33 out of 39 cases), respectively. Laparoscopy supplemented by biopsy was useful for the diagnosis of submucosal tumors of the digestive tract and disseminated peritoneal tumors.Peritoneoscopy and pancreas biopsy in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases.Peritoneoscopy and pancreatic biopsy under direct vision were performed on 124 cases with a variety of pancreatic diseases by means of supragastric pancreoscopy and supragastric bursoscopy. Among 53 cases of pancreatitis, the pancreas was directly observed in 38 (72%). Among 71 cases of pancreatic carcinoma, observation of pancreas head carcinoma was accomplished in 32% and for pancreas body carcinoma, 85%. Peritoneoscopic biopsy of the pancreas had good diagnostic accuracy with negligible complications.[Diagnostic value of preoperative laparoscopy in detection of neoplastic changes].Value of laparoscopy in the diagnosis and management of pancreatic carcinoma.Our experience with laparoscopy in the diagnosis and staging of 23 cases of pancreatic cancer is reported. This endoscopic procedure has proved useful in the diagnosis of the disease, in the assessment of operability, and in the retrieval of material for histological and cytological confirmation of pancreatic cancer. An infra-gastric laparoscopic method for inspection of the body and tail of the pancreas is described and the technique may allow the earlier detection of neoplasms in this region.[Comparison of laparoscopic, surgical and histological findings in the diagnosis of malignant pancreatic tumors].[OUR EXPERIENCES WITH LAPAROSCOPIC EXPLORATION].Evolving preoperative evaluation of patients with pancreatic cancer: does laparoscopy have a role in the current era?Recent years have brought important developments in preoperative imaging and use of laparoscopic staging of patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma (PAC). There are few data about the optimal combination of preoperative studies to accurately identify resectable patients.We conducted a statewide review of all patients with surgically managed PAC from 1996 to 2003 using data from the Oregon State Cancer Registry, augmented with clinical information from primary medical record review. We documented the use of all staging modalities, including CT, endoscopic ultrasonography, and laparoscopy. Primary outcomes included resection with curative intent. The association between staging modalities, clinical features, and resection was measured using a multivariate logistic regression model.There were 298 patients from 24 hospitals who met the eligibility criteria. Patients were staged using a combination of CT (98%), laparoscopy (29%), and endoscopic ultrasonography (32%). The overall proportion of patients who went to surgical exploration and were resected was 87%. Of patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy, metastatic disease that precluded resection was discovered in 24 (27.6%). For patients who underwent diagnostic laparoscopy and were not resected, vascular invasion was the most common determinant of unresectability (56.6%). In multivariate analysis, preoperative weight loss and surgeon decision to use laparoscopy predicted unresectability at laparotomy.This population-based study demonstrates that surgeons appear to use laparoscopy in a subset of patients at high risk for metastatic disease. The combination of current staging techniques is associated with a high proportion of resectability for patients taken to surgical exploration. With current imaging modalities, selective application of laparoscopy with a dual-phase CT scan as the cornerstone of staging is a sound clinical approach to evaluate pancreatic cancer patients for potential resectability.Preoperative CA 19-9 and the yield of staging laparoscopy in patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Staging laparoscopy for patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma has been reported to yield an 8-15% finding of unresectable disease. Factors associated with the likelihood of subradiographic unresectable disease have not been clearly defined.A prospectively maintained pancreatic database was reviewed and patients were identified who underwent staging laparoscopy for radiographically resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 2000 and December 2006. Preoperative carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA 19-9) values were assessed for their association with the presence of subradiographic unresectable disease.Four hundred ninety-one patients underwent staging laparoscopy. Resection was performed in 80% (n = 395). Of the 96 patients with unresectable disease, 75 (78%) had metastases either in the liver (n = 60) or peritoneum (n = 15). Preoperative CA 19-9 values were available for 262 of the 491 patients. Fifty-one of these patients had unresectable disease, of which 78% were due to distant disease. The median preoperative CA 19-9 value for patients who underwent resection was 131 U/ml versus 379 U/ml for those patients with unresectable disease (P = 0.003). A receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curve was developed for preoperative CA 19-9 value and tumor resectability. The statistically optimal cutoff value was determined to be 130 U/ml. Unresectable disease was identified in 38 of the 144 patients (26.4%) with a preoperative CA 19-9 >or= 130 U/ml, and in 13 of the 118 patients (11%) with a CA 19-9 < 130 U/ml (P = 0.003). CA 19-9 values greater than 130 U/ml remained a predictor of tumor unresectability on multivariate regression analysis [hazard ratio (HR) 2.70, 95% confidence interval (CI) 1.34-5.44; P = 0.005].In this study, preoperative CA 19-9 values were strongly associated with the identification of subradiographic unresectable disease. Preoperative CA 19-9 values may allow surgeons to better select patients for staging laparoscopy.Preoperative prediction of complete resection in pancreatic cancer.Accurate preoperative staging is essential in pancreatic cancer to select the 15% of patients who can benefit from surgery and avoid surgery in the 85% with advanced disease. With improvements in computed tomography (CT) scanning, the value of routine laparoscopy for preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer has been questioned because it changes the preoperative plan in less than 20% of unselected cases.We retrospectively reviewed our experience with preoperative staging in 88 consecutive patients with pancreatic cancer. All patients had preoperative CT scans, and selective criteria were used to determine which patients would also undergo preoperative staging laparoscopy. Patients were categorized preoperatively as resectable or not resectable (locally advanced or metastatic). Medical records, operative, and pathology reports were reviewed to determine the accuracy of preoperative predictions.Thirty patients were deemed resectable based on CT alone and 27 (90%) were resected (25 R0, 2 R1). Two (7%) had metastatic disease discovered at laparotomy and one (3%) had a R2 resection. Only 19 patients (39%) of 49 patients deemed resectable by CT met our selective criteria for preoperative staging laparoscopy. Laparoscopy changed the treatment plan in 11 (58%) of these patients. Eight were still deemed resectable after staging laparoscopy and 7 (88%) were resected (6 R0, 1 R1). One patient (12%) had metastatic disease diagnosed at laparotomy. If selective staging laparoscopy were eliminated from our algorithm, 49 patients would have been deemed potentially resectable based on CT alone, 34 (69%) would have been found to be resectable at laparotomy (31 R0, 3 R1), and 15 (31%) would have been found to be unresectable at laparotomy (positive predictive value of 69%). The addition of selective staging laparoscopy avoided unnecessary laparotomy in 11 patients and increased the positive predictive value to (34/38) 89%.Selective use of laparoscopy increases the positive predictive value of preoperative staging in pancreatic cancer and avoids unnecessary laparoscopy in the majority of patients.Diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with potentially resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma: is it cost-effective in the current era?For patients with potentially resectable pancreatic cancer, diagnostic laparoscopy may identify liver and peritoneal metastases that are difficult to detect with other staging modalities. The aim of this study was to utilize a population-based pancreatic cancer database to assess the cost effectiveness of preoperative laparoscopy.Data from a state cancer registry were linked with primary medical record data for years 1996-2003. De-identified patient records were reviewed to determine the role and findings of laparoscopic exploration. Average hospital and physician charges for laparotomy, biliary bypass, pancreaticoduodenectomy, and laparoscopy were determined by review of billing data from our institution and Medicare data for fiscal years 2005-2006. Cost-effectiveness was determined by comparing three methods of utilization of laparoscopy: (1) routine (all patients), (2) case-specific, and (3) no utilization.Of 298 potentially resectable patients, 86 underwent laparoscopy. The prevalence of unresectable disease was 14.1% diagnosed at either laparotomy or laparoscopy. The mean charge per patient for routine, case-specific, and no utilization of laparoscopy was $91,805, $90,888, and $93,134, respectively.Cost analysis indicates that the case-specific or routine use of laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer does not add significantly to the overall expense of treatment and supports the use of laparoscopy in patients with known or suspected pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Combined endoscopic and laparoscopic ultrasound as preoperative assessment of patients with pancreatic cancer.An accurate pre-therapeutic assessment of the resectability in pancreatic cancer patients is essential to reduce the number of futile surgical explorations. The aim of this study was to assess the combination of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) regarding the detection of patients with non-resectable tumours.From 2002 to 2004, 179 consecutive patients with pancreatic cancer referred for surgical treatment were eligible. Thirty-one (17%) patients were excluded due to co-morbidity and poor performance status. Two patients (1%) were excluded due to metastasis seen on CT scans prior to referral. Thus, 146 patients entered the study. Patients were first examined with EUS followed by LUS, if EUS found no signs of non-resectability. Only patients with tumours found to be resectable or possibly resectable at EUS and LUS were offered surgical treatment. Resectability criteria were defined prior to the study.In all, 108 (74%) patients had non-resectable tumours by the pre-defined criteria. EUS identified 68 (63%) patients and LUS identified an additional 26 (24%) patients. Thus, a total of 94 (87%) patients were non-resectable at either EUS or LUS. Fifty-two (36%) patients underwent surgery. Six patients had surgical exploration and three patients had palliative surgery. Forty-three patients (29%) were resected with curative intention, of whom 38 (88%) had an R0 resection and 5 (12%) had a palliative resection.The combination of EUS and LUS is accurate in identifying the non-resectable patients and has a high predictive value for complete resection.Current utility of staging laparoscopy for pancreatic and peripancreatic neoplasms.The routine use of staging laparoscopy in patients with radiographically resectable pancreatic and peripancreatic neoplasms remains controversial.We reviewed a prospective database that identified 1,045 patients who underwent staging laparoscopy for radiographically resectable pancreatic or peripancreatic tumors between 1995 and 2005. Radiographic resectability was determined by review of radiographic reports, surgeons' notes, and cross-sectional imaging studies. Factors were assessed for their association with the laparoscopic identification of radiographically occult unresectable disease. Recursive partitioning was used to build a decision tree, with laparoscopic identification of unresectable disease as the outcomes, including only patients since 1999 (modern imaging) and factors available preoperatively.Unresectable disease was identified laparoscopically in 145 of the 1,045 radiographically resectable patients (14%). Factors associated with radiographically occult unresectable disease included the time period of the study, whether imaging was performed at our institution (internal versus external imaging), primary site, histology, weight loss, and jaundice. Primary site (pancreatic versus nonpancreatic) was identified as the strongest predictor of yield. In patients with nonpancreatic tumors, the yield of laparoscopy was 4%. In patients with pancreatic tumors, the yield of laparoscopy was 14% overall, but was 8.4% in patients with internal imaging versus 17% in patients with external imaging (p < 0.01). This higher-risk subgroup was partitioned by the presence of weight loss, then by primary site within the pancreas.During the time period of this study, the yield of staging laparoscopy decreased and exceeded 10% only for patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. When high-quality cross-sectional imaging reveals no evidence of unresectable disease, routine staging laparoscopy may not be warranted for pancreatic or peripancreatic tumors other than presumed pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Assessment of pancreatic malignancy with laparoscopy and intraoperative ultrasound.Staging laparoscopy for pancreatic malignancy is controversial. This study aimed to assess the efficacy of laparoscopy with intraoperative ultrasound in the management of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.The study involved patients undergoing laparoscopy and intraoperative ultrasound over a period of 42 months. The entry criteria specified radiologic (computed tomography) diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma and no evidence of metastases.The study enrolled 100 patients (52 men and 48 women) ages 21 to 83 years (mean, 63 years). On the basis of imaging, 75 patients had lesions judged to be operable, and 25 patients had a pancreatic head lesion larger than 4 cm radiologically, considered to be unresectable, but with no evidence of metastatic disease. At laparoscopy, three patients had a normal examination, with no evidence of a pancreatic mass, and an additional seven patients had other pathology including one lymphoma, one ampullary tumor, two cases of chronic pancreatitis, and three sarcomas. Of the patients with radiologically inoperable disease, 16% had previously undetected metastases, but 24% were judged to be suitable for curative resection. Half of these patients underwent successful resection. Of the patients with radiologically operable disease, undetected liver or peritoneal metastases were found in 20% of the body or tail lesions and in 26% of the pancreatic head lesions. Of the pancreatic head tumors, 12% were found to be larger than 4 cm and therefore unsuitable for curative resection. Consequently, only 53% were confirmed to be suitable for resection. Of the patients explored with a view to curative resection, 42% actually underwent resection, with clearance of resection margins achieved in 77.8%.Of the patients thought to have a resectable tumor on the basis of good quality preoperative imaging, 44% had their management approach altered after laparoscopy and avoided an open procedure. Laparoscopy should therefore be used in the preoperative staging of pancreatic tumors.The influence of positive peritoneal cytology on survival in patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The American Joint Committee on Cancer (AJCC) staging system for pancreatic adenocarcinoma classifies positive peritoneal cytology as stage IV disease. Data are limited with respect to the prevalence of positive peritoneal cytology and its influence on survival in patients with resectable, locally advanced, and metastatic disease. Four hundred sixty-two patients underwent staging laparoscopy for pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 1995 and December 2005. Kaplan-Meier survival comparisons were performed to evaluate the significance of positive peritoneal cytology on overall survival (OS) in resected patients and patients with locally advanced and metastatic disease. Of the 462 patients, 47% (217/462) underwent a pancreatic resection. The 21% (95/462) with locally advanced disease and 32% (150/462) with metastatic disease did not undergo resection. Peritoneal cytology was positive in 17% (77/462), and was associated with stage of disease (metastatic, 37%; locally advanced, 11%; resected, 5%; P=0.01). Positive cytology was not associated with OS in patients with metastatic disease or locally advanced disease, but was in resected patients (median, 16 months vs. 8 months; P<0.001). Node-positive disease was present in 8 of 10 patients resected with positive cytology (2 years OS, 12% positive cytology vs. 23% negative; P=0.006). In this study, patients who underwent resection in the presence of positive peritoneal cytology and absence of other identifiable metastatic disease had a similar survival as other patients with stage IV disease.Patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma benefit from staging laparoscopy.Unnecessary laparotomy in patients with advanced pancreatic cancer may both compromise the quality of life and delay the initiation of more appropriate therapy. Very often, peritoneal small liver metastases and true local status cannot be fully determined without surgery. Laparoscopy may spare laparotomy and decrease morbidity for patients with nonresectable advanced disease. The aim of this study was to determine the impact of laparoscopy in patients with potentially resectable adenocarcinoma of the pancreas.We reviewed the records of patients undergoing pancreatic surgery at the University of Nebraska Medical Center from October 2001 to April 2005. A total of 59 patients were included in the study. All patients were staged radiographically with a high resolution helical computed tomography scan and their tumors were considered resectable. Thirty-seven patients underwent staging laparoscopy while 22 proceeded directly to laparotomy.Of the 37 patients who underwent laparoscopic staging, 9 (24.3%) were detected to have metastatic disease or advanced tumor; the remaining 28 (75.7%) patients with negative laparoscopy proceeded to laparotomy. Of those, 24 patients (85.7%) underwent pancreatic resection with curative intent, while 4 patients had metastatic or locally advanced disease at subsequent laparotomy which was missed on staging laparoscopy (false negative rate of 14.3%). Of the 22 patients who proceeded directly to laparotomy, 16 (72.7%) received curative Whipple resection and 6 (27.3%) were found to have advanced disease and received bypass procedures or biopsy alone.These findings suggest that staging laparoscopy is beneficial in a significant proportion of patients deemed resectable by routine noninvasive preoperative studies. We plan to add intraoperative laparoscopic ultrasound to our staging protocol in order to decrease the false negative rate.The role of laparoscopy in pancreatic surgery.Carcinoma of the pancreas is extremely common, with a five-year mortality rate of about 95-99%. Radical surgery requires good technical skill and can cause complications and operative mortality, but should be avoided in patients with extrapancreatic involvement. Advances in dynamic spiral CT-scan have decreased the number of unnecessary laparotomies. VLS is indicated in cases of pancreatic mass deemed resectable or "doubtful" by CT-scan. Direct laparoscopic visualization can be combined with intraoperative laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS), which has shown a positive predictive value of resectability of 91%. Laparoscopic pancreatoduodenectomy (LPD) shows a high rate of complications and should be performed by very well-trained surgeons. Laparoscopic distal pancreatectomy (LDP) with an "en bloc" splenectomy and spleen preservation should be performed.Refining the role of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in the staging of presumed pancreatic head and ampullary tumours.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound have been validated previously as staging tools for pancreatic cancer. The aim of this study was to identify if assessment of vascular involvement with abdominal computed tomography (CT) would allow refinement of the selection criteria for laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). The details of patients staged with LUS and abdominal CT were obtained from the unit's pancreatic cancer database. A CT grade (O, A-F) of vascular involvement was recorded by a single radiologist. Of 152 patients, who underwent a LUS, 56 (37%) had unresectable disease. Three of 26 (12%) patients with CT grade O, 27 of 88 (31%) patients with CT grade A to D, 17 of 29 (59%) patients with CT grade E and all nine patients with CT grade F were found to have unresectable disease. In all, 24% of patients with tumours <3 cm were found to have unresectable disease. In those patients with tumours considered unresectable, local vascular involvement was found in 56% of patients and vascular involvement with metastatic disease in 17%, while 20% of patients had liver metastases alone and 5% had isolated peritoneal metastases. The remaining patient was deemed unfit for resection. Selective use of laparoscopic ultrasound is indicated in the staging of periampullary tumours with CT grades A to D.CA 19-9 levels predict results of staging laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer.Laparoscopy has emerged as an important staging procedure for determining resectability of pancreatic cancer. However, a small fraction of patients with pancreatic cancer benefit from its use and therefore the routine application of laparoscopy remains controversial. We hypothesized that serum CA 19-9 levels may identify patients who will or will not benefit by laparoscopy. We retrospectively reviewed our database of 63 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma who underwent staging laparoscopy and correlated findings with CA 19-9 levels. Overall, laparoscopy identified metastatic disease in 12 patients (19%). None of those required any further operation. The resectability rate (patients who underwent resection after laparoscopy) was 73.5%. There was one false-negative laparoscopy (1.6%). Patients with higher CA 19-9 levels had significant higher odds of having metastasis identified by laparoscopy (odds ratio, 1.83; 95% confidence interval, 1.03-3.24; P = .04). There was no patient with CA 19-9 levels below 100 U/ml in whom metastatic disease was identified during laparoscopy: 18 patients (28.6%) with CA 19-9 levels below this cutoff point had negative laparoscopy and could have avoided the procedure had this cutoff been used for screening. This would have increased the laparoscopy yield to 26.7%. In patients with adenocarcinoma of the pancreas, low CA 19-9 levels predict low probability of metastatic disease; in those patients, laparoscopy can be spared. On the contrary, patients with elevated CA 19-9 have an increased probability of metastatic disease, and these patients may benefit from diagnostic laparoscopy.Value of laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic cancer is a devastating disease that swiftly robs patients of both quality and quantity of life. It is the fourth leading cause of cancer death in the United States. In 2003, there were 31,860 reported new cases with 31,270 deaths occurring due to lack of effective therapy. Eighty percent of patients present with either advanced local or metastatic disease. Dynamic contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) has become the current staging test of choice. Laparoscopic staging of pancreatic tumors with the addition of ultrasound can reveal intraparenchymal hepatic metastases, small peritoneal metastases, and critical retroperitoneal tumor-vessel relationships approaching the accuracy of open exploration to determine resectability without significantly increasing morbidity or mortality. However, given the current accuracy of high-quality CT, the routine use of diagnostic laparoscopy in pancreatic cancer is not warranted. Diagnostic laparoscopy is recommended in select patients with primary tumors greater than 4 cm, tumors in the body or tail of the pancreas, patients with equivocal findings of metastasis on CT, ascites, or clinical or laboratory findings suggesting advanced disease such as marked weight loss, hypoalbuminemia, and elevated CA 19-9.Computed tomography, endoscopic, laparoscopic, and intra-operative sonography for assessing resectability of pancreatic cancer.Pancreas cancer is the fourth leading cancer killer in adults. Cure of pancreas cancer is dependent on the complete surgical removal of localized tumor. A complete surgical resection is dependent on accurate preoperative and intra-operative imaging of tumor and its relationship to vital structures. Imaging of pancreatic tumors preoperatively and intra-operatively is achieved by pancreatic protocol computed tomography (CT), endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS), and intra-operative ultrasound (IOUS). Multi-detector CT with three-dimensional (3-D) reconstruction of images is the most useful preoperative modality to assess resectability. It has a sensitivity and specificity of 90 and 99%, respectively. It is not observer dependent. The images predict operative findings. EUS and LUS have sensitivities of 77 and 78%, respectively. They both have a very high specificity. Further, EUS has the ability to biopsy tumor and obtain a definitive tissue diagnosis. IOUS is a very sensitive (93%) method to assess tumor resectability during surgery. It adds little time and no morbidity to the operation. It greatly facilitates the intra-operative decision-making. In reality, each of these methods adds some information to help in determining the extent of tumor and the surgeon's ability to remove it. We rely on pancreatic protocol CT with 3-D reconstruction and either EUS or IOUS depending on the tumor location and operability of the tumor and patient. With these modern imaging modalities, it is now possible to avoid major operations that only determine an inoperable tumor. With proper preoperative selection, surgery is able to remove tumor in the majority of patients.Preoperative assessment of pancreatic tumors using magnetic resonance imaging, endoscopic ultrasonography, positron emission tomography and laparoscopy.The appropriate preoperative evaluation of a pancreatic tumor remains a matter of debate.We retrospectively evaluated an institutional strategy including magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), positron emission tomography (PET) and laparoscopy (LAP) for detection and staging of pancreatic tumors suspected to be malignant.In a consecutive series of 59 patients screened by MRI, PET, EUS and LAP between July 1998 and November 2002, 48 patients were found to bear pancreatic adenocarcinoma and surgery was performed in 27 of them. For tumor detection, the sensitivity of EUS was superior to MRI and PET (98 vs. 87.5 and 87.5%, respectively, p = 0.13). MRI best assessed loco-regional staging, i.e. arterial involvement. For the detection of distant metastases, the sensitivity of all preoperative examinations taken separately was low. When laparotomy was performed with a curative intent according to all four examinations, occult metastasis or carcinomatosis was discovered in 7/27 patients and the overall predictive value of resectability was thus 74%. Five-year and median survival were significantly better in resected vs. non-resected patients (39% and 26 months vs. 0% and 8 months, p = 0.0006).MRI can be recommended has the first examination in patients bearing pancreatic tumors, complemented by EUS if the findings of MRI are non-conclusive. For detection of distant metastasis, only the combination of all preoperative examination was proved to be more accurate than a single technique.The prognostic effect of clinical staging in pancreatic adenocarcinoma.The importance of pancreatic cancer staging is uncertain. The aim of this report was to evaluate the accuracy of combined standard imaging techniques in predicting the pathologic stage and to evaluate the prognostic effect of clinical staging to identify patient groups in which laparoscopy and laparotomy could be beneficial.Fifty-four patients were included in this analysis. The techniques used for clinical staging were endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, abdominal computed tomographic scan, and ultrasonography. All patients underwent both clinical and surgical/pathologic staging. A comparison was performed between presurgical stage and surgical/pathologic stage. The prognostic effect of different factors on survival was evaluated with both univariate (log-rank) and multivariate (Cox) analysis.Sensitivity and specificity for vascular involvement were 73.9% and 96.3%, respectively. Sensitivity and specificity for nodal involvement were 63.6% and 95.4%, respectively. A total of 33.3% of patients showed a higher than expected pathologic stage, and 3.7% showed a lower than expected pathologic stage, by comparing clinical and pathologic evaluation. A highly significant correlation was observed between clinical T stage (P = .0067) and tumor diameter (P = .0037) and patient survival. Maximal prognostic differentiation was observed by dividing patients into two groups based on imaging results: group A (favorable prognosis) and group B (unfavorable prognosis). The median survival was 25.1 and 8.0 months for group A and B, respectively. Five-year survival was 20.1% and 0%, respectively (multivariate analysis: P = .0007).Integrated standard imaging studies achieved reasonable diagnostic accuracy in our analysis. A single classification based on clinical stage and tumor diameter evaluated by imaging predicts prognosis in patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Diagnostic laparoscopy in staging pancreatic carcinoma: developments during the past decade.Laparoscopic staging should be used routinely for locally extensive cancer of the pancreatic head.Does multidetector-row CT eliminate the role of diagnostic laparoscopy in assessing the resectability of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma?We hypothesized that the high-quality images from multidetector-row computed tomography (MDCT) would lead to improved sensitivity and specificity for predicting resectable pancreatic head adenocarcinoma, thus diminishing the value of staging laparoscopy.Forty four consecutive patients underwent thin-section dual-phase MDCT to stage their tumor, followed by an attempted pancreaticoduodenectomy. Four radiologists who were blinded to the operative outcome reviewed the scans and graded the presence of distant and nodal metastases, as well as the degree of arterial and portal involvement. The radiologic criteria for resectability were no distant metastasis, a patent portal vein, and < 50% arterial involvement.The overall resectability for this cohort was 52% (23/44). The 21 unresectable cases, included five liver metastases, three peritoneal metastases, and 13 locally invasive tumors. The negative margin resection rate was 34% (15/44). There were no portal vein resections. The sensitivity and specificity of MDCT for predicting resectability were 96% (22/23) and 33% (7/21), respectively. In this cohort, the positive and negative predictive values were 61% (22/36) and 87.5% (7/8), respectively. As determined by univariate logistic regression, only the degree of arterial involvement was a significant predictor of resectability (p = 0.02). As determined by multivariate logistic regression using both arterial and portal involvement, arterial involvement was predictive (p = 0.03) but portal vein involvement was not (p = 0.45).Despite the improvements in image quality obtained with multidetector-row technology, CT imaging remains a relatively nonspecific test for predicting resectability in patients with adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas. Minimally invasive modalities with higher specificity, particularly laparoscopy, continue to have an important role in staging pancreatic head adenocarcinoma.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in the evaluation of pancreatic and periampullary tumours.The pre-operative determination of resectability of pancreatic and peri-ampullary neoplasia assists the selection of patients for surgical or non-surgical treatment. This study investigated whether the addition of laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound to dual-phase helical CT could improve the accuracy of assessment of resectability.Prospective study of 305 patients referred to a single unit for consideration of pancreatic resection who underwent dual-phase helical CT scanning +/- laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound. Data were collected on patient demographics, CT findings, assessment of operability, laparoscopic assessment (LA), surgical procedures and histology.LA was undertaken in 239/305 patients, 190 of whom were considered CT resectable, and 49 CT unresectable. Of the 190 CT resectable patients, LA correctly identified unresectability in 28 (15%: metastases in 15; vascular encasement in 6; anaesthesia for laparoscopy found 7 unfit for major resection) and incorrectly in 2 (vascular encasement), but did not identify unresectability in 33; LA correctly confirmed resectability in the remainder (prediction improved, chi(2) = 9.73, p < 0.01). Of the 49 CT unresectable patients, LA correctly identified resectability in 4, and incorrectly in 12, and correctly identified unresectability in the remaining 33. Sixty-six of the 305 patients did not undergo LA, of whom 23 underwent resection.When added to dual-phase helical CT, laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound provides valuable information that significantly improves the selection of patients for surgical or non-surgical treatment.Laparoscopy is still necessary in the assessment of peri-ampullary neoplasia.Limitation of diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with a periampullary carcinoma.Diagnostic laparoscopy has been generally accepted in staging of patients with a periampullary malignancy. In our institution diagnostic laparoscopy was routinely used since 1992. However, in 1998 it was eliminated from the protocol since in a prospective study a yield of only 13% was found with a histologically proven accuracy of 60% for distant metastases. The effect of implementation of the new protocol on the occurrence of unnecessary laparotomies and the outcome after bypass surgery was assessed.Between January 1999 and December 2001, 186 consecutive patients with a potentially resectable periampullary carcinoma after radiological staging without diagnostic laparoscopy underwent explorative laparotomy with the intention to perform a curative pancreatoduodenectomy. Incidence of unresectability and outcome of palliative surgery were assessed.Resection could not be performed in 65 patients who underwent laparotomy because of metastatic disease (29 patients) and loco-regional tumour ingrowth (34 patients). These patients underwent a bypass procedure with a median survival of 216 days.At laparotomy distant metastases were detected in 16% of the patients. Considering the fact that the detection rate of diagnostic laparoscopy is lower than 100%, the use of staging laparotomy is too limited to justify it as a routine procedure.Staging of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma with spiral CT and endoscopic ultrasonography: an indirect evaluation of the usefulness of laparoscopy.The interest of laparoscopy in the preoperative staging of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma before curative pancreaticoduodenectomy is a matter of controversy and depends on the accuracy of preoperative imaging techniques.To assess the potential value of laparoscopy when a standardised and optimal preoperative staging is performed, including spiral computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS).All consecutive patients operated on with a view to curative pancreaticoduodenectomy for pancreatic head or ampullary adenocarcinoma in our centre from January 1998 to August 2000 were retrospectively studied. All of them had preoperative spiral CT and EUS. Tumour resectability was considered as highly probable (HP) or uncertain (U) according to well-defined criteria. Operative records of patients were reviewed to indirectly assess the effective resectability rate and the criteria responsible for unresectability and which of them would have been identified by laparoscopy if initially performed.69 consecutive patients were studied. Resectability was HP (n = 56) or U (n = 13) after preoperative staging. Curative pancreatoduodenectomy was performed in 53 patients (77%) (48 HP, 5 U). Positive predictive value of preoperative imaging for highly probable resectability was 86% (48/56). Among the 16 unresectable tumours (8 HP, 8 U), the cause of non-resection would have been found at laparoscopy in 9 patients (56%) (6 HP, 3 U). Finally, if initially performed, laparoscopy would have avoided laparotomy in 9/69 patients (13%) (6/56 HP (11%); 3/13 U (23%)).With accurate preoperative staging using spiral CT and EUS, laparoscopy would detect tumours which were unresectable in 13% of patients with pancreatic head cancer. Laparoscopy remains useful in selected patients, such as those with preoperative uncertain resectability, in whom it can prevent unnecessary laparotomy in one fourth of patients.The effects of staging laparoscopy on trocar site and peritoneal recurrence of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy (SL) has been used to assess resectability of patients with pancreatic cancer. It has lead to increased resectability rates and decreased morbidity. However, experimental data suggests that laparoscopy and peritoneal insufflation can promote tumor growth and potential recurrence. Few clinical data exist to allow assessment of whether these theoretical concerns translate into clinical problems. The purpose of this study was to determine if SL increases the incidence of trocar-site and peritoneal recurrence of pancreatic cancer.A retrospective review of all patients evaluated for pancreatic cancer from 1996 to 2001, inclusive, was included in this study. Patients were divided into five groups: nonoperative management (NM), SL followed by resection (SL-R), SL without resection (SL-NR), exploratory laparotomy with resection (EL-R), and exploratory laparotomy without resection (EL-NR). Patient records were assessed for postoperative occurrence of carcinomatosis and/or malignant ascites, trocar- or incisional-site recurrence, use of postoperative chemotherapy or radiation therapy, and survival.A total of 235 patients were included. Peritoneal progression of disease: NM 15.9%, SL 24.2%, EL 31.6% ( p = 0.03). Trocar/incisional recurrence: SL 3.0%, EL 3.9% ( p = NS). Use of chemotherapy/radiotherapy: NM 29.4%, SL-R 76.5%, SL-NR 62.5%, EL-R 69.6%, EL-NR 41.5%. Median survival (months): NM 3; SL-R 15, EL-R 10 ( p = NS); SL-NR 6, EL-NR 5 ( p = NS).SL does not increase the occurrence of trocar-site disease or peritoneal disease progression of pancreatic cancer. Patients who are found not to be resectable by SL are more likely to receive postoperative treatment. However, this does not appear to affect survival greatly. Nevertheless, avoidance of nontherapeutic laparotomy is worthwhile in these patients.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography in judging the resectability of pancreatic head cancer.To explore the clinical value of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) in judging the resectability of pancreatic head cancer.LUS was employed as a prospective diagnosis of tumor staging before exploratory laparotomy in 22 patients diagnosed with pancreatic head cancer to identify whether the liver and peritoneum had small metastases or local invasion to the portal vein, superior mesenteric vessel, aorta, inferior vena cava.In the 22 patients receiving laparoscopy and LUS, we found peritoneal or surface liver metastases (3 patients), hepatic parenchyma metastases (1), and pancreatitis proved by biopsy under ultrasound guidance (1). Laparotomy was avoided in these 5 patients. Of the remaining 17 patients, 8 patients, including 2 patients with portal vein emboli due to tumor metastases had hypertrophic lymph nodes or tumor invasion of local vessels in the peritoneal cavity, retroperitoneum, and omentum and the other 9 patients had resectable tumors shown by LUS. The 17 patients were subjected to exploratory laparotomy, and pancreaticoduodenectomy was successful in 8 patients.Laparoscopy and LUS can be used to precisely estimate the possibility of resection of pancreatic head cancer, and prevent unnecessary exploratory laparotomy and its complications. It can be used as a routine examination before exploratory laparotomy.Staging of abdominal metastases in pancreatic carcinoma by diagnostic laparoscopy and magnetic resonance imaging.Different noninvasive and invasive techniques are available for the detection of abdominal metastases in pancreatic carcinoma. Since small hepatic or peritoneal metastases are a crucial problem which precludes resection, accurate detection is mandatory. We compared laparoscopic staging of abdominal metastases in adenocarcinoma of the pancreas with MRI.55 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma had been screened and 49 entered the retrospective study. All patients had undergone MRI of the upper abdomen with concomitant MR-cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and diagnostic laparoscopy under conscious sedation. Patients without histologic proof of abdominal metastases underwent laparotomy.In 6/10 patients, metastases were correctly detected by laparoscopy, yielding a sensitivity of 60% and a specificity of 92%.MRI predicted metastases in 6/10 patients with 60% sensitivity and 100% specificity. Laparoscopy showed metastases in 3 patients that were missed by MRI, but failed to identify metastases in 3 of 6 patients with metastases on MRI. Though only one patient showed previously undetected metastases during laparotomy, 3 patients with abdominal metastases underwent unnecessary laparotomy due to a lack of histologic proof of malignancy.Whereas diagnostic laparoscopy is sensitive for the detection of small metastases and offers histologic verification, intrahepatic alterations are not detectable by sole visual inspection.MRI may compensate for this deficiency, but histologic proof of malignancy may be problematic. To date, no definite decision in favor of one of the presented procedures for the staging of abdominal metastases can be given.Laparoscopic staging of upper gastrointestinal malignancy.Laparoscopic staging (LS) of upper gastrointestinal malignancy has decreased the number of non-curative laparotomies. However, as radiological techniques have improved the value of this invasive staging technique has decreased, with some units either being more selective or abandoning it altogether for certain tumour types. The aim of the present study is to prospectively evaluate the additional utility of LS of upper gastrointestinal malignancy after radiological staging with modern techniques.One hundred and six consecutive patients assessed as having potentially curable upper gastrointestinal malignancy after radiological staging underwent LS between April 1999 and June 2001. Laparoscopic findings, outcome at laparotomy and complications were prospectively recorded.Laparoscopic staging detected incurable disease in 28 of the 106 patients (26%). The negative likelihood ratio was 0.36 (95% CI 0.24-0.53). Twenty-seven patients were considered incurable because of findings at laparoscopy and one on the findings of laparoscopic ultrasound. Ten patients underwent open palliative procedures and seven had non-therapeutic laparotomies giving a non-curative laparotomy rate of 16%. LS was most useful for primary liver and biliary tract tumours and was least useful for colorectal liver metastases. The most frequent findings denoting incurability were the presence of liver disease (12 cases) and peritoneal metastases (nine cases). Complications occurred in three patients with one death being attributable in part to the laparoscopy.Laparoscopy was useful in decreasing the number of non-therapeutic laparotomies, but laparoscopic ultrasound gave little additional benefit. The utility of LS was dependent on tumour type and in particular was of marginal benefit for colorectal liver metastases. LS remains a useful staging tool but should be applied selectively.The role of staging laparoscopy in hepatobiliary malignancy: prospective analysis of 401 cases.Patients with potentially resectable hepatobiliary malignancy are frequently found to have unresectable tumors at laparotomy. We prospectively evaluated staging laparoscopy in patients with resectable disease on preoperative imaging.Staging laparoscopy was performed on 410 patients with potentially resectable hepatobiliary malignancy. The preoperative likelihood of resectability was recorded. Data on preoperative imaging, operative findings, and hospital course were analyzed.Laparoscopic inspection was complete in 291 (73%) patients. In total, 153 patients (38%) had unresectable disease, 84 of whom were identified laparoscopically, increasing resectability from 62% to 78%. On multivariate analysis, a complete examination, preoperative likelihood of resection, and primary diagnosis were significant predictors of identifying unresectable disease at laparoscopy. The highest yield was for biliary cancers, and the lowest was for metastatic colorectal cancer. In patients with unresectable disease identified at laparoscopy, the mean hospital stay was 3 days, and postoperative morbidity was 9%, compared with 8 days and 27%, respectively, in patients found to have unresectable disease at laparotomy.Laparoscopy spared one in five patients a laparotomy while reducing hospital stay and morbidity. Targeting laparoscopy to patients at high risk for unresectable disease requires consideration of disease-specific factors; however, the surgeons' preoperative impression of resectability is also important.Subaquatic laparoscopy for staging of intraabdominal malignancy.Laparoscopic staging and subsequent palliation in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma.To test the hypothesis that laparoscopic staging improves outcome in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma compared to standard radiology staging.Diagnostic laparoscopy of peripancreatic malignancies has been reported to improve assessment of tumor stage and to prevent unnecessary exploratory laparotomies in 10% to 76% of patients.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound were performed in 297 consecutive patients with peripancreatic carcinoma scheduled for surgery after radiologic staging. Patients with pathology-proven unresectable tumors were randomly allocated to either surgical or endoscopic palliation. All others underwent laparotomy.Laparoscopic staging detected biopsy-proven unresectable disease in 39 patients (13%). At laparotomy, unresectable disease was found in another 72 patients, leading to a detection rate for laparoscopic staging of 35%. In total, 145 of the 197 patients classified as having "possibly resectable" disease after laparoscopic staging underwent resection (74%). Average survival in the group of 14 patients with biopsy-proven unresectable tumors randomly allocated to endoscopic palliation was 116 days, with a mean hospital-free survival of 94 days. The corresponding figures were 192 days and 164 days in the 13 patients allocated to surgical palliation.Because of the limited detection rate for unresectable metastatic disease and the likely absence of a large gain after switching from surgical to endoscopic palliation, laparoscopic staging should not be performed routinely in patients with peripancreatic carcinoma.Staging with helical computed tomography and laparoscopy in pancreatic head cancer.Helical computed tomography provides valuable information about extent of pancreatic cancer. However, it remains difficult to detect small distant metastases. Laparoscopic examination is becoming standard for cancer staging.Between 1995 and 1999, 45 patients with radiologically resectable pancreatic head cancer were analyzed retrospectively to clarify the indications for and role of staging laparoscopy. Computed tomography was examined for tumor size and spread to portal or superior mesenteric veins (PV) and celiac or superior mesenteric arteries (A).There were 29 (64%) patients with resectable disease, 4 (9%) with localized unresectable, and 12 (27%) with metastatic (hepatic in 7 and peritoneal in 5). Patients with metastatic disease were more likely to present with abdominal pain, vomiting, and back pain than were patients with resectable disease (p < 0.05). The mean tumor size and involvement of PV or A were greater in metastatic patients than in resectable patients (p < 0.005 or p < 0.01). The survival rate for patients with metastatic disease was lower than that for patients with resectable disease (p < 0.0001).According to clinical features and computed tomography findings, laparoscopic exploration is recommended for cancer staging. Helical computed tomography and staging laparoscopy categorize patients into those with localized and those with metastatic disease which considerably correlated with survivals.Preoperative laparoscopic examination using surgical manipulation and ultrasonography for pancreatic lesions.Unnecessary laparotomies in patients with advanced pancreatic disease are unlikely to provide any benefits and may compromise both the quality and duration of survival. The purpose of this study was to determine the contribution of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound to the diagnosis or staging, or both, of pancreatic lesions.Fifty-two patients were diagnosed preoperatively with pancreatic cancer. The diagnoses made by laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) were compared with those made prior to the operation. Laparoscopic visualization of the body of the pancreas was obtained via an infragastric approach. For the laparoscopic examination of the head of the pancreas, a retroduodenal approach was used.In 52 patients with cancer of the pancreatic head and body, unresectable findings were observed in 13 patients. Portal vein displacement without other unresectable findings was evident in six patients using LUS, and was confirmed at exploratory laparotomy in five patients. The surgical approaches were changed, with seven patients undergoing an open exploration for biliary drainage and the other six patients receiving endoscopic endoprostheses. In six of the 52 patients, LUS-guided needle biopsies and frozen-section examinations detected chronic pancreatitis (n = 4), a malignant lymphoma (n = 1), and an abdominal tuberculosis (n = 1), which were diagnosed preoperatively as pancreatic cancers and cysts. Only one patient undergoing the laparoscopic procedure had acute pancreatitis; this patient was treated conservatively.LUS, when combined with laparoscopic manipulations, may overcome many of the limitations of laparoscopy alone in the investigation of pancreatic lesions by providing an accurate diagnosis and assessment of the size and extent of the local dissemination.Role of laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound in staging of pancreatic tumours.Radiological imaging alone is not reliable enough in staging of pancreatic cancer. Not only because of poor sensitivity but also because there is a tendency to overstage tumours. The aim of the study was to compare the efficiency of spiral computed tomography (CT), transabdominal ultrasound (US), laparoscopy (LAP) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) in staging of pancreatic tumours.In this prospective study 27 patients underwent pancreatic tumour staging with CT, US, LAP and LUS. The reference standard was operative evaluation or in case of disseminated disease laparoscopic assessment.Although LAP was hindered by adhesions in 11% of the patients the benefit of LAP staging was evident in detecting peritoneal carcinomatosis. The assessment of the local tumour expansion of a pancreatic carcinoma was difficult for all staging modalities. LUS did not change the decision whether to proceed with laparotomy once. In our experience routine use of laparoscopic staging does not benefit patients with pancreatic tumour but in selected cases it may prevent unnecessary laparotomy.Utility of staging laparoscopy in subsets of peripancreatic and biliary malignancies.To determine the relative benefit of staging laparoscopy in peripancreatic and biliary malignancies.Staging laparoscopy has been used in a variety of peripancreatic and biliary malignancies. The utility of the technique in subsets of these types of cancer has not been systematically compared.One hundred fifty-seven patients underwent laparoscopy after conventional tumor staging; 89 were also staged with laparoscopic ultrasonography. Diagnostic categories were cancer of the pancreatic head and uncinate process, cancer of the body and tail of pancreas, cancer of the extrahepatic bile duct, cancer of the gallbladder, and cancer of the ampulla of Vater/duodenum.In patients with cancer of the head of the pancreas, metastatic disease or vascular invasion was discovered frequently by laparoscopy (31%), whereas in ampullary/duodenal cancer it was never found. The laparoscopic findings in cancer of the head of the pancreas had an important influence on treatment decisions, whereas in cancer of the ampulla/duodenum, laparoscopy had no effect on clinical decisions. Laparoscopy also substantially influenced the treatment of gallbladder cancer; in other tumor types, results were intermediate. Laparoscopic ultrasonography was valuable in cancer of the head of the pancreas.The utility of staging laparoscopy depends on diagnosis. It is recommended for continued use in pancreatic head and gallbladder cancers but not in ampullary malignancies.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancers for resectability using laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound.Cancers of the pancreas and periampullary region are rarely curable. We set out to determine the efficacy of laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound in the staging of pancreatic and ampullary malignancies for resectability.Between January 1994 and September 1999, we retrospectively reviewed the laparoscopic staging (LS) of tumors already deemed resectable by standard radiologic criteria in 27 patients using laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Patients found to be resectable by LS evaluation underwent laparotomy (LA). We then compared the results of the LS and LA findings.Of the 27 patients evaluated, 17 were men and 10 were women. Their mean age was 66 years. Preoperative computerized tomography (CT) scans were done in all 27 patients (100%), and transabdominal and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) was done in 21 (78%). By LS, seven patients (26%) were found to have unresectable disease. Two patients with mesenteric tumor infiltration (one with peritoneal implants, and one with a visible liver metastasis) were judged to be unresectable by laparoscopy alone. LUS revealed that one patient had portal vein (PV) occlusion and two had metastases to the lymph nodes or liver that were not revealed by preoperative studies or laparoscopy alone. Among 20 patients (74%) deemed resectable by LS, two (10%) were found to be unresectable at LA, one due to PV involvement and the other due to local tumor extension with superior mesenteric lymph node metastasis. Eighteen of those in whom resection was attempted (90%) were resectable, with no unexpected findings of distant lymph node or hepatic metastasis. Pathology examination showed that eight had regional metastases (44%). The sensitivity of LS in determining unresectability was 77% (seven true positives and two false negatives). The negative predictive value (reflecting resectability) was 90%. Laparoscopy alone had a sensitivity of 44%, with a negative predictive value of 78%. The sensitivity and positive predictive value of LS was 100%, reflecting no false positive examinations.LS can effectively stage most patients and reliably predict which of them will benefit from LA. Intervention for unresectable patients can then be limited to laparoscopic or endoscopic bypass. The main limitation is that LS may underestimate PV and regional lymph node involvement.[Value of laparoscopic ultrasound for staging of gastrointestinal tumors].The objective of this study was to evaluate the impact of laparoscopic ultrasound on the staging of gastrointestinal tumors prospectively.Between 1993 and 2000 staging laparoscopy was performed on 668 patients with various neoplasms. Laparoscopy provided adequate information regarding resectability in 366 patients. Laparoscopic ultrasonography was performed in 302 patients (45%) using an intraoperative ultrasound unit (B & K) and a semiflexible ultrasound probe (5-7.5 MHz). The results of staging laparoscopy were compared to the preoperative staging and histopathology.Compared to preoperative staging laparoscopic ultrasound provided additional information of therapeutic relevance in 46 of 302 cases (15%). In a group of 384 patients with tumors of the upper gastrointestinal tract, laparoscopic ultrasound was performed in 186 cases and showed occult liver metastases, M1-lymph nodes, or nonresectable disease in 26 patients. Overall, this technique improved the staging of esophageal, gastric and pancreatic cancer in 12%, 3%, and 12% of the patients, respectively. Laparoscopic ultrasound proved to be most useful in esophageal and pancreatic cancer with a rate of 52% and 20% information additional to laparoscopy. The relative contribution of laparoscopic ultrasound to the staging of gastric cancer was only 10%.Laparoscopic ultrasound improves the diagnostic accuracy of staging laparoscopy. However, routine use of this technique is only justified, if neoadjuvant therapy--particularly in controlled trials--is considered in patients with advanced gastrointestinal cancer.Experience with laparoscopic ultrasonography for defining tumour resectability in carcinoma of the pancreatic head and periampullary region.Computed tomography (CT) is currently the most widely available staging investigation for pancreatic tumours. However, the accuracy of CT for determining tumour resectability is variable and can be poor. Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is potentially a more accurate method for disease staging. The authors' experience of LUS for staging carcinoma of the pancreatic head and periampullary region is described.Fifty-one patients with potentially resectable pancreatic tumours defined at CT underwent further investigation with LUS. Twenty-seven patients subsequently had an open laparotomy. The evaluations of tumour resectability at CT and LUS were compared with the operative findings.At LUS, 24 patients were considered to have resectable tumours, 21 non-resectable tumours and six patients were shown to have no pancreatic tumour mass. Twenty-two patients deemed to have a resectable tumour at LUS underwent surgery. Twenty patients were confirmed to have resectable disease and two patients had non-resectable disease. A further five patients underwent surgery. In all five the ultrasonographic diagnosis was confirmed at surgery (four patients with non-resectable disease and no pancreatic tumour in one patient). LUS prevented unnecessary extensive surgery in 53 per cent of patients. For the 22 patients who underwent surgery for potentially resectable disease, the positive predictive value of LUS for defining tumour resectability was 91 per cent.LUS is an accurate additional investigation for defining tumour resectability and directing management in patients with potentially resectable carcinoma of the pancreatic head or periampullary region.Laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Over the past decade, laparoscopy has emerged as a popular method of detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease in patients presumed to have localized pancreatic cancer.The English language literature on laparoscopic staging of pancreatic cancer was reviewed. Interpretation of this literature on staging laparoscopy is difficult because (1) there has been inconsistent use of high-quality computed tomography (CT) in prospective studies, (2) many studies have included patients with locally advanced disease, and (3) the R0/R1/R2 resection rates among patients staged by laparoscopy have not been reported, making it impossible to correlate laparoscopic findings with the R0 resection rate. Laparoscopy may prevent unnecessary laparotomy in a proportion of CT-staged patients presumed to have resectable pancreatic cancer. However, routine laparoscopy is performed on patients judged to have resectable disease by high-quality CT, this fraction of patients is between 4 and 13 per cent.When state-of-the-art CT is available, the routine use of staging laparoscopy may not be easily justified from the data in the recent literature. Selective use of laparoscopy may be more appropriate and will probably be a more cost-effective staging approach. Criteria are presented for the selective use of laparoscopy in the staging of patients with localized pancreatic cancer.Problems in staging of pancreatic and hepatobiliary tumours.Laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology in the staging of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer allows identification of metastatic disease which is beyond the resolution of computed tomography. Laparoscopic ultrasound, dissection, and/or peritoneal cytology may be used to enhance the sensitivity of the staging procedure. Our experience at Massachusetts General Hospital with staging laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology over the past 8 years (N = 239) reveals that approximately 30% of patients without metastases by computed tomography harbor occult metastatic disease at laparoscopy. Additionally, published series demonstrate accurate determination of resectability in greater than 75% of patients after staging laparoscopy. Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer allows optimization of resources and avoidance of unnecessary surgery.Laparoscopic ultrasound enhances diagnostic laparoscopy in the staging of intra-abdominal neoplasms.Routine laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) for staging intra-abdominal malignancies remains controversial. Thus, we undertook a prospective study to assess the value of preoperative laparoscopy with LUS for patients with intra-abdominal tumors judged resectable by preoperative studies. Laparoscopy was successfully performed in 76 of 77 patients, and 60 underwent LUS. Of 33 patients with presumed pancreatic cancer, laparoscopic findings changed the operative management of 11 patients, and LUS altered the management of an additional 6 patients. Laparotomy was avoided in 9 patients (27%). Among 14 patients with hepatobiliary tumors, laparotomy was avoided in 9 patients in whom laparoscopy and/or LUS revealed either benign or advanced disease. Operative management was altered in 4 of 18 patients with gastric or esophageal cancer by laparoscopic findings. LUS did not add to the management of these patients. Of 12 patients with presumed intra-abdominal lymphoma, 9 were diagnosed with lymphoma and 3 with benign disease, without laparotomy in all but 1 case. Laparoscopy and LUS are valuable tools for evaluating the resectability of pancreatic and hepatobiliary tumors. Laparoscopy, and to a lesser degree LUS, greatly facilitates diagnosing patients with intra-abdominal lymphomas and spares an occasional patient with esophagogastric carcinoma from undergoing laparotomy.Impact of laparoscopic staging in the treatment of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy in patients with pancreatic cancer identifies unsuspected metastases, allows treatment selection, and helps predict survival.Inception cohort.Tertiary referral center.A total of 125 consecutive patients with radiographic stage II to III pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma who underwent staging laparoscopy with peritoneal cytologic examination between July 1994 and November 1998. Seventy-eight proximal tumors and 47 distal tumors were localized.Based on the findings of spiral computed tomography (CT) and laparoscopy, patients were stratified into 3 groups. Group 1 patients had unsuspected metastases found at laparoscopy and were palliatedwithout further operation. Group 2 patients had no demonstrable metastases, but CT indicated unresectability due to vessel invasion. This group underwent external beam radiation with fluorouracil chemotherapy followed in selected cases by intraoperative radiation. Patients in group 3 had no metastases or definitive vessel invasion and were resection candidates.Survival.Staging laparoscopy revealed unsuspected metastases in 39 patients (31.2%), with 9 having positive cytologic test results as the only evidence of metastatic disease (group 1). Fifty-five patients (44.0%) had localized but unresectable carcinoma (group 2), of whom 2 (3.6%) did not tolerate treatment, 20 (36.4%) developed metastatic disease during treatment, and 21 (38.2%) received intraoperative radiation. Of 31 patients with potentially resectable tumors (group 3), resection for cure was performed in 23 (resectability rate, 74.2%). Median survival was 7.5 months for patients with metastatic disease, 10.5 months for those receiving chemoradiation, and 14.5 months for those who underwent tumor resection (P = .01 for group 2 vs. group 1; P<.001 for group 3 vs group 1).Staging laparoscopy, combined with spiral CT, allowed stratification of patients into 3 treatment groups that correlated with treatment opportunity and subsequent survival. Among the 125 patients, laparoscopy obviated 39 unnecessary operations and irradiation in patients with metastatic disease not detectable by CT. Laparoscopic staging can help focus aggressive treatment on patients with pancreatic cancer who might benefit.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in staging of pancreatic cancers.Authors report elective diagnostic laparoscopy, and the role of this method in evaluating operability of pancreatic cancer. At their department 11 diagnostic laparoscopic procedures of pancreatic cancer were performed during the last 5 years. In 3 cases tumor proved to be resectable despite preoperative imaging results of unresectable condition. On the basis of international literature authors give brief summary of indications, cost and benefit of diagnostic laparoscopy, and its place in the diagnostic algorythm of pancreatic cancer.Staging laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography in more than 400 patients with upper gastrointestinal carcinoma.Resection offers the only chance of cure to patients with esophageal, gastroesophageal junction, and hepatopancreatobiliary tumors. Staging is essential to select patients who will benefit from operation because palliation can also be performed nonoperatively. Several studies, including limited numbers of patients, have shown that laparoscopic staging prevents unnecessary laparotomies, but it is doubtful whether general application of this staging method can be advised. The aim of this study was to assess the benefit of diagnostic laparoscopy for staging patients with esophageal, gastroesophageal junction, and hepatopancreatobiliary tumors.Between June 1992 and December 1996, 420 patients with a resectable tumor after conventional staging underwent diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography. Histologic proof of metastases or ingrowth was used to cancel laparotomy.Laparoscopic staging avoided laparotomy in 20% of patients (sensitivity 0.70): 5% with an esophageal tumor, 20% with a gastroesophageal junction tumor, 15% with a periampullary tumor, 40% with a proximal bile duct tumor, 35% with a liver tumor, and 40% with a pancreatic body or tail tumor. Complications and port-site metastases were seen in 4% and 2% of patients, respectively.Laparoscopic staging is a safe procedure with low morbidity and without mortality in this series. It has shown no benefit in esophageal cancer, but seems beneficial for staging tumors located at the gastroesophageal junction, proximal bile duct tumors, liver tumors, and pancreatic body and tail tumors. The value of laparoscopic staging for patients with periampullary tumors is not as great as stated in previous studies and is still the subject of investigation.TNM staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer by laparoscopic ultrasonography.Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is an imaging modality that combines laparoscopy and ultrasonography. The purpose of this prospective blinded study was to evaluate the TNM stage and assessment of resectability by LUS in patients with pancreatic cancer.Of the 71 consecutive patients admitted to our department, 36 were excluded from the study, mainly due to evident signs of metastatic disease or another condition that would preclude surgery. Thus, a total of 35 patients were enrolled in the study. All patients underwent abdominal CT scan, ultrasonography, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), diagnostic laparoscopy, and LUS. Histopathologic examination was considered to be the final evaluation for LUS in all but three patients, where EUS was used as the reference.The accuracy of LUS in T staging was 29/33 (80%); in N staging it was 22/34 (76%); in M staging, it was 23/34 (68%); and in overall TNM staging, it was 23/34 (68%). In assessment of nonresectability, distant metastases, and lymph node metastases, the sensitivity was 0.86, 0.43 and 0.67, respectively, for LUS alone. Combining the information gleaned from laparoscopy and LUS, the accuracy in finding nonresectable tumors was 89%.Diagnostic laparoscopy with LUS is highly accurate in TNM staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer and should be considered an important modality in the assessment algorithm.Laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography for staging pancreatic cancer: critical appraisal.A pilot study was designed to elucidate the role of staging laparoscopy for determining resectability in patients with pancreatic cancer. The additional value of laparoscopic contact ultrasonography (LCU) was also evaluated with specific regard to its ability to detect hepatic metastases and assess vascular infiltration of the portomesenteric trunk. A consecutive sample of 50 patients referred for operation of a suspected pancreatic cancer were submitted to preoperative contrast-enhanced high-resolution computed tomography (CT) and staging laparoscopy combined with LCU at a university hospital. For those progressing to exploratory laparotomy, the intraoperative findings relating to tumor diffusion and vascular infiltration were compared to CT, laparoscopic, and LCU data. Analytical description of the laparoscopic findings is given. Row data of predicted versus observed vascular infiltration were tabulated for CT and LCU. The sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy of each diagnostic test were calculated for comparative analysis. Laparoscopy alone prevented unnecessary laparotomy in 20% of cases. A complete procedure could not be achieved in 28% of patients. Three false-negative staging results occurred. LCU identified small (benign) hepatic nodules not seen by CT in 8% of patients. Sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy for assessing vascular infiltration were 82%, 53%, and 69% for CT and 94%, 80%, and 87% for LCU. Laparoscopy was confirmed to be safe and effective for staging pancreatic cancer. Because of its unique capabilities to detect even small peritoneal tumor deposits a quick exploration immediately before laparotomy is advised in all patients. The additional benefit of a more extensive procedure is not supported by our results. Although LCU appears to define the vascular involvement more accurately than conventional CT, the limitation of getting clinically useful ultrasound data in all the patients suggests its adoption in only a selected population.Laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the TNM staging of pancreatic carcinoma.A prospective study was performed comparing laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography (LapUS), transabdominal ultrasonography (USS), computed tomography (CT), and selective visceral angiography with portal phase venography (SVA) for the assessment of resectability in 50 patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer. The results were stratified by TNM stages. Tumor unresectability was demonstrated in 36 patients (72%). The sensitivity of LapUS for demonstrating the index lesion was 96%. Laparoscopic ultrasonography failed to predict factors precluding resection by T stage in six patients, and there were no significant differences in the ability of any modality to predict local resectability (predictive value 58-73%). Laparoscopic ultrasonography did not overestimate T stage and was significantly more specific for assessing unresectability compared with USS (100% vs. 64%, p<0.05) and CT (100% vs. 47%, p<0.005). No imaging investigation was able to assess the N stage accurately. Metastases were confirmed in 16 patients (32%), with LapUS proving significantly more sensitive than USS (94% vs. 29%, p<0.001) and CT (94% vs. 33%, p<0.005). The addition of LapUS to the laparoscopic examination did not change the M stage in any patient, as all metastases were superficially located. Laparoscopy with LapUS was the most reliable method for assessing overall tumour resectability and was significantly more predictive than CT (97% vs. 79%, p<0.005). These results confirm that laparoscopy is indispensable for detecting occult intraabdominal metastases. LapUS reliably predicts tumor unresectability, offsetting the tendency of USS and CT to overestimate T stage. Methods of accurate N staging remain elusive, and the use of routine SVA is not justified.Improved tumor staging by diagnostic laparoscopy.This study was performed to assess the role of additional diagnostic laparoscopy in the preoperative staging of patients with adenocarcinoma of the esophagus, gastric cancer and pancreatic cancer prior to intended curative surgery. 89 patients with primary solid abdominal tumors were eligible for evaluation; of those 49 patients had a gastric cancer, 33 a pancreatic cancer and seven an adenocarcinoma of the esophagus. Patients without histologically proven metastases proceeded to laparotomy. Metastases were detectable laparoscopically in nine of 49 patients (18.4%) with gastric cancer (peritoneum n = 5, omentum n = 2, liver n = 2). Intraoperatively metastases were evident in further five cases (liver n = 3, peritoneum n = 2). In eleven of 33 patients (33%) with pancreatic cancer metastases were detected by laparoscopy (liver n = 6, peritoneum n = 2, liver and peritoneum n = 3) and in further four patients intraoperatively (liver n = 2, peritoneum n = 2). One of seven patients with an adenocarcinoma of the esophagus had liver metastases detected by laparoscopy. Intraoperatively no metastases were evident in those patients. Laparotomies were avoidable in 21 of the 89 patients (23.6%) who had a diagnostic laparoscopy prior to intended curative resection. Preoperative staging by additional diagnostic laparoscopy proved effective in patients with gastric and pancreatic cancer.The standard diagnostic work-up and surgical treatment of pancreatic head tumours.Experience with staging laparoscopy in pancreatic malignancy.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in the staging of abdominal malignancies is not well defined.We retrospectively reviewed the usefulness of diagnostic laparoscopy as a staging procedure in pancreatic malignancy. This experience between February 1988 and May 1997 involves 109 cases of suspected or proven pancreatic malignancy. All laparoscopies were performed with the patient under conscious sedation and local anesthesia in an endoscopy suite.Of the 109 patients with pancreatic cancer, 45 (42%) had metastatic disease. The use of computed tomography (CT) alone revealed the existence of liver metastases in 10 of 109 (9%) patients, which were confirmed laparoscopically. The further use of laparoscopy identified metastases in 29 more cases: hepatic, 23; hepatic and peritoneal, 3; peritoneal and mesenteric, 1; and mesenteric, 2. CT in conjunction with laparoscopy therefore revealed metastatic liver, peritoneal, or mesenteric lesions in 39 of 109 (36%) patients with pancreatic cancer. After staging laparoscopy, 67 of 69 patients underwent laparotomy. Metastatic disease was identified at laparotomy in 6 more patients; however, only 4 of these patients had metastases to the liver whereas 2 had metastases to the peripancreatic lymph nodes. Therefore, in patients with pancreatic malignancy, the negative predictive value for the diagnosis of metastases to the liver, peritoneum or mesentery was 94% (61 of 65 patients). The positive predictive value of laparoscopy alone for the detection of metastatic disease to the liver, peritoneum, or mesentery was 88% (29 of 33 patients). Laparoscopy was successfully performed without complications in all patients with pancreatic cancer; however, one had a technically unsatisfactory examination. The overall rate of resectability after staging by imaging studies and laparoscopy was 57% (35 of 61 patients).In patients with a negative CT for metastases, laparoscopic identification of metastases avoided unnecessary laparotomy in 29 of 99 (29%) patients with pancreatic cancer. Staging laparoscopy is indicated in all cases of pancreatic malignancy before an attempt at a surgical cure.The use of diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of pancreatic cancer.Pancreatic resection with curative intent is possible in a select minority of patients with carcinomas of the pancreatic head. Diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography combines the proven benefits of staging laparoscopy with high-resolution intraoperative ultrasound, thus allowing the surgeon to perform a detailed assessment of the pancreatic cancer.In a prospective study of 26 patients with obstructive jaundice from a carcinoma of the head of the pancreas, the curative resectability of tumors was assessed by ultrasound (26 cases), computerized tomography (26 cases), endoscopic ultrasound (16 cases), and a combination of diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound (26 cases).The findings of ultrasound and computerized tomography were comparable: 50% of patients were excluded from curative resection. Endoscopic ultrasound provided precise information on the primary tumors. The accuracy of the combined diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasound, when compared with ultrasound, computerized tomography, and endoscopic ultrasound, was better with respect to minute peritoneal or hepatic metastasis: 80.7% (or a further 30.7%) of patients did not qualify for curative resection.Diagnostic laparoscopy supported by laparoscopic ultrasonography enables detection of previously unsuspected metastases; thus, needless laparotomy can be avoided. It should therefore be considered the first step in any potentially curative surgical procedure.Cytology of peritoneal lavage performed during staging laparoscopy for gastrointestinal malignancies: is it useful?To evaluate the potential benefit of cytology of the peritoneal lavage obtained during diagnostic laparoscopy for staging gastrointestinal (GI) malignancies.Peritoneal lavage is a simple procedure that can be performed during laparotomy for GI tumors. Tumor cells in the lavage fluid are thought to indicate intraperitoneal tumor seeding and to have a negative effect on survival. For this reason, peritoneal lavage is frequently added to diagnostic laparoscopy for staging GI malignancies.Patients who underwent peritoneal lavage during laparoscopic staging for GI malignancies between June 1992 and September 1997 were included. Lavage fluids were stained using Giemsa and Papanicolaou methods. Cytology results were correlated with the presence of metastases and tumor ingrowth found during laparoscopy and with survival.Cytology of peritoneal lavage was performed in 449 patients. Tumor cells were found in 28 patients (6%): 8/87 with an esophageal tumor, 2/32 with liver metastases, 11/72 with a proximal bile duct tumor, 7/236 with a periampullary tumor, and none in 7 and 15 patients with a primary liver tumor or pancreatic body or tail tumor, respectively. In 19 of the 28 patients (68%) in whom tumor cells were found, metastatic disease was detected during laparoscopy, and 3 of the 28 patients had a false-positive (n = 1) or a misleading positive (n = 2) lavage result. Therefore, lavage was beneficial in only 6/449 patients (1.3%); in these patients, the lavage result changed the assessment of tumor stage and adequately predicted irresectable disease. Univariate analysis showed a significant survival difference between patients in whom lavage detected tumor cells and those in whom it did not, but multivariate analysis revealed that these survival differences were caused by metastatic or ingrowing disease.Cytology of peritoneal lavage with conventional staining should no longer be performed during laparoscopic staging of GI malignancies because it provides an additional benefit in only 1.3% of patients and has limited prognostic value for survival in this group of patients.[Is laparoscopic evaluation of digestive cancers legitimate? A prospective study of 109 cases].This aims of this study is to evaluate after laparoscopic exploration or treatment in digestive cancers, the incidence of port site metastases and the incidence of unnecessary laparotomy in advanced disease.109 patients were included in this study: 91 had localized digestive cancers and 18 had disseminated disease with hepatic and/or peritoneal metastases.All the patients underwent a laparoscopy and a laparoscopic ultra-sonography under general anesthesia prior to a definitive decision on therapeutic management. Depending on the circumstances, histological or cytological biopsies were performed. The puncture sites of the trocar were examined clinically and, if required, by ultrasonography, monthly through out the course of the disease. Chemotherapy was instigated in 60.5 per cent of patients.35 patients (32.1 per cent) only had one laparoscopic examination with a mean survival of 4.8 months, 22.9 per cent of patients had laparoscopic treatment of their lesion and 44.9 per cent had conventional treatment. Laparoscopic exploration allowed the detection of 52 lesions that had not been identified by conventional imaging techniques and thereby avoided 35 laparotomies (32.1 per cent). Tumor invasion of the peritoneum was present in 46 per cent of cases, most notably in the cases of pancreatico-biliary cancers. The overall mean survival was 32.7 months while it was 9.8 months in cases of palliative treatment. In total, 436 trocars were used. There was one case (0.9 per cent of patient or 0.02 per cent of port) of a metastasis occurring at the site of the trocar following treatment by right-sided, laparoscopic colectomy in a patient with disseminated cancer. Two factors seem to be involved peritoneal spread of the tumor and manipulation of the tumor.Laparoscopic exploration for digestive cancers is a legitimate technique. It allows the detection of lesions that are not identified by conventional imaging techniques, permits a more accurate assessment of the resectability of a tumor and reduces the number of unnecessary laparotomies. The incidence of metastases at the site of the trocar is low and is closely linked to the presence of disseminated disease and manipulation of the tumor.Role of laparoscopy in the staging of gastrointestinal cancer.Accurate staging plays a primary role in determining the appropriate treatment of gastrointestinal malignancies. Recently, laparoscopy has emerged as a staging modality that is more sensitive and specific in staging most gastrointestinal cancers than preoperative imaging modalities. The addition of laparoscopic ultrasonographic techniques has achieved even greater staging accuracy. Consequently, patients with disease that is amenable to resection are better identified, and others with locally advanced disease are spared unnecessary laparotomies. Since laparoscopic techniques may be associated with low morbidity and a rapid recovery, palliative procedures are being developed for patients with advanced gastrointestinal malignancies. This reviews summarizes the current status of laparoscopic staging of gastrointestinal malignancies and compares this technique to preoperative imaging modalities. Also discussed are promising staging technologies and therapeutic procedures that may soon play an important role in the management of gastrointestinal cancer patients.[Evaluation of pancreatic cancer by combined laparoscopy and echolaparoscopy].This prospective study was undertaken to evaluate the efficiency of staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of tumoural extension and surgical resectability in patients with carcinoma of the pancreatic head.From June 1995 to March 1997, 26 consecutive patients (11 male and 15 female patients), with a mean age of 62.5 years, were included in this study. The lesion was located in the pancreatic head with jaundice. Four staging methods were used: percutaneous ultrasonography (n = 26) computed tomography (n = 26), endoscopic ultrasonography (n = 26). The assessment of resectability by each procedure was verified by surgical exploration and histologic examination.Results of percutaneous ultrasonography and computed tomography were similar, predicting unresectability in 50% of the patients. Endoscopic ultrasonography performed in the 16 patients without visible metastases according to the previous procedures predicted surgical resectability in seven patients only. With staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography, undiscovered metastases were found and unresectability was predicted in 21 patients out of 26; the sensitivity was 100% for liver metastases, peritoneal metastases and vascular involvement, 90% for lymph node involvement and 88% for diagnosis of the primitive lesion. A Whipple procedure was performed in five patients and a palliative bypass in all the other patients except one. An unnecessary laparotomy was avoided in 12 patients.Staging laparoscopy associated with laparoscopic ultrasonography is superior to all other staging methods. It should be the first step of a potentially curative surgical treatment (five cases only in this series) or of a palliative bypass. Laparotomy was avoided in 12 cases.Lesser sac endoscopy and laparoscopy in pancreatic carcinoma definitive diagnosis, staging and palliation.Laparoscopy with lesser sac endoscopy (LSE) were used in combination from 1987 to 1992 in 103 patients for differentiation between pancreatic carcinoma and other peripancreatic pathology, staging, and palliation. LSE identified pancreatic carcinoma in 38 patients; pancreatic cystadenocarcinoma in 2 patients; pancreatic cystadenoma in 3 patients; pancreatic adenoma in 1 patient; pancreatic metastases from liver in 2 patients; and pancreatic cysts in 5 patients. False negative diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma occurred in two cases. Nontumor pancreatic pathology was revealed in 10 patients. Specifically, acute pancreatitis was found in four patients, and chronic pancreatitis was found in six patients. Extrapancreatic cancers were identified in 15 patients: retroperitoneal extraorgan tumors were found in 2 patients; extrahepatic biliary tract cancer in 6 patients; gallbladder cancer in 1 patient; liver cancer in 3 patients; and stomach cancer in 1 patient. In five cases no pathology was found. Overall correct definitive diagnosis was established in 101 patients. Sensitivity of laparoscopy with LSE for pancreatic carcinoma diagnosis proved to be 95 per cent (38 of 40 patients), for pancreatic tumors diagnosis 96.22 per cent (51 of 53 patients); specificity of the method 100 per cent; and accuracy of diagnosis 98 per cent (101 of 103 patients). Thus, the accuracy of the method was as high as the accuracy of combination of all known modalities. Criteria of unresectability were revealed with the combination of LSE and laparoscopy in 75 per cent (30 of 40 cases) of pancreatic carcinoma. Moreover, laparoscopy allowed palliation of pancreatic carcinoma. Laparoscopic cholecystostomy was performed in 10 patients, and laparoscopic cholecystojejunostomy with enteroenterostomy was performed in 6 patients.Laparoscopic ultrasound enhances standard laparoscopy in the staging of pancreatic cancer.To define the role of laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS) in the staging of pancreatic tumors.Laparoscopy has recently been established as a valuable tool in the staging of pancreatic cancer. It has been suggested that the addition of LUS to standard laparoscopy could improve the accuracy of this procedure.A prospective evaluation of 90 patients with pancreatic tumors undergoing laparoscopy and LUS was performed over a 27-month period. LUS equipped with an articulated curved and linear array transducer (6 to 10 MHz) was used. All patients underwent rigorous laparoscopic examination. Clinical, surgical, and pathologic data were collected.The median age was 65 years (range 43 to 85 years). Sixty-four patients had tumors in the head, 19 in the body, and 3 in the tail of the pancreas. Four patients had ampullary tumors. LUS was able to image the primary tumor (98%), portal vein (97%), superior mesenteric vein (94%), hepatic artery (93%), and superior mesenteric artery (93%) in these patients. LUS was particularly helpful in determining venous involvement (42%) and arterial involvement (38%) by the tumor. This resulted in a change in surgical treatment for 13 (14%) of the 90 patients in whom standard laparoscopic examination was equivocal.LUS is useful in evaluating the primary tumor and peripancreatic vascular anatomy. When standard laparoscopic findings are equivocal, LUS allowed accurate determination of resectability. Supplementing laparoscopy with LUS offers improved assessment and preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy in pancreatic and periampullary malignancies.The role of diagnostic laparoscopy before laparotomy in patients with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies remains controversial. We analyzed the value of using diagnostic laparoscopy to avoid laparotomy in these patients.Between November 1993 and December 1996, 254 patients with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were treated. In 74 patients, multiple distant metastases precluded further surgical treatment. In all, 180 patients underwent laparotomy for pancreatic cancer (119 patients) or periampullary cancer (61 patients). Preoperatively, all patients underwent computed tomography for staging and to assess resectability of the tumor. Based on the results of the imaging procedure, the patients were scheduled for either tumor resection or a palliative operation.Twenty-one of 180 patients (12%) with pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were scheduled preoperatively for nonresectional operations because of distant metastasis or retroperitoneal tumor infiltration. In none of these patients was the operative strategy changed. In 159 of 180 patients (88%), a pancreatic resection was planned preoperatively; 119 patients underwent pancreatic resection. In the remaining 40 patients preoperatively scheduled for tumor resection, removal of the tumor was not possible. In 24, this resulted from tumor infiltration into the retropancreatic vessels, and in 16 it resulted from liver or peritoneal metastasis detected for the first time intraoperatively. These 16 patients (10%) could have benefited from diagnostic laparoscopy. Similar results were found in the subgroup of 119 patients with pancreatic cancer, of whom 102 were planned for tumor resection and 17 for palliative operation. Of the 102 patients planned preoperatively for tumor resection, 71 patients (70%) underwent pancreatic resection. In the remaining 31 patients scheduled for tumor resection, removal of the tumor was not possible: in 17 because of tumor infiltration into the retropancreatic vessels and in 14 because of liver or peritoneal metastasis detected for the first time intraoperatively. These 14 patients (14%) also would have benefited from laparoscopy.Preoperative computed tomography is a reliable technique to detect tumor metastasis in patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer. Unlike other investigators, we found that only 10% of patients with periampullary or pancreatic cancer and 14% of patients with pancreatic cancer might profit from laparoscopy. Because of this low number, laparoscopy cannot generally be recommended for patients with pancreatic or periampullary cancer before laparotomy.Diagnosing and staging of pancreatic carcinoma-what is necessary?The aim of the present prospective observational study was to diagnose and stage pancreatic carcinoma with a minimum of diagnostic procedures. Our experiences in 307 patients with a histologically confirmed pancreatic carcinoma show that for diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma sonography and computed tomography are sufficient in 95% of the cases. The combination of both has a sensitivity equal to that of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP; 96.8 vs. 98.7%; n.s., chi2 test). ERCP is only indicated in cases with negative sonography and computed tomography, and suspicion of pancreatic cancer. For tumor staging, the routine performance of angiography cannot be recommended in view of the fact that although it provides greater sensitivity for the evaluation of an infiltration of the portal vein (80% for angiography vs. 22% for sonography or computed tomography), it is associated with a lower positive predictive value (56.4 vs. 68 and 72%) which results in a lower accuracy. Despite recent advantages in diagnostic technology, less than 50% of unresectable tumors were identified preoperatively at a 10% false-positive rate. The major reason for unresectability is infiltration into the mesenteric axis, which cannot be identified laparoscopically. Laparoscopy or percutaneous biopsy is recommended only in the presence of a tumor with suspicion of distant metastasis detected by radiological imaging and requiring histological confirmation. In conclusion, sonography and computed tomography as the only diagnostic images are sufficient for diagnosing and staging of pancreatic carcinoma in more than 95% of the patients. Only a small number of patients needs further diagnostic procedures.Routine diagnostic laparoscopy is unnecessary in staging tumors of the pancreatic head.This study examined the success of computed tomography (CT) and angiography in predicting resectability of tumors of the pancreatic head and retrospectively examined whether diagnostic laparoscopy would have contributed additional staging information.The records of 67 patients with tumors of the pancreatic head were reviewed. Thirty-four patients had unresectable tumors, and 33 had tumors that were considered operable according to CT and angiographic findings.Surgical resection was successful in 27 of 33 patients (82%). Surgical resection was abandoned in 6 cases due to inability to develop a plane behind the pancreatic head in 4 cases, peritoneal implants in 1 case, and an occult hepatic metastasis in 1 case. Diagnostic laparoscopy might have detected metastases in the latter two cases. Thus, in retrospect, diagnostic laparoscopy might have altered management in only 2 of 33 surgical cases (7%).The potentially limited usefulness of diagnostic laparoscopy in this series, in retrospect, raises the question of whether routinely using diagnostic laparoscopy in staging tumors of the pancreatic head is cost effective.Pancreatic cancer. Laparoscopic staging and peritoneal cytology.Laparoscopy is an indispensable study if precise preoperative staging for pancreatic cancer is required. It will identify liver, peritoneal, or omental implants in 22% to 48% of patients who have no other evidence of disseminated disease by CT. Performing peritoneal washings at the time of laparoscopy will disclose an additional 8% of patients with micro metastases and who have an equally poor prognosis as those with visible metastases.Computed tomography and laparoscopy in the assessment of the patient with pancreatic cancer.In most patients with pancreatic cancer, the tumor is unresectable. Nonoperative methods for palliation of jaundice, duodenal obstruction, and pain currently are being developed. Preoperative assessment of resectability of the tumor is becoming more and more important to avoid unnecessary operations. The aim of this study was to compare computed tomography (CT) and laparoscopy with special reference to the additive role of the latter technique in predicting unresectability of pancreatic cancers.Sixty patients with exocrine pancreatic cancer were assessed prospectively with both CT and laparoscopy. On the basis of metastatic spread or signs of vascular involvement, the radiologist and the laparoscopist independently reported the tumors as probably unresectable or resectable.The predictive value for unresectability was 100% for both CT and laparoscopy. Sensitivity in predicting unresectability was 69% for both techniques, and the corresponding figure for specificity was 100%. When CT and laparoscopy were evaluated together, an improvement in sensitivity to 87% was observed (p < 0.05). Separately, CT and laparoscopy correctly predicted resectability in only 30% and 38% of the patients, respectively. The presence of liver metastases was overlooked by CT in 13 of 32 patients (40%). Every fourth patient who was found to have unresectable tumor at CT was falsely classified as resectable by the laparoscopist, leading to unnecessary laparotomies. On the other hand, 9 of 24 patients (38%) with resectable disease at CT were deemed unresectable at the subsequent laparoscopy.Laparoscopy and CT independently and reliably predicted unresectability of pancreatic cancer, but the methods were inaccurate in forecasting resectability. The results suggest that CT examination should be done in patients who are candidates for attempted curative surgical procedures, whereas laparoscopy should be restricted to Those Judged resectable at CT.Laparoscopic sonography of peripancreatic tumors: preliminary experience.This study was performed to evaluate the use of laparoscopic sonography in patients with suspected peripancreatic tumors and to assess the impact of laparoscopic sonography on patient management.In a prospective study, 24 patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy underwent CT, laparoscopy, and laparoscopic sonography. The pancreas, peripancreatic vasculature, liver, and porta hepatis were evaluated in each patient. Metastases (hepatic, peritoneal, or nodal), extrapancreatic extension of tumor, or vascular encasement was considered evidence of unresectable disease. Histopathology was the standard of reference; unresectable disease was confirmed by biopsy. At the completion of the laparoscopic sonography, each examination was scored according to impact analysis categories that had been prospectively established.Peripancreatic vasculature was adequately shown by laparoscopic sonography in 22 patients (92%), of whom 12 patients had histopathologic evidence of vascular encasement. All 12 cases of vascular encasement were revealed by laparoscopic sonography, and 10 of 12 cases of vascular encasement were revealed by CT. Liver lesions were seen in eight patients (33%). One hemangioma was shown solely by laparoscopic sonography; the other seven liver lesions were revealed by CT, laparoscopy, or both. In six patients (25%), laparoscopic sonography was used to guide biopsy of lesions that were not seen by laparoscopy. Impact analysis showed that laparoscopic sonography provided additional information in eight patients (33%) and altered management in four patients (17%). Of those patients for whom laparoscopic sonography altered management, three patients underwent successful resection after laparoscopic sonography two of these patients had suspected vascular encasement on CT but laparoscopic sonography revealed normal vessels, and the third patient had CT evidence of a liver lesion that was shown to be a cyst on laparoscopic sonography. A fourth patient was spared laparotomy when laparoscopic sonography revealed unsuspected vascular encasement.Preliminary experience suggests that laparoscopic sonography may aid diagnosis and alter management in patients with suspected pancreatic neoplasms.Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography: optimizing resectability in hepatobiliary and pancreatic malignancy.Open laparotomy has traditionally been required to stage hepatobiliary and pancreatic (HBP) cancers accurately. For unresectable patients, costs and morbidity have been high. Today, laparoscopy alone or combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) is being examined for its value in defining the extent of malignancy.We have analyzed the effect of routine implementation of this new staging technique in our HBP center. Staging laparoscopy (SL) with LUS was performed in 50 consecutive patients with HBP malignancies. All patients were considered to have resectable tumors as determined by traditional preoperative staging modalities. Primary tumors were located in the liver (n = 7), biliary tract (n = 11), or pancreas (n = 32). An average of 2.7 preoperative studies per patient were performed prior to SL-LUS.Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography predicted resectable tumors in 28 patients (56%). At laparotomy, 26 of 28 were actually resectable: the false-negative rate was 4%. Staging laparoscopy with laparoscopic ultrasonography indicated unresectability in 22 patients (44%). Staging laparoscopy alone demonstrated previously unrecognized occult metastases in 11 patients (22%). In 11 other patients (22%) in whom SL alone was negative, LUS established unresectability from vascular invasion (n = 5), lymph node metastases (n = 5), or intraparenchymal hepatic tumor (n = 1). All cases of unresectability due to vascular invasion were validated by laparotomy. Five of six lymph node or hepatic metastases were proved histologically by LUS-guided needle biopsy rather than laparotomy.Unnecessary laparotomy can be safely avoided by SL-LUS in many patients with HPB malignancies, reducing costs and morbidity.Multimodality staging optimizes resectability in patients with pancreatic and ampullary cancer.Few patients with pancreatic cancer have resectable disease at the time of diagnosis, and a variety of nonsurgical techniques are available to provide effective palliation of jaundice and pain. Accurate preoperative staging is essential to identify patients with unresectable disease, thereby minimizing unnecessary surgery. Currently used diagnostic tests include contrast-enhanced computerized tomography (CT), visceral angiography, endoscopic ultrasound, and laparoscopy, but their utility remains controversial. To evaluate the accuracy of these various diagnostic tests, 30 consecutive patients with histologically proven pancreatic or ampullary adenocarcinoma treated between 1992 and 1996 were evaluated. All 30 patients had contrast-enhanced CT and laparoscopy, 22 patients (73%) had visceral angiography, and 16 patients (53%) had endoscopic ultrasound. Individual and combined predictive values of resectability and unresectability as well as the sensitivities and specificities were determined for all diagnostic tests and compared with intraoperative findings. When CT, visceral angiography, and laparoscopy were combined, the predictive values of resectability and unresectability were 75 and 90 per cent, respectively, with a sensitivity of 75 per cent and a specificity of 90 per cent. Therefore, the combined use of selected diagnostic tests proved more effective than any single diagnostic test for accurately staging patients with pancreatic head and ampullary cancers and should be considered to minimize unnecessary surgery.The role of laparoscopy in the management of suspected pancreatic and periampullary malignancies.Laparoscopic evaluation of patients with suspected periampullary malignancies has been utilized more frequently in recent years. Its exact role with regard to staging and surgical bypass for palliation have yet to be clearly defined. To better define the role of laparoscopy in the evaluation and palliation of periampullary malignancy, a retrospective review of the Duke experience was carried out. Fifty-three patients with suspected pancreatic or periampullary malignancies were referred for surgical evaluation at Duke University Medical Center between 1993 and 1995. All patients underwent CT scanning and lesions were classified as resectable or unresectable based on previously established criteria. Patients either underwent laparoscopic evaluation (n = 30; 11 with laparoscopic palliation) or proceeded directly to celiotomy (n = 23). Charts were reviewed for postoperative course including complications, length of stay, and hospital costs. Although laparoscopy had a sensitivity of 93.3% for metastatic disease, CT scans accurately staged 86.8% of patients missing only one patient with peritoneal/hepatic disease. Based on these results, laparoscopy may not be beneficial for every patient with a suspected pancreatic malignancy. Retrospectively an attempt was made to determine which patients benefited from laparoscopy and which patients are best served by proceeding directly to open exploration. From these data we devised an algorithm that outlines an efficient and cost-effective approach for this patient population.The efficacy of laparoscopic staging in patients with upper gastrointestinal tumors.The major advantage of diagnostic laparoscopy for patients with a gastrointestinal tumor is the prevention of unnecessary explorative laparotomies. However, it is doubtful whether this procedure also prevents late laparotomies that are necessary for palliative treatment during follow-up.From January 1992 to July 1995, 233 consecutive patients with gastrointestinal malignancies underwent laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography after routine diagnostic procedures had shown potential curative disease.After diagnostic laparoscopy, laparotomy was not performed in 21% of all patients (47 of 226) because of histologically proven, unresectable, mainly metastatic disease; 6% had esophageal tumors (4 of 64 patients), 43% had liver tumors (10 of 23), 43% had proximal bile duct tumors (9 of 21), 15% had periampullary tumors (17 of 111), and 43% had pancreatic body and tail tumors (3 of 7). Nonoperative palliation was successful in all patients. However, late laparotomies were necessary in 7 of these 47 patients (15%): 5 patients with periampullary tumors and 2 patients with proximal bile duct tumors. All 7 patients underwent a surgical bypass, most due to duodenal obstruction, 1 to 13 months after diagnostic laparoscopy.In this study, diagnostic laparoscopy may have prevented unnecessary laparotomies for exploration or palliation in 18% of all patients (40 of 226). The procedure is of doubtful benefit for patients with esophageal tumors because the current findings show that only 6% of explorative laparotomies could be prevented. In patients with periampullary tumors, the initial benefit was 15%, but the risk of a late laparotomy is relatively high (30%).[Efficacy and economic aspects of preoperative diagnosis: laparoscopy is useful in only 13% of patients with pancreatic carcinoma].The value of diagnostic laparoscopy to improve tumor staging in patients with pancreatic and periampullary cancer is still a matter of controversial discussion, especially with regard to whether diagnostic laparoscopy can identify patients in whom a laparotomy can be avoided due to metastases. To answer this question, all patients who underwent operations for pancreatic cancer (n = 97) or periampullary cancer (n = 30) between 11/1993 and 12/1995 were evaluated. Only 10% of the patients with periampullary/pancreatic cancer and 13% with pancreatic cancer could avoid laparotomy through diagnostic laparoscopy. Due to these low numbers, a diagnostic laparotomy cannot be recommended in general in patients with pancreatic and/or periampullary cancer on economic grounds and because of the risk of trocar metastases.Diagnostic-staging laparoscopy.Recently instead of the old fashioned, traditional explorative laparotomy the newer up-to-date procedure, the diagnostic-staging laparoscopy has been generally used in the everyday surgical practice of the Authors. Evaluating 32 diagnostic and staging laparoscopy Authors draw the attention to the importance of this procedure which has high diagnostic value, and reduces the complication rate. Biopsy, cytology, frozen section can be done. Authors carries out diagnostic and staging laparoscopy in cases of esophageal, liver, stomach and pancreas tumours just immediately before surgery.The role of laparoscopy and ultrasonography in pancreatic head carcinoma.Laparoscopic screening of surgical candidates with pancreatic cancer or liver tumors.Patients with colorectal or pancreatic cancers may have peritoneal implants which are too small to be detected by current radiologic imaging techniques. Since such implants often preclude surgical removal of the primary tumor or isolated metastasis, their detection prior to open abdominal exploration may spare patients the morbidity of a large abdominal incision when there is no benefit to resection and lifespan is limited.In the past 30 months, patients with pancreatic cancer, hepatoma, or isolated colorectal cancer metastases, who were candidates for surgical resection on the basis of standard radiologic scans, were examined with the laparoscope through a 10-mm periumbilical incision prior to undertaking open abdominal exploration. If unexpected implants were noted, biopsy was obtained through a 5-mm port placed through a convenient site.Since January 1993, 11 patients with pancreatic carcinoma, three patients with primary hepatic malignancies, and 12 patients with isolated metastases from colorectal cancers have undergone laparoscopic examination prior to celiotomy. Eight of these patients had unexpected peritoneal or liver involvement which precluded resection. Laparoscopy was successful in detecting disease in six such patients (75%).Although adding 20-30 min to the operative time when unrevealing, laparoscopy provided an effective way to avoid celiotomy in patients with carcinomatosis.[Value of laparoscopic staging and palliative treatment of peri-ampullary tumors; the Stentby Study].Combined endoscopic ultrasonography and laparoscopic ultrasonography in the pretherapeutic assessment of resectability in patients with upper gastrointestinal malignancies.Even though endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has improved the pretherapeutic staging and assessment of resectability in patients with upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract malignancies, a considerable number of patients still have to undergo unnecessary explorative laparotomy to obtain the final assessment of resectability. The aim of the present study was to evaluate laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) and the combination of EUS and LUS in the pretherapeutic study of these patients with special reference to resectability.Each of 44 patients with esophageal, gastric, or pancreatic cancer was assigned to a treatment-related resectability group based on five different imaging modalities: computer tomography (CT) + ultrasonography (US), EUS, laparoscopy, LUS, and EUS + LUS. The findings with these imaging modalities were compared with intraoperative findings.Overall group assignment accuracy showed significantly better results for EUS, LUS, and EUS + LUS than for CT + US and laparoscopy. EUS + LUS identified all non-resectable patients, whereas the sensitivity of CT + US, laparoscopy, and EUS were 14%, 36%, and 79%, respectively. Median time consumption for each EUS, laparoscopy, or LUS procedure was less than 25 min, and no complications were seen during or after the EUS, laparoscopy, or LUS procedures.Preliminary experience with the combination of EUS and LUS for pretherapeutic assessment of upper GI tract malignancies showed that this combination was superior to CT + US, laparoscopy, and EUS. EUS + LUS correctly identified all non-resectable patients, but two overstaged patients also indicated the need for larger prospective studies to identify the indications and the limitations of this new approach.Ultrasound-guided fine needle biopsy and laparoscopy in the study of pancreatic masses: report on 136 cases.The authors report their experience from 136 fine needle ultrasound (FN-US)-guided biopsies and laparoscopies. The pancreatic diseases considered by these methods were as follows: 9 cases of Pancreatitis, 11 cases of Pancreatic cysts, 5 cases of endocrine cancer, 109 cases of Exocrine cancer and 2 not conclusive cases. Diagnostic accuracy of FNB and laparoscopy was evaluated for each group and, in particular, for cancer patients. In the latter group, FNB helped to detect abdominal diffusion in 25 cases (33%) while laparoscopy, including laparoscopic washing, revealed a micro-diffusion in 31 cases (55%), the latter not shown previously by CT, RNM and US. The combination of these methods allows us to confirm the advanced stage of the majority of pancreatic cancers at onset. Furthermore, this seems to be a very reliable method to select resectable patients, thus avoiding useless, sometimes hazardous and expensive further investigation.The value of minimal access surgery in the staging of patients with potentially resectable peripancreatic malignancy.The purpose of this study was to determine if an endosurgical approach that mimics open exploration would improve the accuracy of simple diagnostic laparoscopy. SUMMARY BACKGROUND DATA; Most patients with peripancreatic malignancy are found at exploration to be unable to undergo resection. Laparoscopy has been suggested as a sensitive method for detecting metastatic disease in this group of patients. However, the ability to assess resectability with simple diagnostic laparoscopy remains relatively low (<40%).Between December 1992 and August 1994, 115 patients with radiologically resectable peripancreatic tumors underwent extended laparoscopy before undergoing a planned curative resection. This technique required assessment of the peritoneal cavity, liver, lesser sac, porta hepatis, duodenum, transverse mesocolon, and celiac and portal vessels.Sixty male and 55 female patients were included in the current study. The pancreatic head was involved in 74 patients (64%), followed by the body in 21 (18%), tail in 8 (7%), ampulla in 8 (7%), duodenum in 3 (3%), and distal bile duct in 1 (1%). An abdominal computed tomography (CT) scan was performed for all patients before laparoscopy, ultrasonography for 74 patients (64%), endoscopic retrograde choleangiopancreatography for 59 patients (51%), and mesenteric angiography for 9 patients (8%). Pneumoperitoneum was established successfully in all but 2 cases (98%). A complete examination of 108 patients was performed. Sixty-seven patients were considered to have resectable disease, and 61 resections were performed. Laparoscopy failed to identify hepatic metastases in 5 patients and portal venous encasement in 1 patient. Unresectable disease was identified in 41 patients. Hepatic metastases were observed in 20 patients, mesenteric vascular encasement in 14, extrapancreatic/peritoneal involvement in 16, and celiac or portal lymphatic metastases in 8. There were no intraoperative or postoperative complications related to the laparoscopic procedure. The positive predictive index, negative predictive index, and accuracy of laparoscopy were 100%, 91%, and 94%, respectively.This study demonstrates that extended laparoscopy is accurate and safe and makes exploration unnecessary in many patients with potentially resectable peripancreatic malignancy. In this series, 76% of patients explored were resected, compared with the authors' experience between 1983 and 1993 of 35%. The authors believe that laparoscopy is an important component in the staging of this group of patients and should be performed before exploration.[Contribution of laparoscopic echography in the staging of curative resection of cancer of the pancreatic head (26 cases)].In a prospective study, 26 patients with pancreatic and peri-ampullary cancer were evaluated with ultrasound (US), computerized tomography (CT Scan), endoscopic ultra sonography (EUS) and laparoscopic ultrasound (LUS). Sensitivity of US and CT scan were comparable, although CT scan seems better to evaluate the size of the tumor and for lymph node detection. 50 per cent of patients had a criterion for noncurative resection. EUS (16 cases) had the best sensitivity (100 per cent) for the staging of small tumors (less than 20 millimeters), detection of adjacent nodes and the relation between tumor and mesenteric and portal veins. EUS was not able to detect peritoneal and/or liver micro-metastases (44 per cent of them would be missed by this examination alone). The criterion for noncurative resection was 56.6 per cent. LUS exactly assessed all tumors larger than 3 centimeters (100 per cent). The accuracy compared with endoscopic ultra-sonography was not as good for small tumors and adjacent nodes, was equal for the venous relations with tumors, but better concerning micro-peritoneal or hepatic metastasis. The criterion for noncurative resection was 80 per cent. These results suggest to use of US and CT as first-line procedures in the pre-operative staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancers. When the patient does not appear to have disseminated lesions (50 per cent), endoscopic ultra-sonography gives a good estimation of the size of the tumor, node assessment and vascular relations. LES could be the first step for a curative surgical treatment LES revealed to discover 15 to 30 per cent of unknown micrometastases and avoided useless laparotomy in these patients.[Is diagnostic laparoscopy a reliable addition to preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma?].Over the last decade several authors proposed adopting diagnostic laparoscopy as an early diagnostic routine method in the staging of pancreatic carcinoma to prevent exploratory laparotomy. In our hospital only 11.6% of all patients who underwent explorative laparotomy would have benefitted from diagnostic laparoscopy. Therefore, we do not recommend diagnostic laparoscopy as a routine method to assess resectability of pancreatic carcinoma?[Diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic ultrasonography: value of staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic carcinoma].The dismal prognosis of pancreatic cancer and the development of new, minimally invasive bypass techniques require a differentiated indication for open pancreatic resection. Diagnostic modalities, which facilitate an accurate assessment of resectability, have to be found. Modern imaging and endoscopic techniques fullfill these requirements in only about 50% of cases. Diagnostic laparoscopy is the only method for visualization of peritoneal metastases. The use of diagnostic laparoscopy and laparoscopic sonography raises the resectability rate to between 75% and 100%. 33% up to 67% of patients deemed resectable by preoperative imaging show signs of irresectable cancer at laparoscopy and can be spared a negative laparotomy. These patients can be treated by laparoscopic or endoscopic bypass techniques.Diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in staging of cancer of the pancreatic head region.Diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in staging of cancer of the pancreatic head region.The aim of this study was to assess the additional role of diagnostic laparoscopy combined with laparoscopic ultrasonography in the staging of patients with pancreatic head malignancy. Between January 1993 and June 1994, 73 patients with stage I cancer of the pancreatic head determined by preoperative investigation (endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and Doppler ultrasonography) were eligible for laparoscopic ultrasonography. The peritoneal cavity was investigated for peritoneal deposits, intrahepatic metastases, malignant infiltration of the portal and superior mesenteric vessels, and N3 lymph node metastases. All patients without histologically proven metastases proceeded to laparotomy. Seventy patients were eligible for evaluation. Sixteen of the 21 patients with distant metastases were diagnosed by laparoscopy with ultrasonography. Forty-nine patients had surgical exploration and trial dissection to assess local resectability. Twenty-nine patients (41 per cent) had resectable pancreatic head tumours. The positive predictive value of local ingrowth as determined by laparoscopic sonography was 93 per cent. Laparotomy was avoided in 19 per cent of patients and the preoperative stage was changed in 41 per cent. Laparoscopy including ultrasonography was effective in staging pancreatic head malignancy.[Place of celioscopy in the diagnosis of invasiveness of digestive cancers].The adequate treatment of gastrointestinal tract carcinoma requires accurate preoperative staging. Laparoscopy has been advocated for this purpose. We reviewed the data of 12 patients and the literature to compare the results of laparoscopic staging to those of conventional imaging (ultrasonography-CT scan). Laparoscopy was more sensitive in the diagnosis of peritoneal and lives metastases. It was inadequate for the diagnosis of lymph node metastases. Laparoscopy was especially useful in patients with esophagus, stomach, pancreas and liver cancers. Laparoscopic ultrasonography improved the staging of pancreatic carcinoma and the diagnosis of liver metastases.[Laparoscopic staging of gastrointestinal tumors].Laparoscopic staging was carried out in 28 cases with carcinomas of the distal esophagus, cardia, stomach or pancreas. The intention was first to rule out peritoneal carcinomatosis and secondly to see, whether RO-resection would be possible, mainly for the reason of therapeutic splitting. The diagnostic accuracy can be raised to 95% using laparoscopic ultrasound, exploration of the lesser sac of the peritoneum and tissue sampling in combination with preoperative endoscopy and radiography. In 39.3% of the investigated patients the staging must be corrected after laparoscopic staging compared with the preoperative findings. 35.7% of the patients did not need explorative laparotomy.[Preoperative laparoscopic evaluation of patients with upper gastrointestinal cancer].Nineteen consecutive patients with adenocarcinoma of the stomach or pancreas, in whom preoperative ultrasonography and computed tomography were unable to assess the possibility of surgical resection, had a diagnostic laparoscopy performed. In 16 cases the operability could be established from the findings at laparoscopy. All laparoscopies were carried out without major morbidity and with a short postoperative hospital stay. It is concluded that patients belonging to this category should have a diagnostic laparoscopy performed in order to avoid futile laparotomies, which in cases that are unsuitable for surgical treatment are associated with emotional stress, physical morbidity and a prolonged hospital stay.[Diagnostic-operative laparoscopy. Our experience].Diagnostic laparoscopy has been an integral part of our surgical practice for over 4 years. Between 1988-1992, 100 diagnostic laparoscopies have been performed in this institution without mortality. We have found the procedure to be particularly useful in the following situation: 1) Hepatobiliary disease where it is used in conjunction with targeted liver biopsy. 2) Acute emergency cases. These include the diagnosis of acute peritonitis, abdominal trauma and in patients with suspected mesenteric ischaemia. 3) In the staging of intra-abdominal malignancy especially gastric, oesophageal, colonic, peritoneal and pancreatic neoplasms.[Prediction of resectability and of surgical risk in pancreatic carcinoma; conditioning factors of survival after resective intervention].Pancreatic cancer has been extensively researched in recent years, but overall survival after diagnosis is almost unchanged since the time of Whipple. In the meantime, we have tried to determine the factors influencing surgical risk, resectability and survival. Between 1968 and 1992, 516 patients with pancreatic cancer were monitored; 160 patients with cancer of the body-tail were excluded. Eighty-five of the remaining 356 patients with pancreatic head cancer were resected, while the remainder underwent only palliative procedures. Surgical outcome, in terms of operative mortality or complications, was correctly predicted preoperatively in > 80% of patients. The preoperative evaluation of the resectability of pancreatic cancer has been investigated with different, mainly invasive, procedures. CT scan, associated with angiography and laparoscopy is reported to give better results, with a resectability rate up to 78%. 67% of our patients who were diagnosed as resectable according to CT-scan features and serum CA 19-9 < 200 U/ml, were actually resected; furthermore 40% had a potentially curative resection. Most of our 'curative' resections (80%) were within this group of patients. Multivariate analysis showed only 4 factors influencing long-term survival: TNM stage, diabetes, age > 70 years, tumour grading.[The role of laparoscopy and peritoneal cytology in the preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma].The staging of pancreatic cancer still represents a challenge for surgeons involved in this field; radiological diagnostic methods used routinely (CT, NMR, angiography) may under-estimate this neoplasm; in fact, the presence of peritoneal or subglissonian hepatic micrometastasis (< 2 cm) is a frequent surprise at laparotomy and force the surgeon to undertake a palliative procedure. This policy need not be followed because it is possible to perform non-surgical palliation of jaundice or pain respectively by percutaneous radiological stent insertion and coeliac alcoholisation. Pre-operative staging thus acquires an important role in the correct treatment, surgical or medical. Laparoscopy allows us to overcome the understaging of the more common diagnostic methods and view directly the coelomatic space and the surface of the abdominal viscera; moreover during this procedure it is possible to perform a peritoneal wash to obtain other information on the cancer stage. We judged 56 patients by radiological diagnosis; 31 were excluded from surgery by laparoscopy; 10 of the other 25 cases were submitted to radical resection. The resectability operative rate was 40%, compared with 18% if we had submitted patients to surgery. Several patients underwent peritoneal wash, always with negative results; all were submitted to surgery and radically resected. In our opinion, laparoscopy and peritoneal wash represent useful tools in the staging of patients affected with pancreatic cancer.Laparoscopic ultrasonography for hepatobiliary and pancreatic malignancy.Despite the advances made since the introduction of ultrasonography, computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging, a wide discrepancy may occur between preoperative and peroperative staging of gastrointestinal malignancy with liver and peritoneal metastases. Diagnostic laparoscopy performed immediately before a planned laparotomy can provide valuable information for the accurate assessment and appropriate management of some forms of gastrointestinal malignancy, especially that of the liver and pancreas. For evaluation of small liver and retroperitoneal malignancies, intraoperative ultrasonography performed by laparotomy is of proven value. It is now technically possible to perform ultrasonography through a laparoscopic cannula using high-resolution ultrasonographic transducers. This combination of laparoscopy and ultrasonography was studied in 25 patients with established liver lesions, carcinoma of the gallbladder or pancreatic cancer. Additional information leading to a change in surgical approach was obtained in 20 patients. Laparoscopic ultrasonography, although still in a preliminary phase of development, is a simple and reliable technique that will contribute to more accurate staging of intra-abdominal malignancy.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer by endoscopy.Preoperative staging and assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer.To study the accuracy of preoperative staging techniques for assessing resectability of pancreatic and ampullary adenocarcinoma, we entered 88 consecutive candidates into a prospective study of contrast-enhanced computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, angiography, and laparoscopy. Resectability was proved in 16 (29%) of 55 patients for the head of the pancreas, 1 (6%) of 17 for the body and tail of the pancreas, and 14 (88%) of 16 for the ampulla. The combined findings of computed tomography and angiography showed that more than 87% of pancreatic head tumors were unresectable because of vascular encasement, but neither modality sufficed alone. Small liver and peritoneal metastases were found in 15 (27%) of 55 cancers of the head of the pancreas, 11 (65%) of 17 cancers of the body and tail of the pancreas, and 1 (6%) of 16 cancers of the ampulla; computed tomography missed all but 2 of these instances of metastasis, but laparoscopy with biopsy identified 22 (96%) of 23 instances. Magnetic resonance imaging findings did not differ significantly from computed tomography and conferred no added benefit. Ninety percent of unresectable tumors were identified. Seventy-eight percent of pancreatic head cancers were resectable when all test results were negative vs 5% (2/37) when any test result was positive. This study demonstrates that accurate and efficient triage is possible for patients with cancer of the pancreas and ampulla.[Laparoscopic assessment of the operability of pancreatic cancer].Results are reported of laparoscopic examination of 78 patients with pancreatic cancer. The methods used were laparoscopic inspection and palpation of the pancreas, laparoscopic biopsy by mono- and bipuncture method, laparoscopic inspection and palpation of the organs of bursa omentalis. As a result of these investigations, dissemination outside the pancreas was established in 57 patients (73.1 per cent) in the outpatient services, before entering hospital. The other 21 patients (26.9 per cent) were subjected to radical or palliative surgical interventions. The importance of laparoscopy for evaluation of the operability and for selection of patients, entering surgical clinics, is emphasized.Laparoscopy for pancreatic cancer: does it benefit the patient?The findings in 73 patients undergoing laparoscopy for pancreatic cancer have been reviewed. The procedure was performed immediately prior to a proposed laparotomy which was undertaken in 51 patients. In this subgroup, 42 patients were correctly staged as having incurable/inoperable disease by laparoscopy but only four out of nine patients judged to be resectable were found to be operable at laparotomy. Laparoscopic target biopsy/fine needle cytology of the primary or its secondary deposits confirmed the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in 61 out of 65 patients (92%). Whereas the majority of hepatic deposits visualized by laparoscopy had been detected by the prelaparoscopic imaging tests, peritoneal and omental deposits were only identified by laparoscopy. Laparoscopy is a useful procedure in the staging of patients with pancreatic cancer and establishes the diagnosis of advanced disease thereby, obviating a laparotomy in all those patients in whom surgical palliation is not indicated. The procedure should be performed in those patients in whom a laparotomy is contemplated.Laparoscopy in the staging and planning of therapy for pancreatic cancer.Although staging of pancreatic cancer is critical to the planning of therapy, many patients come to laparotomy with liver or peritoneal metastases not suspected or detected during conventional preoperative testing. We performed laparoscopic examinations as part of the staging evaluation of 40 patients with proved pancreatic cancer who were candidates for curative resection or intraoperative radiotherapy. In each patient, laparoscopy was the last test before laparotomy and was carried out only if all other test results were negative for metastases. In 14 of 40 patients, single, small (1 to 2 mm) metastatic nodules were detected and verified by biopsy in the liver (6 patients), on the parietal peritoneum (7 patients), and in the omentum (1 patient). It is likely that several of these lesions would have been overlooked at routine exploration. Because of the positive findings, therapy was altered in all 14 patients. None received intraoperative radiotherapy, nine who did not have jaundice were discharged without operation, three had biliary or gastric bypass only, and two were treated by percutaneous biliary stenting. Of the 26 patients who had negative findings on laparoscopic examination, the absence of gross metastasis was confirmed at laparotomy in 23. Three false-negative findings were caused by incomplete examination of the liver in two patients and a central liver lesion in one patient. Therefore, 43 percent of all patients (17 of 40) had demonstrable but unsuspected nonlocal metastases, and laparoscopic examination detected 82 percent (14 of 17) of these. The overall accuracy of laparoscopy was 93 percent and that of examination with negative findings, 88 percent. In eliminating useless laparotomy and redirecting treatment plans, laparoscopy contributes significantly both to the proper management of patients with pancreatic cancer and to increased efficiency of resource utilization.Laparoscopy and biopsy in the diagnosis of malignant intra-abdominal tumors.Laparoscopic evaluation was effected in 298 patients with intra-abdominal tumors. Among 186 cases of liver tumor, 172 cases (92.5%) were diagnosed as tumors laparoscopically and malignant tissue was obtained in 71 cases (78.0%) out of 91 cases of liver tumors biopsied under laparoscopic guidance. Among 79 cases of pancreas tumors, laparoscopy led to the correct diagnosis in 32% (38 cases) of carcinoma of the head of the pancreas and 88% (41 cases) of carcinoma of the body and tail of the pancreas. The positive rate of biopsy in cases of tumor of the head of the pancreas and of the body and tail of the organ was 74.1% (20 out of 27 cases) and 84.6% (33 out of 39 cases), respectively. Laparoscopy supplemented by biopsy was useful for the diagnosis of submucosal tumors of the digestive tract and disseminated peritoneal tumors.Peritoneoscopy and pancreas biopsy in the diagnosis of pancreatic diseases.Peritoneoscopy and pancreatic biopsy under direct vision were performed on 124 cases with a variety of pancreatic diseases by means of supragastric pancreoscopy and supragastric bursoscopy. Among 53 cases of pancreatitis, the pancreas was directly observed in 38 (72%). Among 71 cases of pancreatic carcinoma, observation of pancreas head carcinoma was accomplished in 32% and for pancreas body carcinoma, 85%. Peritoneoscopic biopsy of the pancreas had good diagnostic accuracy with negligible complications.[Diagnostic value of preoperative laparoscopy in detection of neoplastic changes].Value of laparoscopy in the diagnosis and management of pancreatic carcinoma.Our experience with laparoscopy in the diagnosis and staging of 23 cases of pancreatic cancer is reported. This endoscopic procedure has proved useful in the diagnosis of the disease, in the assessment of operability, and in the retrieval of material for histological and cytological confirmation of pancreatic cancer. An infra-gastric laparoscopic method for inspection of the body and tail of the pancreas is described and the technique may allow the earlier detection of neoplasms in this region.[Comparison of laparoscopic, surgical and histological findings in the diagnosis of malignant pancreatic tumors].[OUR EXPERIENCES WITH LAPAROSCOPIC EXPLORATION].